Home
ON AIR
36
Events
ARCHIVE
FEI.TV
ACADEMY
Auctions
Marketplace
Login
More information
Test for free
ON AIR
36
Events
ARCHIVE
FEI.TV
ACADEMY
Auctions
Marketplace
More
ON AIR
36
Events
ARCHIVE
FEI.TV
ACADEMY
Auctions
Marketplace
CMH.TV
Login
Test for free
PRIVACY STATEMENT
(AS OF 01.03.2024)
In accordance with Art. 12, 13, 14 and 21 of the General Data Protection Regulation (GDPR)
            and § 13 of the German Tele Media Act (TMG) we inform you below how your personal data
            are handled when using our website
www.clipmyhorse.tv
.
OWNER
Owner in the sense of data protection law is:
ClipMyHorse.TV Operations GmbH
Wandersmannstr. 68
65205 Wiesbaden
E-Mail: dataprivacy@clipmyhorse.tv
Via these contact data, you will reach our
Data Protection Officer Gina Bleckmann from Fresh Compliance GmbH 
                or another contact with data protection responsibility
. Please feel free to contact us at any time 
                if you have any concrete questions about your data, data erasure, or your rights.
PURPOSE AND LEGAL BASIS FOR DATA PROCESSING
General
The purpose of data processing and the corresponding legal basis is detailed in the following.
Insofar as data processing takes place between you and an event 
                host (e.g. regarding the recording of participants’ lists, collecting data about 
                the owners of the horses), the circumstances of data processing and - if applicable - 
                consents or other legal bases are governed exclusively by the event hosts’ data protection regulations.
USING OUR WEBSITE FOR INFORMATION PURPOSES ONLY
You can visit our website without disclosing personal data. If you use our website for 
                information purposes only, i.e. without registering, logging in or otherwise 
                transmitting personal data, we will not collect any personal data 
                except the data transmitted by your browser to allow for your visit to our website, and information 
                transmitted to us via the cookies used.
Technical provision of the website
For the purposes of the technical provision of the website, we need to process certain 
                automatically transmitted information from you so that your browser can display our 
                website and you can use the website. With each access to our website, this information 
                is collected automatically and saved to our server log files. This information relates 
                to the computer system of the computer calling up our website. The following 
                information is collected in this process:
IP address:
Browser type/version (e.g.: Internet Explorer 6.0);
Browser language (e.g.: German);
Operating system used (e.g.: Windows XP);
Internal resolution of the browser window;
display resolution;
Java script activation;
Java on / off;
Cookies on / off;
colour depth;
time of access.
We furthermore use cookies to make our website available for your use. 
                Cookies are text files that are stored in the Internet browser or by the Internet browser on your 
                computer system when you access a website. A cookie contains a characteristic sequence of characters 
                allowing for unique identification of the browser when accessing the website the next time. 
                We use these cookies to make our website with its technical functions available to you. 
                Using cookies is mandatory for some of the functions of our website; for this reason, 
                these cookies are strictly necessary for the operation of our website. These cookies 
                store the following information and transmit it to us:
cookie ID;
session information;
declaration of consent for the use of the cookie.
On our website, we use three types of cookies:
Strictly necessary cookies (we need these, for example, to display the website 
                    correctly for you and to cache certain settings)
Preference cookies (these enable our website to store information that changes 
                    the behavior or appearance of the website, e.g. your preferred language or the region you are in)
Functional and performance cookies (these help us, for example, to evaluate technical 
                    data from your visit to ClipMyHorse.TV and thus avoid error messages)
Advertising and analytics cookies/marketing cookies (these register your previous search, for example 
                    for riding shoes, and will accordingly show you advertisements for riding shoes when you next access our website)
You can configure, block and erase cookies in your browser settings. If you erase all cookies from our 
                website, some functions of the website may not be displayed correctly. 
                The Bundesamt für Sicherheit in der Informationstechnik (German Federal Office for Information Security) 
                provides helpful information and instructions for the most common browsers:
https://www.bsi-fuer-buerger.de/BSIFB/DE/Empfehlungen/EinrichtungSoftware/EinrichtungBrowser/Sicherheitsmassnahmen/Cookies/cookies_node.html
Data recipient
In keeping with the descriptions and purposes described above, we share your data with the following recipients 
                that are vital for our providing our offer to you and communicating with you:
Sentry
We use the service provider Sentry (Sentry, 1501 Mariposa St #408, San Francisco, CA 94107, USA) 
                to improve the technical stability of our service by monitoring the system stability and 
                detecting code errors. Sentry is used exclusively for these goals and does not evaluate 
                data for promotional purposes. Users’ data such as information on the device or time of 
                an error are collected anonymously and erased afterwards. The data processing takes 
                place in the USA. For more information, refer to Sentry’s privacy 
                statement:
https://sentry.io/privacy/
.
Consent may only be given by users over the age of 16. If you are younger, 
                please ask your parents or legal guardian for permission.
Google Analytics
For static analysis of how our website is used, we use the service provider Google Analytics 
                (Google Ireland Ltd. headquartered in Gordon House Barrow Street Dublin 4 Ireland) 
                to place cookies that permit us to analyze your surfing behavior, 
                comparable to audience rating in television. This helps us to improve the quality of our 
                website and contents. We learn how the website is used so that we can continuously 
                optimize our web offer. Depending on your location, your data will either be 
                processed in the European Union or in the USA. For more information, 
                please refer to Google’s
privacy statement
.
This website uses Google Analytics with the extension “_anonymizeIp()”.
As a result, IP addresses are further processed in abbreviated form, 
                so that direct personal references can be excluded. 
                You can find more information on the terms of use and 
                data protection of Google Analytics at
http://www.google.com/analytics/terms/de.html
or
https://www.google.de/intl/de/policies/
.
Hotjar
This website uses Hotjar, a analysis software of Hotjar Ltd. (“Hotjar”) 
                (
http://www.hotjar.com
, Level 2, St Julian's 
                Business Centre, 3, Elia Zammit Street, St Julian's STJ 1000, Malta, Europe). 
                Hotjar allows us to measure and evaluate how users behave on our website 
                (clicks, mouse movements, scrolling heights, etc.). The information about your 
                visit to our website generated by the "tracking code" and "cookie" is transmitted to 
                the Hotjar servers in Ireland and stored there.
You can prevent the collection of data by Hotjar by clicking on the following link and 
                following the instructions:
Hotjar Opt-out
With your consent, we use cookies to distribute our content on the internet, 
                i.e. to display the content of our website on other web pages or on social media.
Google AdWords and Google Conversion Tracking
We use the online promotion program “Google AdWords” and, in the frame of Google AdWords, 
                Conversion Tracking. Google Conversion Tracking is an analysis service of Google Inc. 
                (1600 Amphitheatre Parkway, Mountain View, CA 94043, USA; “Google”). When you click on an 
                ad placed by Google, a Conversion Tracking cookie is placed on your computer. 
                These cookies become invalid after 30 days, do not comprise any personal data and 
                thus cannot be used to identify individual persons.
The information collected via Conversion cookies is used to generate Conversion statistics 
                for AdWords customers who chose to use Conversion Tracking. 
                The customers learn the total number of users who clicked on their ad and were redirected to a 
                website fitted with a Conversion Tracking tag. However, they will not receive any information that 
                allows them to identify individual users.
Google Tag Manager and Google Publisher Tags
Our website uses the Google Tag Manager. The Google Tag Manager is a solution that allows 
                marketers to manage website tags via an interface. The Google Tag Manager service 
                triggers other tags, which in turn may collect data. Depending on your location, 
                your data will either be processed in the European Union or in the USA. 
                For more information, please refer to Google’s
privacy statement
.
Facebook Pixel and links to social media sites
Facebook Pixel can track the behavior of users who have been redirected to the provider’s 
                website after having clicked on a Facebook ad. This process evaluates the efficacy of Facebook ads for 
                statistics and market research purposes and can help to optimize future advertising measures. 
                The data are collected anonymously and do not allow us to draw any conclusions on the users’ identity. 
                However, Facebook saves and processes the data so that a connection to the respective user profile is 
                possible; also, Facebook can use the data for its own promotional purposes in compliance with the 
                Facebook regulations on use of data (
https://www.facebook.com/about/privacy/
). 
                You can enable Facebook and its partners to place advertisements on and outside of Facebook. 
                A cookie may also be stored on your computer for these purposes.
Consent to the use of visitor action Pixel may only be given by users over the age of 16. 
                If you are younger, please ask your parents or legal guardian for permission. 
                Please click here to revoke your consent:
LINK
or send an e-mail to support@clipmyhorse.tv
Our website does not use any social plug-ins. We only place a link to the respective social 
                media website (e.g. www.facebook.com) and to our presence there.
Reviews via Trustpilot
We use the Trustpilot rating tool to receive and publish customer reviews. 
                These reviews are on a voluntary basis. To permit the use of Trustpilot, we will disclose your email address, 
                your name, your language settings and our internal booking number to Trustpilot A/S, 
                Pilestræde 58, 5,1112 Copenhagen, Denmark. If you participate in this rating system 
                (prior registration is required for this), your rating will be published on our website and on the 
                websites of Trustpilot and its partners in accordance with Trustpilot's requirements. For reviews via 
                the Trustpilot review service, the terms and conditions and data protection provisions of Trustpilot apply. 
                Please refer to
https://legal.trustpilot.com
.
We process your personal data to send invitation emails for ratings on the 
                basis of your consent in accordance with Art. 6 para. 1 lit. a) GDPR.
We only disclose such data as are required to execute the mutual contract, or in accordance with your consent 
                granted for example in the frame of our Newsletter or cookie banner. If no contract has been concluded yet, 
                we disclose the data in certain cases in the frame of our justified interests. This is applicable for example 
                also when you wish to visit our website or to contact us. When you visit our website, it is in our mutual 
                interest to provide access to our offer and the chance to communicate with each other.
We also concluded data processing agreements with all external recipients in order to comply with European 
                legal requirements. Depending on your location, some of the above-mentioned service providers – if specified 
                accordingly – will also transfer your data to the United States or other third countries. 
                The European Court of Justice decided that the United States have an equivalent level of data protection. 
                To meet all the requirements, we concluded additional contracts on data processing, the so-called standard contractual clauses. 
                Furthermore, we investigate every service provider in cooperation with our Data Protection Officer 
                and ensure that additional safety measures are available, for example powerful data encryption.
Active use of the website
In addition to the pure use of our website for information purposes, you can also actively use
                our website in order to come into contact with us or to register either for the free-of-charge
                and restricted services or for the fee-based and more extensive services and to use them as
                a registered user. In addition to the processing of your personal data in a use for information
                purposes as detailed above, we then collect and process further personal data from you
                which we require for the processing of your registration, for invoicing, for the provision of the
                registration-based services and, in the case of a contact enquiry, for the response to your
                enquiry.
User enquiries
To handle inquiries sent to us via contact form or message to our email address and to reply to them, 
                we will process your personal data disclosed to us in this context. 
                This generally includes your first name, surname and e-mail address in order to send you a reply, 
                as well as any other information that you disclose to us in the frame of your message. The purpose of the data 
                requested is to contact you or communicate with you, which is why the data is only used for this purpose.
Depending on the inquiry, we will process your personal data for the execution of pre-contractual measures 
                pursuant to Art. 6 para. 1 lit. b) GDPR or for safeguarding our legitimate interests pursuant to 
                Art. 6 Abs. 1 lit. f GDPR; our legitimate interest lies in the proper replying to customers’ inquiries.
Newsletter
If you wish to subscribe to our newsletter, you need to specify the email address to which our newsletter 
                should be sent. For mailing our newsletter, we use the “Mailjet” service from Mailjet 
                (13-13bis, rue de l’Aubrac, 75012 Paris, France). In the context of this service, only the data disclosed 
                by you in order to receive the newsletter will be processed (e.g. email address, surname, first name). 
                For Mailjet’s privacy statement, refer to
https://www.mailjet.de/privacy-policy/
.
Consent to the newsletter is given according to the so-called "double opt-in" procedure, 
                i.e. first you activate a checkbox on our site that confirms that you wish to receive the newsletter, 
                then you receive a confirmation email. Only clicking on the corresponding link in this confirmation email 
                will include you in the list of newsletter recipients.
Of course you can unsubscribe from the newsletter at any time and revoke th previously granted consent for the future. 
                To do this, please click on the respective button in the newsletter mailed to you, send a email to support@ClipMyHorse.tv, 
                or click on the button at
www.clipmyhorse.tv/newsletter/unsubscribe
.
We process your personal data for the purpose of receiving the newsletter on the basis of your consent 
                in accordance with Art. 6 para. 1 lit. a) GDPR.
Participation in a survey
We will process your personal data (name, email address, user history) also for the purpose of direct marketing and to 
                ask you every now and then on clipmyhorse.tv to participate in surveys (e.g. on your favorite riding discipline). 
                This includes the mailing of information on our latest campaigns and the request to participate in surveys so 
                that we can adjust the clipmyhorse.tv service portfolio better to your requirements as a customer. 
                To carry out the surveys, we use the “Typeform” service. Your data will be processed on the basis of our 
                legitimate interest in the direct marketing and in the surveys pursuant to Art. 6 para. 1 lit. f) GDPR.
We will save your data as long as we have an interest in the marketing activity, or until you object to the 
                use of your personal data. In this case, your data will be erased or, if legal retention periods apply, 
                blocked for further processing. You have the right to object to the processing of your personal data for 
                direct marketing purposes at any time. If you object, we will no longer use your data for direct marketing and surveys. 
                To execute your right to object, please contact us at: dataprivacy@clipmyhorse.tv
Log-in for using services subject to registration
Registration and provision of the services
Clipmyhorse.tv and certain free videos are available free of charge and without registration for (limited) use. 
                Alternatively, you can register for purchase of a fee-based access for unlimited use of all services 
                available on clipmyhorse.tv. By using our fee-based performance following registration, other services and 
                functionalities of our website will be activated for you. If you are accessing our website from a mobile end 
                device (e.g. tablet or smartphone), free use of clipmyhorse.tv is possible for a limited time only; after that, 
                you need to purchase a fee-based access for continued use to the services.
In the context of your registration for the selected services and the rendering of our performance, we will process the following data:
E-mail address
Form of address
First name and surname
Company if applicable
Street address
Additional address information if applicable
P.O. code
Town
Federal state/cantonif applicable
Country
VAT tax ID if applicable
Telephone no. if applicable
Legal age
An additional delivery address if applicable
Bank data (IBAN, BIC, bank, account holder’s name)
We will then ask you to select the payment method and provide the relevant data, which we will process for 
                the purpose of providing the fee-based services.
Once you have fully concluded the registration and payment—which is necessary for fee-
                based services–has been transacted, the services selected by you will be activated and
                remain in this state until you cancel the services.
We process your personal data for the performance of the services requiring registration for the 
                fulfillment of a contract or for the implementation of pre-contractual measures in 
                accordance with Art. 6 para. 1 lit. b) GDPR.
Payment
We use the following payment service providers for payment handling:
PayPal
(Europe) S.à r.l. et Cie, S.C.A., 22-24 Boulevard Royal, L-2449 Luxembourg
Stripe
Payments Europe, Limited (SPEL), 1 Grand Canal Street Lower, Grand Canal Dock Dublin, D02 H210 Ireland
CHARGEBEE B.V.
, Piet Heinkade 55, 1019GM Amsterdam
For payment handling, we transmit the following data:
IBAN
BIC
Country
First name, surname
For more information, please go the respective privacy statements at:
Privacy Policy
PayPal
Privacy Policy
Stripe
Privacy Policy
Chargebee
We process your personal data for the performance of the services requiring registration for the 
                fulfillment of a contract or for the implementation of pre-contractual measures in accordance with 
                Art. 6 para. 1 lit. b) GDPR.
Legal age
When you register for a membership account with clipmyhorse.tv, we ask you to answer the question whether 
                you are of legal age by checking a box; we do not ask you to enter your date of birth. If you complete this 
                mandatory step by checking the respective box, we only save the information that you are of legal age, but 
                not your date of birth or your actual age.
We process your personal data for the performance of the services requiring registration for the 
                fulfillment of a contract or for the implementation of pre-contractual measures in 
                accordance with Art. 6 para. 1 lit. b) GDPR.
Playing videos and live streams and using the media library
When you use the services on clipmyhorse.tv, in particular when you watch the videos that have been activated for you, 
                we collect data that cannot be traced back to individual users as part of the analysis tools described above, and 
                the user profile we have created about you is enriched with the information generated by your use of the 
                services (e.g. which videos were watched by the user, in which order, etc.). 
                In this case, no cookies are generated.
We process your personal data for the performance of the services requiring registration for the fulfillment of a 
                contract or for the implementation of pre-contractual measures in accordance with Art. 6 para. 1 lit. b) GDPR.
Compliance with legal regulations
On our website, we use affiliate network technologies by CJ Affiliate 
                (
https://www.cj.com
), a service of Conversant Europe Ltd. 
                The legal basis for this is our legitimate interest (i.e. interest in the economically efficient operation of our online 
                product portfolio in the meaning of Art. 6 para. 1 lit. f. GDPR). If you are redirected to our website via an 
                advertisement from a website that is part of the affiliate network ("network"), this fact is stored in a cookie 
                that the operator of the website places on your computer. The cookie contains a randomly generated ID (pseudonym). 
                If you make a purchase on our website or return to the website within a certain period of time, the 
                network partner can recognize you via the ID and assign the purchase to the network. However, the ID or 
                information on purchases cannot be linked to you individually. We do not combine this information with other 
                personal data and do not pass on any personal data to third parties.
If you do not want information about your behavior to be used by CJ Affiliate as explained above, you can refuse the 
                setting of a cookie required for this – for example, by setting your browser to generally disable the automatic 
                cookie placement – or you can delete the cookie. For details on how CJ Affiliate uses your data and your 
                right to object, please refer to the company’s privacy statement:
https://www.cj.com/legal/privacy-policy-services-de?hsLang=en
Categories of Recipients
As explained in the above descriptions and purposes, we disclose your data only to those other 
                recipients who perform services for us in connection with our website. Here, we limit the 
                disclosure of your personal data to the minimum necessary to make the services requiring 
                registration available for your use. In some cases, our service providers receive your 
                personal data as processors; as such, they are strictly bound by our instructions when 
                handling your personal data. In some cases, the recipients handle your data disclosed to 
                them independently.
Below, please find the categories of the recipients of your personal data:
Payment service providers and banks, for payment handling,
IT service providers for administration purposes and for hosting our website (also refer to the list and description),
Collection agencies and legal advisers, for asserting our claims.
Specifically, we use the following IT service providers for the services described below:
Zendesk
For handling customer inquiries via telephone, we use the ticket system “Zendesk” by Zendesk Inc. 
                        (1019 Market St, San Francisco, CA 94103, U.S.A.). When you contact us, the data required for 
                        replying to the contact inquiry will be collected (name, first name, telephone number, email). 
                        We will use your personal data transmitted for this purpose exclusively for replying to your 
                        contact inquiry. For Zendesk Inc.’s privacy statement, refer to
https://www.zendesk.de/company/customers-partners/privacy-policy/?_ga=2.91941658.1061004003.1524063401-1063456244.1524063401
.
Unbounce
We use the “Unbounce” service from unbounce Marketing Solutions Inc. 
                        (400-401 West Georgia Street, Vancouver BC, Canada V6B 5A1) as a host for single, 
                        smaller web pages. When you visit these pages (“landing pages”), your browser 
                        communicates with the service provider. Your IP address will be transmitted to this 
                        host, and cookies are placed (for general information on cookies, refer to 3.2.1.1 
                        above in this Privacy Statement). For this service provider’s privacy statement, refer to
https://unbounce.com/privacy/
.
TRANSFER TO THIRD COUNTRIES
We have also concluded data processing agreements with all external recipients in order to 
                comply with European legal requirements. Depending on your location, some of the 
                above-mentioned service providers – if indicated – will also transfer your data 
                to the United States or other third countries. The European Court of Justice 
                decided that the United States have an equivalent level of data protection. 
                To meet all the requirements, we concluded additional contracts on data processing, 
                the so-called standard contractual clauses. Furthermore, we investigate every service 
                provider in cooperation with our Data Protection Officer and ensure that additional 
                safety measures are available, for example powerful data encryption.
STORAGE PERIOD
USING OUR WEBSITE FOR INFORMATION PURPOSES ONLY
If you use our website exclusively for information purposes, we will save your personal 
                data to our servers only for the duration of your visit to our website. 
                Your personal data will be erased immediately after your visit. 
                Server log files are generally stored for a period of 365 days.
Cookies installed by us will be placed for a period of 90 days and will be erased automatically after that.
Deviating from the ninety-days storage period, to cookies listed below will be s
                tored for the respectively specified storage periods:
CookieConsent: 365 days
_ga: 729 days
_gads: 729 days
_gaexp: 64 days
IDE: 389 days
fr: 89 days
Generally, you can erase the placed cookies at any time yourself, as described above. 
                Your data will also be blocked or erased if a storage period prescribed by law expires, 
                unless there is a need for further storage of the data for the conclusion or fulfillment of a contract.
Certain data may have to be stored for longer for legal reasons. This applies primarily to storage periods 
                stipulated under commercial, trade, or tax law. You can of course request 
                information about the stored data at any time.
ACTIVE USE OF THE WEBSITE
When you actively use our website, we initially store your personal data for the duration of the 
                response to your inquiry or for the duration of our business relationship. 
                This also includes the initiation of a contract (pre-contractual legal relationship) and the execution of a contract.
Then, we additionally save your personal data until any legal claims arising from the 
                relationship with you become statute-barred in order to use it as evidence if necessary. 
                Usually, the limitation period is between 12 and 36 months, but it can also be up to 30 years.
We will erase your personal data when the limitation period expires, unless there is a 
                statutory retention obligation, for example under the German Commercial Code 
                (Sections 238, 257 (4) HGB) or the German Fiscal Code (Section 147 (3), (4) AO). 
                The statutory retention obligation may apply for two to ten years.
UPLOAD OF IMAGES TO HORSE PROFILE PAGES
I confirm that I have permission to use the uploaded photos, and they do not violate any copyright laws. 
                ClipMyHorse.TV does not accept responsibility for any fines arising from illegal use. 
                The most recent upload will replace the current profile and cover images. 
                ClipMyHorse.TV uses the uploaded images to present horses in an appealing way.
YOUR RIGHTS AS A DATA SUBJECT
Pursuant to the statutory requirements, you have the following rights as a data subject that you can assert against us:
Right to information
In accordance with Art. 15 GDPR, you are entitled at any time to obtain confirmation from us as to 
                        whether we are processing personal data concerning you; where this is the case, you are also 
                        entitled in accordance with Art. 15 GDPR to receive information about this personal data and 
                        certain other information (including processing purposes, categories of personal data, categories of recipients, 
                        envisaged storage period, your rights, the origin of the data, the use of automated decision-making and, 
                        in the case of third country transfer, the appropriate safeguards) and a copy of your data.
Right to Rectification:
In accordance with Art. 16 GDPR, you have the right to obtain from us the rectification 
                        of inaccurate personal data concerning you.
Right to Erasure:
In accordance with Art. 17 GDPR, you have the right to obtain from us the erasure of 
                        personal data concerning you without undue delay. The right to erasure does not apply to the 
                        extent that processing is necessary (i) for exercising the right of freedom of expression and 
                        information, (ii) for compliance with a legal obligation to which we are subject 
                        (e.g. statutory retention obligations), or (iii) for the establishment, exercise or 
                        defense of legal claims.
Right to Restriction of Processing:
In accordance with Art. 18 GDPR, you have the right to obtain from us the restriction of processing your personal data.
Right to Data Portability:
In accordance with Art. 20 GDPR, you have the right to receive the personal data concerning 
                        you which you have provided to us in a structured, commonly used and machine-readable format.
Right to withdraw:
You have the right to withdraw your previously granted consent to processing 
                        personal data at any time with effect for the future.
Right to Object:
In accordance with Art. 21 GDPR, you have the right object against the 
                        processing of your personal data so that we have to terminate processing your personal data. 
                        The right to object only exists within the limits specified in Art. 21 GDPR. In addition, 
                        our interests may conflict with the termination of processing, so that we are entitled to 
                        process your personal data despite your objection.
Where your personal data are processed for direct marketing purposes, 
                        you have the right to object at any time to processing of personal data concerning 
                        you for such marketing. Where you object to processing for direct marketing purposes, 
                        the personal data shall no longer be processed for such purposes.
Right to lodge a complaint with a supervisory authority:
In accordance with Art. 77 GDPR, you have the right to lodge a complaint with a 
                        supervisory authority, in particular in the Member State of your habitual residence, 
                        place of work or place of the alleged infringement if you consider that the processing of 
                        personal data relating to you infringes the GDPR. The right to complain exists without 
                        prejudice to any other administrative or judicial remedy.
The supervisory authority responsible for us is:
Der Hessische Datenschutzbeauftragte
Gustav-Stresemann-Ring 1
65189 Wiesbaden, Germany
AUTOMATED DECISION-MAKING / PROFILING
We do not use automated decision-making or profiling (automated analysis of your personal circumstances).
Sub-section Policy: 
Sub-policy 0
https://sentry.io/privacy/:
This app works best with JavaScript enabled.
Back to all legal docs
Business Associate Amendment
Data Processing Addendum
Privacy Policy
What does Sentry do?
What personal information does Sentry collect?
What does Sentry use my personal information for?
Legal basis for processing personal information
Who does Sentry disclose my personal information to?
Cookies and similar tracking technology
How does Sentry keep my personal information secure?
International data transfers
Data retention
Your data protection rights
Children’s privacy
Third-party websites
Updates to this Privacy Policy
How to contact us
Supplemental notice for California residents
Terms of Service
Privacy Policy
Version
/legal/privacy/3.3.1/
of This Agreement was created on
May 31, 2024
.
Read what has changed
This Privacy Policy sets out how Sentry collects, discloses, and uses personal information about you and how you can exercise your privacy rights. This Privacy Policy applies to personal information that we collect when you visit our website at sentry.io (“
Site
”), use our products and services (“
Service
”), or otherwise interact with us (e.g., by attending an event or communicating with us). If you do not agree with this policy, please do not access or use our Site or Service or interact with any other aspect of our business.
This Privacy Policy does not apply to data submitted to the Service (“
Service Data
”). A separate agreement (“
Customer Agreement
”) governs delivery, access, and use of the Service, including the processing of Service Data. With respect to any personal information included in Service Data, the organization (e.g., your employer or another entity or person) that entered into the Customer Agreement (“
Customer
”) controls its instance of the Service and any associated Service Data. If you have any questions about a Customer’s instance of the Service and any associated Service Data, please contact the Customer.
We recommend that you read this Privacy Policy in full to ensure you are fully informed.  However, if you only want to access a particular section of this Privacy Policy, then you can click on the relevant link below to jump to that section.
Table of contents
What does Sentry do?
What personal information does Sentry collect?
What does Sentry use my personal information for?
Legal basis for processing personal information
Who does Sentry disclose my personal information to?
Cookies and similar tracking technology
How does Sentry keep my personal information secure?
International data transfers
Data retention
Your data protection rights
Children’s privacy
Third-party websites
Updates to this Privacy Policy
How to contact us
Supplemental notice for California residents
What does Sentry do?
Sentry offers an application monitoring solution designed to identify, monitor, and alert developers to errors, bugs, and other performance issues that are occurring in their applications.
For more information about Sentry, please see the “About Us” section of our Site at
https://sentry.io/about/
.
Return to top
What personal information does Sentry collect?
The personal information that we may collect about you broadly falls into the following categories:
Information that you provide
We collect information about you when you input it into our Site or the Service or otherwise provide it directly to us.
Account and profile creation
We collect information about you when you register for an account, create or modify your profile, and set preferences for the Service. For example, you may provide your contact information, including your first and last name, email address, and password when you register for the Service. You may also have the option of adding an avatar to your profile to be displayed in the Service. We keep track of your preferences when you select settings within the Service, including marketing and notification settings.
Sign in via other platforms
Instead of creating a user account, you can log in via your account with other platforms (currently Google, Github, or Azure Devops). We will not collect the password that you use for the relevant platform, but we may collect details from your account with the platform, such as username and email address.
Requests and inquiries
You may choose to provide us with information when you contact us about our Service or otherwise interact with us. For example, you may choose to submit information regarding a problem you are experiencing with our Service and send us screenshots to help in resolving the problem. You may submit your contact information to register for our events, to subscribe to receive marketing communications from us, or to make an inquiry through our Site. You may also provide content to us when you participate in a survey, contest, promotion, sweepstake, activity, or event, including via social media and other content platforms.
Purchases
If you register for a paid Service, we will collect purchase information, such as the Service plan that you purchase and information related to refunds, credits, and cancellations, and your billing address and payment information. Please note that any payment information you provide is sent directly to a third-party payment processor. We have no access to and do not store your payment information.
Information that we collect from your device and usage
We collect certain information about your device and how you and your device interact with us and our Site or Service. In some countries, including countries in the European Economic Area and the United Kingdom (together, ”
Europe
”), this information may be considered personal data under applicable data protection laws.
Specifically, the information we collect will include information such as your IP address, device type, unique device identification numbers, browser-type, operating system, software installed on your device, product keys, general location information (such as inferred from an IP address), and referring URL.  We also collect information about how you and your device have interacted with our Site or Service or with us via email, including the pages you accessed, features you used, Service you purchased, links you clicked, and when you accessed and for how long.
Some of this information is collected using cookies and similar tracking technology, as explained further under the heading
“Cookies and similar tracking technology”
below.
Information that we obtain from third-party sources
From time to time, we receive personal information about you from third-party sources (including social media and other content platforms, public databases, and from our business and channel partners and service providers).
The types of information we collect from third parties include name, email addresses, job titles, and social media profiles. We may combine this information with information we collect through other means described above. This helps us to maintain and improve the accuracy of our records, identify new customers, deliver personalized communications, and suggest services that may be of interest to you.
Return to top
What does Sentry use my personal information for?
We use your information for business and commercial purposes, such as to:
Provide, maintain, and improve the Site and Service, including system administration, system security, and adding new features or capabilities;
Manage your account and send you related information, including confirmations, updates, technical notices, security alerts, and support and administrative messages;
Respond to your comments, questions, and requests, and provide customer care and support services;
Communicate with you about the Service, products, offers, surveys, events, content, and other news and information we think may be of interest to you;
Monitor and analyse trends, usage, and activities in connection with the Site and Service and our communications to you;
Detect, investigate, and prevent fraudulent transactions and other illegal activities, protect the rights and property of Sentry and others, and comply with legal requirements;
Personalize and improve the Site and Service and provide advertisements, content, and features that match your profile and interests, and remember information about your preferences for the Site and Service;
Administer surveys, contests, promotions, sweepstakes, and other activities; and
Carry out any other purpose for which the information was collected.
We may aggregate or de-identify information collected through the Service. We may use aggregated or de-identified data for any purpose, including without limitation for research and marketing purposes, and may also disclose such data to any third parties, including without limitation, advertisers, promotional partners, sponsors, event promoters, and others.
Return to top
Legal basis for processing personal information
If you are based in Europe, we collect and process information about you only where we have a legal basis for doing so under applicable European laws. This means we collect and process your information only where:
We need it to provide the Site or Service, including to register you as a new user, operate the Site or Service, provide technical support, and to protect the safety and security of the Site or Service;
It satisfies our legitimate interests, such as to market and promote the Service and to protect our legal rights and interests, which are not overridden by your own interests, rights, and freedoms;
It is necessary to comply with a legal obligation or in connection with a legal claim, such as to respond to judicial orders or subpoenas; or
You provide consent for a specific purpose, such as for marketing communications (where consent is required under applicable marketing laws).
The legal bases depend on the type of information and the purpose for our processing. In some contexts, more than one legal basis applies. When we process your information based on your consent, you have the right to withdraw your consent at any time without affecting the lawfulness of processing based on such consent before it is withdrawn. To exercise your rights, see
“Your data protection rights”
below. Where we are using your information because we or a third party (e.g., your employer) have a legitimate interest to do so, you have the right to object to that use though, in some cases, this may mean no longer using the Service.
Return to top
Who does Sentry disclose my personal information to?
We disclose your personal information to the following categories of recipients:
Affiliate companies
who help operate and improve our Site and Service (including to support the delivery of, provide functionality on, or help to enhance the security of our Site and Service), offer other Sentry affiliated services to you, or who otherwise process personal information for the purposes described in this policy. The protections of this policy apply to the information we disclose in these circumstances.
Third-party services providers
who provide hosting, storage, support, payment processing, billing, communication, analysis, and other services to us, which may require them to access or use information about you. If a service provider needs to access or use information about you to perform services on our behalf, they do so under appropriate security and confidentiality procedures designed to protect your information.
Third-party go-to-market partners
who provide referral, sale, resale, or similar go-to-market services. We may disclose your information, like your name, email address, and job title, in connection with their services. We may also disclose information to these third parties where you have agreed to that disclosure.
Third-party analytics partners
to provide analytics services. These entities may use Cookies in the same way we do, to among other things, track and analyze data, and better understand your online activity.
Third-party platforms
when you, your administrator or other Service users choose to install or enable third-party apps, add-ons or other platforms for use with the Service. Doing so may give the providers of those platforms access to your account and information about you, like your name and email address, and any content you choose to connect with those platforms. Please note that when you use third-party platforms, your use will be governed by their own terms and privacy policies.
Any
competent law enforcement body, regulatory, government agency, court or other third party
where we believe disclosure is necessary (i) as a matter of applicable law or regulation, (ii) to exercise, establish or defend our legal rights, or (iii) to protect your vital interests or those of any other person.
An
actual or potential buyer
(and its agents and advisers) in connection with any actual or proposed purchase, merger, or acquisition of any part of our business, provided that we inform the buyer it must use your personal information only for the purposes disclosed in this policy.
Any
other person with your consent
to the disclosure.
Return to top
Cookies and similar tracking technology
We use cookies and similar tracking technology (collectively, “
Cookies
”) to collect and use personal information about you, including to understand and save your preferences, and to compile aggregate data about Site and Service interaction.
We may also allow certain third parties (e.g., service providers such as Stripe) to access their own cookies or other tracking technologies on your computer, mobile phone, or other device you use to access the Site or Service. Cookies may be associated with de-identified data linked to or derived from data you voluntarily have submitted to us (e.g., your email address) that we may share with a service provider in hashed, non-human-readable form.
You may refuse to accept Cookies by activating the setting on your browser that allows you to refuse the setting of Cookies. You can find information on popular browsers and how to adjust your Cookie preferences at the browser provider’s websites. You can choose to disable Cookies, but if you do, your ability to use or access certain parts of our Site and Service may be affected.
We do not recognize or respond to browser-initiated Do Not Track signals.
Return to top
How does Sentry keep my personal information secure?
We use appropriate technical and organizational measures to protect the personal information that we collect and process about you. The measures we use are designed to provide a level of security appropriate to the risk of processing your personal information. However, no security system is impenetrable and due to the inherent nature of the Internet, we cannot guarantee that information, during transmission through the Internet, or while stored on our systems or otherwise in our care, is absolutely safe from intrusion by others. In particular, email sent to or from Sentry may not be secure, and you should therefore take special care in deciding what information you send to us via email.
Return to top
International data transfers
In some cases your personal information is transferred to, and processed in, countries other than the country in which you are resident. These countries may have data protection laws that are different from the laws of your country (and, in some cases, may not be as protective).
Specifically, our Site and Service are hosted in the United States and Germany, and our affiliate companies and third-party service providers operate around the world, including in the United States, Canada and Europe. This means that when we collect your personal information, we may process it in any of these countries.
Where we transfer your personal information to countries and territories outside of Europe and Switzerland, which have been formally recognised as providing an adequate level of protection for personal information, we rely on the relevant “adequacy decisions” from the European Commission and Swiss Federal Administration, and “adequacy regulations” from the Secretary of State in the United Kingdom.
Where the transfer is not subject to an adequacy decision or regulations, we have taken appropriate safeguards to require that your personal information will remain protected in accordance with this policy. The safeguards we use are the European Commission-approved standard contractual clauses, the UK International Data Transfer Agreement, and other appropriate legal mechanisms. This is how transfers of personal information between our group companies and with our third-party service providers will be safeguarded.
Data Privacy Framework Notice
Functional Software, Inc. (our registered company name) participates in and complies with the EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework, the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework, and the Swiss-U.S. Data Privacy Framework as set forth by the U.S. Department of Commerce (collectively, the
“Data Privacy Framework”
) regarding the collection, use, and retention of personal information about you that is transferred from the European Union, United Kingdom, and Switzerland to the U.S.  We have self-certified to the U.S. Department of Commerce that we adhere to the EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework Principles for all information about you that is received from the European Union and the United Kingdom in reliance on the EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework and the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework. We have also self-certified to the U.S. Department of Commerce that we adhere to the Swiss-U.S. Data Privacy Framework Principles (together with the EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework Principles, the
“Data Privacy Framework Principles”
) for all information about you that is received from Switzerland in reliance on the Swiss-U.S. Data Privacy Framework. If there is any conflict between the terms in this Privacy Policy and the Data Privacy Framework Principles, the Data Privacy Framework Principles will govern.
As required under the Data Privacy Framework, when we receive information under the Data Privacy Framework and then transfer it to a third party acting as an agent on our behalf, we have certain liability under the Data Privacy Framework if the agent processes the information in a manner inconsistent with the Data Privacy Framework and we are responsible for the event giving rise to the damage. We may be required to disclose information about you under the Data Privacy Framework in response to lawful requests by public authorities, including to meet national security or law enforcement requirements.
To learn more about the Data Privacy Framework program, and to view Sentry’s certification, please see the
Data Privacy Framework website
.
We encourage you to contact us as provided below should you have a Data Privacy Framework-related (or general privacy-related) complaint and we commit to resolve any such complaint. We have further committed to refer unresolved complaints concerning our handling of personal data received in reliance on the Data Privacy Framework to JAMS, a U.S.-based alternative dispute resolution provider.  If you do not receive timely acknowledgement of your Data Privacy Framework-related complaint from us, or if you are not satisfied with our response to your Data Privacy Framework-related complaint, please visit
https://www.jamsadr.com/DPF-Dispute-Resolution
for more information or to file a complaint. The services of JAMS are provided at no cost to you.
Under certain conditions, more fully described on the
Data Privacy Framework website
, including when other dispute resolution procedures have been exhausted, you may invoke binding arbitration.
We are subject to the investigatory and enforcement powers of the U.S. Federal Trade Commission (FTC).
Return to top
Data retention
We retain the personal information we collect from you where we have an ongoing legitimate business need to do so (e.g., to provide you with a service you have requested or to comply with applicable legal, tax, or accounting requirements).  In certain circumstances, we will need to keep your information for legal reasons after our relationship has ended. For example, we may retain your data for longer than the usual retention period when we have a legal obligation to do such, to deal with and resolve requests and complaints, to protect an individual’s rights and property, and for litigation and regulatory matters. The specific retention periods depend on the nature of the information and why it is collected and processed and the nature of any legal requirement. The criteria we use to determine the retention period include:
How long is the personal information needed to provide the Service or operate our business?
This includes such things as maintaining and improving the performance of the Service, keeping our systems secure, and maintaining appropriate business and financial records. This is the general rule that establishes the baseline for most data retention periods.
Is there an automated control, such as in your Sentry dashboard, that enables you to access and delete the personal information at any time?
If there is not, a shortened data retention time will generally be adopted.
Is the personal information of a sensitive type?
If so, a shortened retention time would generally be appropriate.
Has consent been provided for a longer retention period?
If so, we will retain the data in accordance with your consent.
Is Sentry subject to a legal, contractual, or similar obligation to retain the data?
Examples can include mandatory data retention laws in the applicable jurisdiction, government orders to preserve data relevant to an investigation, or data that must be retained for the purposes of litigation.
When we have no ongoing legitimate business need or legal reason to process your personal information, we will either delete or anonymise it or, if this is not possible (e.g., because your personal information has been stored in backup archives), then we will securely store your personal information and isolate it from any further processing until deletion is possible.
Return to top
Your data protection rights
Depending on your location, you may have the following data protection rights.  To exercise any of them see specific instructions below or contact us using the contact details provided under the
“How to contact us”
heading below.
You may
access, correct, update or request deletion
of your personal information by submitting a request at
https://sentry.io/contact/gdpr/
.
You can
object to processing
of your personal information, ask us to
restrict processing
of your personal information or
request portability
of your personal information by submitting a request at
https://sentry.io/contact/gdpr/
.
You have the right to
opt-out of marketing
communications we send you at any time.  You can exercise this right by clicking on the “unsubscribe” or “opt-out” link in the marketing emails we send you or otherwise following the directions in the emails.  You can also make choices about your receipt of marketing communications through the subscription settings in your account.
If we have collected and processed your personal information with your consent, then you can
withdraw your consent
at any time by submitting a request at
https://sentry.io/contact/gdpr/
. Withdrawing your consent will not affect the lawfulness of any processing we conducted prior to your withdrawal, nor will it affect processing of your personal information conducted in reliance on lawful processing grounds other than consent.
You have the
right to complain to a supervisory authority
about our collection and use of your personal information. For more information, please contact your local supervisory authority. (Contact details for supervisory authorities in Europe are available
here
.) Certain supervisory authorities may require that you exhaust our own internal complaints process before looking into your complaint.
We respond to all requests we receive from individuals wishing to exercise their data protection rights in accordance with applicable data protection laws.
Return to top
Children’s privacy
Sentry’s Site and Service are not directed to children under 16. We do not knowingly collect personal information from children under 16. If you become aware that a child has provided us with personal information without parental consent, please contact us using the contact details provided under the
“How to contact us”
heading below. If we become aware that a child under 16 has provided us with personal information without parental consent, we will take steps to remove such information and terminate the child’s account.
If you are 16 or older, but have not reached your jurisdiction’s age of majority (such that you are able to enter a contract), you should only use the Service with permission from your parent or guardian.
Return to top
Third-party websites
The Site and Service may link to third-party websites or platforms from companies other than Sentry, such as to relevant online resources, social media platforms, our partners’ websites, payment processors, and other third-party websites. We are not responsible for the privacy practices or content of such other websites. If you have any questions about how these other websites use your information, you should review their policies and contact them directly. We are not responsible for the actions of third parties.
Return to top
Updates to this Privacy Policy
We may update this policy from time to time in response to changing legal, regulatory, technical, or business developments. When we update this policy, we will take appropriate measures to inform you, consistent with the significance of the changes we make. We will obtain your consent to any material changes to this policy if, and where, required by applicable data protection laws.
You can see when this policy was last updated by checking the date displayed at the top of this policy.
Return to top
How to contact us
If you have any questions or concerns about our use of your personal information, please contact by sending us an email at
compliance@sentry.io
.
The data controller of your personal information is Functional Software, Inc. d/b/a Sentry. Our address is Functional Software, Inc., 45 Fremont Street, 8th Floor, San Francisco, CA 94105.
Return to top
Supplemental notice for California residents
The Supplemental notice for California residents can be found
here
.
Return to top
A peek at your privacy
Here’s a quick look at how Sentry handles your personal information (PII).
×
Who we collect PII from
We collect PII about people browsing our website, users of the Sentry service, prospective customers, and people who otherwise interact with us.
What if my PII is included in data sent to Sentry by a Sentry customer (e.g., someone using Sentry to monitor their app)? In this case you have to contact the Sentry customer (e.g., the maker of the app). We do not control the data that is sent to us through the Sentry service for the purposes of application monitoring.
Am I included?
PII we may collect about you
PII provided by you and related to your
Account, profile, and login
Requests and inquiries
Purchases
PII collected from your device and usage
PII collected from third parties (e.g., social media)
Tell me more
How we use your PII
To operate our site and service
To protect and improve our site and service
To provide customer care and support
To communicate with you
For other purposes (that we inform you of at collection)
How exactly?
Third parties who receive your PII
We may disclose your PII to the following type of recipients:
Subsidiaries and other affiliates
Service providers
Partners (go-to-market, analytics)
Third-party platforms (when you connect them to our service)
Governmental authorities (where necessary)
An actual or potential buyer
What do they do?
We use cookies (but not for advertising)
We do not use advertising or targeting cookies
We use necessary cookies to run and improve our site and service
You can disable cookies but this can impact your use or access to certain parts of our site and service
How can I choose?
Know your rights
You may have the following rights related to your PII:
Access, correct, and update
Object to or restrict processing
Port over
Opt-out of marketing
Be forgotten by Sentry
Withdraw your consent
Complain about us
What can I do?
If you have any questions or concerns about your privacy at Sentry, please email us at
compliance@sentry.io
.
If you are a California resident, see our
Supplemental notice
.
Read the full policy
Sub-policy 1
https://policies.google.com/privacy:
Privacy & Terms
Overview
Privacy Policy
Terms of Service
Technologies
FAQ
Google Account
Privacy Policy
Introduction
Information Google collects
Why Google collects data
Your privacy controls
Sharing your information
Keeping your information secure
Exporting & deleting your information
Retaining your information
Compliance & cooperation with regulators
European requirements
About this policy
Related privacy practices
Data transfer frameworks
Key terms
Partners
Updates
Google Privacy Policy
When you use our services, you’re trusting us with your information. We understand this is a big responsibility and work hard to protect your information and put you in control.
This Privacy Policy is meant to help you understand what information we collect, why we collect it, and how you can update, manage, export, and delete your information.
If European Union or United Kingdom data protection law applies to the processing of your information, you can review the
European requirements section
below to learn more about your rights and Google’s compliance with these laws.
Privacy Checkup
Looking to change your privacy settings?
Take the Privacy Checkup
Effective September 16, 2024
|
Archived versions
|
Download PDF
Contents
Introduction
Information Google collects
Why Google collects data
Your privacy controls
Sharing your information
Keeping your information secure
Exporting & deleting your information
Retaining your information
Compliance & cooperation with regulators
European requirements
About this policy
Related privacy practices
We build a range of services that help millions of people daily to explore and interact with the world in new ways. Our services include:
Google apps, sites, and devices, like Search, YouTube, and Google Home
Platforms like the Chrome browser and Android operating system
Products that are integrated into third-party apps and sites, like ads, analytics, and embedded Google Maps
You can use our services in a variety of ways to manage your privacy. For example, you can sign up for a Google Account if you want to create and manage content like emails and photos, or see more relevant search results. And you can use many Google services when you’re signed out or without creating an account at all, like searching on Google or watching YouTube videos. You can also choose to browse the web in a private mode, like
Chrome Incognito
mode, which helps keep your browsing private from other people who use your device. And across our services, you can adjust your privacy settings to control whether we collect some types of data and how we use it.
To help explain things as clearly as possible, we’ve added examples, explanatory videos, and definitions for
key terms
. And if you have any questions about this Privacy Policy, you can
contact us
.
Information Google collects
We want you to understand the types of information we collect as you use our services
We collect information to provide better services to all our users — from figuring out basic stuff like which language you speak, to more complex things like which
ads you’ll find most useful
,
the people who matter most to you online
, or which YouTube videos you might like. The information Google collects, and how that information is used, depends on how you use our services and how you manage your privacy controls.
When you’re not signed in to a Google Account, we store the information we collect with
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or
device
you’re using. This allows us to do things like maintain your preferences across browsing sessions, such as your preferred language or whether to show you more relevant search results or ads based on your activity.
When you’re signed in, we also collect information that we store with your Google Account, which we treat as
personal information
.
Things you create or provide to us
When you create a Google Account, you provide us with
personal information
that includes your name and a password. You can also choose to add a
phone number
or
payment information
to your account. Even if you aren’t signed in to a Google Account, you might choose to provide us with information — like an email address to communicate with Google or receive updates about our services.
We also collect the content you create, upload, or receive from others when using our services.  This includes things like email you write and receive, photos and videos you save, docs and spreadsheets you create, and comments you make on YouTube videos.
Information we collect as you use our services
Your apps, browsers & devices
We collect information about the apps, browsers, and
devices
you use to access Google services, which helps us provide features like automatic product updates and dimming your screen if your battery runs low.
The information we collect includes
unique identifiers
, browser type and settings, device type and settings, operating system, mobile network information including carrier name and phone number, and application version number. We also collect information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, including
IP address
, crash reports, system activity, and the date, time, and
referrer URL
of your request.
We collect this information when a Google service on your device contacts our servers — for example, when you install an app from the Play Store or when a service checks for automatic updates. If you’re using an
Android device with Google apps
, your device periodically contacts Google servers to provide information about your device and connection to our services. This information includes things like your
device type and carrier name
, crash reports, which apps you've installed, and, depending on your device settings,
other information about how you’re using your Android device
.
Your activity
We collect information about your activity in our services, which we use to do things like recommend a YouTube video you might like. The activity information we collect may include:
Terms you search for
Videos you watch
Views and interactions with content and ads
Voice and audio information
Purchase activity
People with whom you communicate or share content
Activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services
Chrome browsing history you’ve
synced with your Google Account
If you use our
services to make and receive calls or send and receive messages
, we may collect call and message log information like your phone number, calling-party number, receiving-party number, forwarding numbers, sender and recipient email address, time and date of calls and messages, duration of calls, routing information, and types and volumes of calls and messages.
You can visit your Google Account to find and manage activity information that’s saved in your account.
Go to Google Account
Your location information
We collect location information when you use our services, which helps us offer features like driving directions, search results for things near you, and ads based on your location.
Depending on the products you’re using and settings you choose, Google may use different types of location information to help make some services and products you use more helpful. These include:
GPS and other
sensor data from your device
IP address
Activity on Google services
, such as from your searches or
places you label like home or work
Information about things near your device
, such as Wi-Fi access points, cell towers, and Bluetooth-enabled devices
The types of location data we collect and how long we store it depend in part on your device and account settings. For example, you can
turn your Android device’s location on or off
using the device’s settings app. You can also turn on
Location History
if you want to create a private map of where you go with your signed-in devices. And if your Web & App Activity setting is enabled, your searches and other activity from Google services, which may also include location information, is saved to your Google Account. Learn more about
how we use location information
.
In some circumstances, Google also collects information about you from
publicly accessible sources
. For example, if your name appears in your local newspaper, Google’s Search engine may index that article and display it to other people if they search for your name. We may also collect information about you from trusted partners, such as directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, marketing partners who provide us with information about potential customers of our business services, and security partners who provide us with information to
protect against abuse
. We also receive information from partners to provide
advertising and research services on their behalf
.
We use various technologies to collect and store information, including
cookies
,
pixel tags
, local storage, such as
browser web storage
or
application data caches
, databases, and
server logs
.
Why Google collects data
We use data to build better services
We use the information we collect from all our services for the following purposes:
Provide our services
We use your information to
deliver our services
, like processing the terms you search for in order to return results or helping you share content by suggesting recipients from your contacts.
Maintain & improve our services
We also use your information to
ensure our services are working as intended
, such as tracking outages or troubleshooting issues that you report to us. And we use your information to
make improvements
to our services — for example, understanding which search terms are most frequently misspelled helps us improve spell-check features used across our services.
Develop new services
We use the information we collect in existing services to help us develop new ones. For example, understanding how people organized their photos in Picasa, Google’s first photos app, helped us design and launch Google Photos.
Provide personalized services, including content and ads
We use the information we collect to customize our services for you, including providing recommendations, personalized content, and
customized search results
. For example,
Security Checkup
provides security tips adapted to how you use Google products. And, depending on your available settings, Google Play could use information like apps you’ve already installed and videos you’ve watched on YouTube to suggest new apps you might like.
Depending on your settings, we may also show you
personalized ads
based on your interests and activity across Google services. For example, if you search for “mountain bikes,” you may see ads for sports equipment on YouTube. You can control what information we use to show you ads by visiting your ad settings in
My Ad Center
.
We don’t show you personalized ads based on
sensitive categories
, such as race, religion, sexual orientation, or health.
We don’t show you personalized ads based on your content from Drive, Gmail, or Photos.
We don’t share information that personally identifies you with advertisers, such as your name or email, unless you ask us to. For example, if you see an ad for a nearby flower shop and select the “tap to call” button, we’ll connect your call and may share your phone number with the flower shop.
Go to My Ad Center
Measure performance
We use data for analytics and measurement to understand how our services are used. For example, we analyze data about your visits to our sites to do things like optimize product design. And we also use data about the ads you interact with, including your related Google Search activity, to help advertisers understand the performance of their ad campaigns. We use a variety of tools to do this, including Google Analytics. When you visit sites or use apps that use Google Analytics, a Google Analytics customer may choose to enable Google to
link information
about your activity from that site or app with activity from other sites or apps that use our ad services.
Communicate with you
We use information we collect, like your email address, to interact with you directly. For example, we may send you a notification if we detect suspicious activity, like an attempt to sign in to your Google Account from an unusual location. Or we may let you know about upcoming changes or improvements to our services. And if you contact Google, we’ll keep a record of your request in order to help solve any issues you might be facing.
Protect Google, our users, and the public
We use information to help improve the
safety and reliability
of our services. This includes detecting, preventing, and responding to fraud, abuse, security risks, and technical issues that could harm Google, our users, or
the public
.
We use different technologies to process your information for these purposes. We use automated systems that analyze your content to provide you with things like customized search results, personalized ads, or other features tailored to how you use our services. And we analyze your content to help us
detect abuse
such as spam, malware, and illegal content. We also use
algorithms
to recognize patterns in data. For example, Google Translate helps people communicate across languages by detecting common language patterns in phrases you ask it to translate.
We may
use the information we collect
across our services and across your devices for the purposes described above. For example, depending on your available settings, if you watch videos of guitar players on YouTube, you might see an ad for guitar lessons on a site that uses our ad products. Depending on your account settings,
your activity on other sites and apps
may be associated with your personal information in order to improve Google’s services and the ads delivered by Google.
If other users already have your email address or other information that identifies you, we may show them your publicly visible Google Account information, such as your name and photo. This helps people identify an email coming from you, for example.
We’ll ask for your consent before using your information for a purpose that isn’t covered in this Privacy Policy.
Your privacy controls
You have choices regarding the information we collect and how it's used
This section describes key controls for managing your privacy across our services. You can also visit the
Privacy Checkup
, which provides an opportunity to review and adjust important privacy settings. In addition to these tools, we also offer specific privacy settings in our products — you can learn more in our
Product Privacy Guide
.
Go to Privacy Checkup
Managing, reviewing, and updating your information
When you’re signed in, you can always review and update information by visiting the services you use. For example, Photos and Drive are both designed to help you manage specific types of content you’ve saved with Google.
We also built a place for you to review and control information saved in your Google Account. Your
Google Account
includes:
Privacy controls
Activity Controls
Decide what types of activity you’d like saved in your account. For example, if you have YouTube History turned on, the videos you watch and the things you search for are saved in your account so you can get better recommendations and remember where you left off. And if you have Web & App Activity turned on, your searches and activity from other Google services are saved in your account so you can get more personalized experiences like faster searches and more helpful app and content recommendations. Web & App Activity also has a subsetting that lets you control whether
information about your activity on other sites, apps, and devices that use Google services
, such as apps you install and use on Android, is saved in your Google Account and used to improve Google services.
Go to Activity Controls
Ad settings
Manage your preferences about the ads shown to you on Google and on sites and apps that
partner with Google
to show ads. You can modify your interests, choose whether your personal information is used to make ads more relevant to you, and turn on or off certain advertising services.
Go to My Ad Center
About you
Manage personal info in your Google Account and control who can see it across Google services.
Go to About You
Shared endorsements
Choose whether your name and photo appear next to your activity, like reviews and recommendations, that appear in ads.
Go to Shared Endorsements
Sites and apps that use Google services
Manage information that websites and apps using Google services, like Google Analytics, may share with Google when you visit or interact with their services.
Go to How Google uses information from sites or apps that use our services
Ways to review & update your information
My Activity
My Activity allows you to review and control data that’s saved to your Google Account when you’re signed in and using Google services, like searches you’ve done or your visits to Google Play. You can browse by date and by topic, and delete part or all of your activity.
Go to My Activity
Google Dashboard
Google Dashboard allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Go to Dashboard
Your personal information
Manage your contact information, such as your name, email, and phone number.
Go to Personal Info
When you’re signed out, you can manage information associated with your browser or device, including:
Signed-out search personalization:
Choose
whether your search activity is used to offer you more relevant results and recommendations.
YouTube settings: Pause and delete your
YouTube Search History
and your
YouTube Watch History
.
Ad Settings:
Manage
your preferences about the ads shown to you on Google and on sites and apps that partner with Google to show ads.
Exporting, removing & deleting your information
You can export a copy of content in your Google Account if you want to back it up or use it with a service outside of Google.
Export your data
To delete your information, you can:
Delete your content from
specific Google services
Search for and then delete specific items from your account using
My Activity
Delete specific Google products
, including your information associated with those products
Delete your entire Google Account
Delete your information
Inactive Account Manager
allows you to give someone else access to parts of your Google Account in case you’re unexpectedly unable to use your account.
And finally, you can also
request to remove content
from specific Google services based on applicable law and our policies.
There are other ways to control the information Google collects whether or not you’re signed in to a Google Account, including:
Browser settings: For example, you can configure your browser to indicate when Google has set a
cookie
in your browser. You can also configure your browser to block all cookies from a specific domain or all domains. But remember that our services
rely on cookies to function properly
, for things like remembering your language preferences.
Device-level settings: Your device may have controls that determine what information we collect. For example, you can
modify location settings
on your Android device.
Sharing your information
When you share your information
Many of our services let you share information with other people, and you have control over how you share. For example, you can share videos on YouTube publicly or you can decide to keep your videos private. Remember, when you share information publicly, your content may become accessible through search engines, including Google Search.
When you’re signed in and interact with some Google services, like leaving comments on a YouTube video or reviewing an app in Play, your name and photo appear next to your activity. We may also display this information in
ads depending on your Shared endorsements setting
.
When Google shares your information
We do not share your personal information with companies, organizations, or individuals outside of Google except in the following cases:
With your consent
We’ll share personal information outside of Google when we have your consent. For example, if you
use Google Home to make a reservation
through a booking service, we’ll get your permission before sharing your name or phone number with the restaurant. We also provide you with controls to
review and manage third party apps and sites
you have given access to data in your Google Account. We’ll ask for your explicit consent to share any
sensitive personal information
.
With domain administrators
If you’re a student or work for an organization that uses Google services, your
domain administrator
and resellers who manage your account will have access to your Google Account. They may be able to:
Access and retain information stored in your account, like your email
View statistics regarding your account, like how many apps you install
Change your account password
Suspend or terminate your account access
Receive your account information in order to satisfy applicable law, regulation, legal process, or enforceable governmental request
Restrict your ability to delete or edit your information or your privacy settings
For external processing
We provide personal information to our
affiliates
and other trusted businesses or persons to process it for us, based on our instructions and in compliance with our Privacy Policy and any other appropriate confidentiality and security measures. For example, we use service providers to help operate our data centers, deliver our products and services, improve our internal business processes, and offer additional support to customers and users. We also use service providers to help review YouTube video content for public safety and analyze and listen to samples of saved user audio to help improve Google’s audio recognition technologies.
For legal reasons
We will share personal information outside of Google if we have a good-faith belief that disclosure of the information is reasonably necessary to:
Respond to any applicable law, regulation,
legal process, or enforceable governmental request
. We share information about the number and type of requests we receive from governments in our
Transparency Report
.
Enforce applicable Terms of Service, including investigation of potential violations.
Detect, prevent, or otherwise address fraud, security, or technical issues.
Protect against harm to the rights, property or safety of Google, our
users
, or the public.
We may share
non-personally identifiable information
publicly and with our partners — like publishers, advertisers, developers, or rights holders. For example, we share information publicly to
show trends
about the general use of our services. We also allow
specific partners
to collect information from your browser or device for advertising and measurement purposes using their own cookies or similar technologies.
If Google is involved in a merger, acquisition, or sale of assets, we’ll continue to ensure the confidentiality of your personal information and give affected users notice before personal information is transferred or becomes subject to a different privacy policy.
Keeping your information secure
We build security into our services to protect your information
All Google products are built with strong security features that continuously protect your information. The insights we gain from maintaining our services help us detect and automatically block security threats from ever reaching you. And if we do detect something risky that we think you should know about, we’ll notify you and help guide you through steps to stay better protected.
We work hard to protect you and Google from unauthorized access, alteration, disclosure, or destruction of information we hold, including:
We use encryption to keep your data private while in transit
We offer a range of security features, like
Safe Browsing
, Security Checkup, and
2 Step Verification
to help you protect your account
We review our information collection, storage, and processing practices, including physical security measures, to prevent unauthorized access to our systems
We restrict access to personal information to Google employees, contractors, and agents who need that information in order to process it. Anyone with this access is subject to strict contractual confidentiality obligations and may be disciplined or terminated if they fail to meet these obligations.
Exporting & deleting your information
You can export a copy of your information or delete it from your Google Account at any time
You can export a copy of content in your Google Account if you want to back it up or use it with a service outside of Google.
Export your data
To delete your information, you can:
Delete your content from
specific Google services
Search for and then delete specific items from your account using
My Activity
Delete specific Google products
, including your information associated with those products
Delete your entire Google Account
Delete your information
Retaining your information
We retain the data we collect for different periods of time depending on what it is, how we use it, and how you configure your settings:
Some data you can delete whenever you like, such as your
personal info
or the content you create or upload, like
photos
and
documents
. You can also delete
activity information
saved in your account, or
choose to have it deleted automatically
after a set period of time. We’ll keep this data in your Google Account until you remove it or choose to have it removed.
Other data is deleted or anonymized automatically after a set period of time, such as
advertising data
in server logs.
We keep some data until you delete your Google Account, such as information about how often you use our services.
And some data we retain for longer periods of time when necessary for legitimate business or legal purposes, such as security, fraud and abuse prevention, or financial record-keeping.
When you delete data, we follow a deletion process to make sure that your data is safely and completely removed from our servers or retained only in anonymized form. We try to ensure that our services protect information from accidental or malicious deletion. Because of this, there may be delays between when you delete something and when copies are deleted from our active and backup systems.
You can read more about Google’s
data retention periods
, including how long it takes us to delete your information.
Compliance & cooperation with regulators
We regularly review this Privacy Policy and make sure that we process your information in ways that comply with it.
Data transfers
We maintain
servers around the world
and your information may be processed on servers located outside of the country where you live. Data protection laws vary among countries, with some providing more protection than others. Regardless of where your information is processed, we apply the same protections described in this policy. We also comply with certain
legal frameworks
relating to the transfer of data.
When we receive formal written complaints, we respond by contacting the person who made the complaint. We work with the appropriate regulatory authorities, including local data protection authorities, to resolve any complaints regarding the transfer of your data that we cannot resolve with you directly.
European requirements
How to exercise your rights and contact Google
If European Union (EU) or United Kingdom (UK) data protection law applies to the processing of your information, we provide the
controls
described in this policy so you can exercise your rights to request access to, update,
remove
, and restrict the processing of your information. You also have the right to object to the processing of your information or export your information to another service.
If you have additional questions or requests related to your rights,
you can contact Google and our data protection office
. And you can contact your local data protection authority if you have concerns regarding your rights under local law.
Data controller
Unless otherwise stated in a service-specific privacy notice, the
data controller responsible for processing your information
depends on where you are based:
Google Ireland Limited for users of Google services based in the European Economic Area or Switzerland, located at Gordon House, Barrow Street, Dublin 4, Ireland.
Google LLC for users of Google services based in the United Kingdom, located at 1600 Amphitheatre Parkway, Mountain View, California 94043, USA.
Google LLC is the data controller responsible for processing information indexed and displayed in services like
Google Search
and Google Maps regardless of your location. Google Ireland Limited is the data controller responsible for processing information to train Google’s AI models for the purpose of deploying them in services provided by Google Ireland Limited in the European Economic Area or Switzerland.
Legal bases of processing
We process your information for the
purposes
described in this policy, based on the following legal grounds:
We process your data in order to provide a service you’ve asked for under a contract.
We process your data for our legitimate interests and those of
third parties
while applying
appropriate safeguards
that protect your privacy.
We process your data when necessary to protect the vital interests of you or another person.
We process your data when we have a legal obligation to do so.
We ask for your consent to process your data for specific purposes and you have the right to withdraw your consent at any time.
How you use Google services and your privacy settings will determine what data is processed, the purposes for which this data is processed, and the legal bases for processing data. The table below explains these processing purposes, the kinds of data processed, and the legal grounds for processing this data, in more detail.
Why and how we process data
What data is processed
Legal grounds
To provide Google services, products, and features
Examples of processing activities:
We process the terms you search for in order to return results.
We use the IP address assigned to your device to send you the data you requested, such as loading a YouTube video.
We use unique identifiers stored in cookies on your device to help us authenticate you as the person who should have access to your Google Account.
Photos and videos you upload to Google Photos are used to help you create albums, collages, and other creations that you can share.
When you purchase services or physical goods from us, we use your shipping address or delivery instructions for things like processing, fulfilling, and delivering your order, and to provide support in connection with the product or service you purchase.
We process your payment information when you buy extra storage for Google Drive.
We can use contact info (like names and email addresses) of people you interact with in Google products to make it easier to find who you’re looking for when you want to share and communicate with these people in other Google services like Gmail, Photos and Assistant.
A flight confirmation email you receive may be used to create a “check-in” button that appears in your Gmail.
Google also collects information about you from publicly accessible sources. For example, if your name appears in your local newspaper, Google’s Search engine may index that article and display it to other people if they search for your name. Or, if your business’s information appears on a website, we may index and display it on Google services.
We can help you share your location using
Google Location Sharing
, so that others can find you on a map, or know your estimated time of arrival.
As described in the
Sharing your information
section, we’ll share personal information outside of Google when we have your consent, and provide you with controls to
review and manage third party apps and sites
you have given access to data in your Google Account.
The information processed will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
Things you create or provide to us
:
Content you create, upload, or receive (like photos, videos, emails, docs and spreadsheets).
Google Dashboard
allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Personal information that you provide us when you create a Google Account (like your
name
and password,
phone number
, date of birth, or
payment information
).
Information that we collect as you use our services
:
Information about your apps, browsers & devices
, such as
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or device you’re using; and information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, (like IP address, crash reports, and system activity).
Information about your activity in our services
, such as your search terms, Chrome browsing history you’ve synced with your Google Account, your views and interactions with content and ads, and your activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services. You can review and control activity data stored in your Google Account in
My Activity
.
Location information
, such as may be determined by GPS, IP address, and other data from sensors on or around your device, depending in part on your device and account settings.
Information from publicly accessible sources
, such as information that’s publicly available online (like if your name appears in a local newspaper article) or from other public sources.
Information from our trusted partners
, such as from directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, or security partners who provide us with information to protect against abuse.
The legal grounds for processing this information will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
To
perform a contract
with you, such as loading a YouTube video, or processing, fulfilling, and delivering your order when you purchase services or physical goods from us.
When necessary for our
legitimate interests
and those of third parties, including to:
Provide, maintain, and improve services to meet the needs of our users
. For example, using contact info (like names and email addresses) of people you interact with in Google products to make it easier to find who you’re looking for when you want to share and communicate with these people in other Google services like Gmail, Photos and Assistant.
With your
consent
, such as when you choose to share your location with Google Location Sharing.
To maintain and improve Google services, products, and features
To maintain the service so it works as intended, such as debugging the service, tracking issues or troubleshooting issues.
Examples of processing activities:
We continuously monitor our systems to look for problems. And if we find something wrong with a specific feature, reviewing activity information collected before the problem started allows us to fix things more quickly.
We log users’ interactions with buttons on apps like Google Maps and Search to help understand if they are functioning as intended.
To make improvements to Google services and to help improve the safety and reliability of these services, such as to detect, prevent, and respond to fraud, abuse, security risks, and technical issues that could harm the service or users.
Examples of processing activities:
We analyze data about your interactions with our services to help us build better products. For example, it may help us discover that it’s taking people too long to complete a certain task or that they have trouble finishing steps at all. We can then redesign that feature and improve the product for everyone.
We analyze which search terms are most frequently misspelled to help us improve spell-check features used across our services.
We analyze usage of Google Translate to improve translation quality and increase the availability of Translate in more languages.
We analyze queries on Google Shopping in order to determine which products, merchants, and brands are relevant to different kinds of queries.
Google Chrome’s Safe Browsing feature can send information about suspicious websites between a user’s browser and Google's servers to help protect against phishing, malware, malicious ads, and more.
The information processed will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
Things you create or provide to us
:
Content you create, upload, or receive (like photos, videos, emails, docs and spreadsheets).
Google Dashboard
allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Personal information that you provide us when you create a Google Account (like your
name
and password,
phone number
, date of birth, or
payment information
).
Information that we collect as you use our services
:
Information about your apps, browsers & devices
, such as
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or device you’re using; and information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, (like IP address, crash reports, and system activity).
Information about your activity in our services
, such as your search terms, Chrome browsing history you’ve synced with your Google Account, your views and interactions with content and ads, and your activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services. You can review and control activity data stored in your Google Account in
My Activity
.
Location information
, such as may be determined by GPS, IP address, and other data from sensors on or around your device, depending in part on your device and account settings.
Information from publicly accessible sources
, such as information that’s publicly available online (like if your name appears in a local newspaper article) or from other public sources.
Information from our trusted partners
, such as from directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, or security partners who provide us with information to protect against abuse.
The legal grounds for processing this information will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
To
perform a contract
with you, such as using logs of interactions with Google apps to ensure they are working as intended.
When necessary for our
legitimate interests
and those of third parties, including to:
Provide, maintain, and improve services to meet the needs of our users.
For example, analyzing which search terms are most frequently misspelled to help us improve spell-check features used across our services.
Understand how people use our services to ensure and improve the performance of our services.
For example, analyzing usage of Google Translate to improve translation quality and increase the availability of Translate in more languages.
Perform research that improves our services for our users and benefits the public.
For example, improving Google Translate’s translation quality and increasing the availability of Translate in more languages.
To develop new Google services, products and features
Examples of processing activities:
Understanding how people organized their photos in Picasa, Google’s first photos app, helped us design and launch Google Photos.
Understanding how users view and creators generate short-form content helped Google develop new YouTube services.
Depending on your settings, we can save audio recordings of voice interactions with services like Google Search, Assistant, Maps, and Gboard to develop and improve Google audio technologies.
We use publicly available information online or from other public sources to help train new machine learning models and build foundational technologies that power various Google products such as Google Translate, Gemini Apps, and Cloud AI capabilities.
We use your interactions with AI models and technologies like Gemini Apps to develop, train, fine-tune, and improve these models to better handle your requests, and update their classifiers and filters including for safety, language understanding, and factuality.
The information processed will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
Things you create or provide to us
:
Content you create, upload, or receive (like photos, videos, emails, docs and spreadsheets).
Google Dashboard
allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Personal information that you provide us when you create a Google Account (like your
name
and password,
phone number
, date of birth, or
payment information
).
Information that we collect as you use our services
:
Information about your apps, browsers & devices
, such as
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or device you’re using; and information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, (like IP address, crash reports, and system activity).
Information about your activity in our services
, such as your search terms, Chrome browsing history you’ve synced with your Google Account, your views and interactions with content and ads, and your activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services. You can review and control activity data stored in your Google Account in
My Activity
.
Location information
, such as may be determined by GPS, IP address, and other data from sensors on or around your device, depending in part on your device and account settings.
Information from publicly accessible sources
, such as information that’s publicly available online (like if your name appears in a local newspaper article) or from other public sources.
Information from our trusted partners
, such as from directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, or security partners who provide us with information to protect against abuse.
The legal grounds for processing this information will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
When necessary for our
legitimate interests
and those of third parties, including to:
Develop new products and features that are useful for our users.
For example, understanding how people used photos in Picasa, Google’s first photos app, helped us design and launch Google Photos. Or using information that’s publicly available online or from other public sources to help train Google’s AI models and build products and features using these foundational technologies, like Google Translate, Gemini Apps, and Cloud AI capabilities.
Provide, maintain, and improve services to meet the needs of our users.
For example, using information about your activity in our services, like your interactions with Gemini Apps, to train and improve machine learning models, and update their language understanding capabilities, safety classifiers and filters.
With your
consent
, such as saving audio recordings of voice interactions with Google Search, Assistant, Maps, and Gboard to develop and improve Google audio technologies.
To provide personalized services, including content and ads
To customize our services for you, including providing recommendations, personalized content, and customized search results.
Examples of processing activities:
Google’s Security Checkup feature provides security tips adapted to how you use Google products.
Google News may provide you with local news results based on your approximate location.
Google Search may provide you with results based on your approximate location.
Google Assistant can use your contacts to send a message at your request, like “Send a text to John Smith.”
Google Play uses information like apps you’ve already installed and videos you’ve watched on YouTube to suggest new apps you might like.
We may display a Google Doodle on the Search homepage to celebrate an event specific to your country.
Google can show you ads based on the context of the site you’re visiting, like ads for gardening equipment on a page about gardening tips.
When you’re signed in to your Google Account and have the Web & App Activity control enabled, you can get more relevant search results that are based on your previous searches and activity from other Google services.
Depending on your settings, to show you personalized ads based on your interests.
Examples of processing activities:
If you search for “mountain bikes” or watch videos of mountain biking, you may see an ad for sports equipment in your search results or on YouTube.
If you watch videos about baking on YouTube, you may see more ads that relate to baking as you browse the web.
You may also see personalized ads based on information from the advertiser. If you shopped on an advertiser's website, for example, they can use that visit information to show you ads.
The information processed will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
Things you create or provide to us
:
Content you create, upload, or receive (like photos, videos, emails, docs and spreadsheets).
Google Dashboard
allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Personal information that you provide us when you create a Google Account (like your
name
and password,
phone number
, date of birth, or
payment information
).
Information that we collect as you use our services
:
Information about your apps, browsers & devices
, such as
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or device you’re using; and information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, (like IP address, crash reports, and system activity).
Information about your activity in our services
, such as your search terms, Chrome browsing history you’ve synced with your Google Account, your views and interactions with content and ads, and your activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services. You can review and control activity data stored in your Google Account in
My Activity
.
Location information
, such as may be determined by GPS, IP address, and other data from sensors on or around your device, depending in part on your device and account settings.
Information from publicly accessible sources
, such as information that’s publicly available online (like if your name appears in a local newspaper article) or from other public sources.
Information from our trusted partners
, such as from directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, or security partners who provide us with information to protect against abuse.
The legal grounds for processing this information will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
To
perform a contract
with you, such as when Google Assistant uses your contacts to send a message at your request, like “Send a text to John Smith.”
When necessary for our
legitimate interests
and those of third parties, including to:
Customize our services to provide you with a better user experience.
For example, displaying a Google Doodle on the Search homepage to celebrate an event specific to your country, providing security tips adapted to how you use Google products, or tailoring the experience to be age-appropriate, if relevant.
Provide advertising, which allows us to offer many of our services without a fee.
For example, showing you ads based on the context of the site you’re visiting, like ads for gardening equipment on a page about gardening tips. (And when ads are personalized, we ask for your consent.)
With your
consent
, such as recommending apps on Google Play based on videos you’ve watched on YouTube, or showing you personalized ads based on your interests, like ads that relate to baking as you browse the web after watching videos about baking on YouTube.
To measure performance - We use data for analytics and measurement to understand how our services are used.
Examples of processing activities:
We analyze data about your visits to our sites to do things like optimize product design.
We use data about the ads you interact with to help advertisers understand the performance of their ad campaigns.
We use data about which places users click most on Google Earth to understand which features are popular and to identify bugs.
Google Search measures the number of times a particular query has been made, and how users perceive the quality of their search results, to make Search more useful.
Google Translate analyzes data on the number of translations made and the number of times a translation is marked as poor quality, in order to identify potential new features and address issues that users are experiencing on the service.
We may share non-personally identifiable information with our partners like content licensors to accompany royalty payments.
The information processed will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
Things you create or provide to us
:
Content you create, upload, or receive (like photos, videos, emails, docs and spreadsheets).
Google Dashboard
allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Personal information that you provide us when you create a Google Account (like your
name
and password,
phone number
, date of birth, or
payment information
).
Information that we collect as you use our services
:
Information about your apps, browsers & devices
, such as
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or device you’re using; and information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, (like IP address, crash reports, and system activity).
Information about your activity in our services
, such as your search terms, Chrome browsing history you’ve synced with your Google Account, your views and interactions with content and ads, and your activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services. You can review and control activity data stored in your Google Account in
My Activity
.
Location information
, such as may be determined by GPS, IP address, and other data from sensors on or around your device, depending in part on your device and account settings.
Information from publicly accessible sources
, such as information that’s publicly available online (like if your name appears in a local newspaper article) or from other public sources.
Information from our trusted partners
, such as from directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, or security partners who provide us with information to protect against abuse.
The legal grounds for processing this information will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
When necessary for our
legitimate interests
and those of third parties, including to:
Understand how people use our services to ensure and improve the performance of our services.
For example, analyzing usage of Google Translate to improve translation quality and increase the availability of Translate in more languages.
Detect, prevent, or otherwise address fraud, abuse, security, or technical issues with our services.
For example, monitoring usage patterns on Google Earth to identify bugs.
Provide, maintain, and improve services to meet the needs of our users.
For example, analyzing the number of times a translation is marked as poor quality on Google Translate in order to address issues that users are experiencing on the service.
Develop new products and features that are useful for our users.
For example, analyzing data on the number of translations made on Google Translate to identify potential new features.
Fulfill obligations to our partners like developers and rights holders.
For example, providing reporting to content licensors to accompany royalty payments.
To communicate with you - We use information we collect, like your email address, to interact with you directly.
Examples of processing activities:
We may send you a notification if we detect suspicious activity, like an attempt to sign in to your Google Account from an unusual location.
We may let you know about upcoming changes or improvements to our services.
If you contact Google, we’ll keep a record of your request in order to help solve any issues you might be facing.
Google services like Photos may send you marketing communications about its product offerings like printing promotions, depending on your settings.
Google services like YouTube Premium and YouTube Music Premium may notify you about upcoming changes to your subscription.
The information processed will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
Things you create or provide to us
:
Content you create, upload, or receive (like photos, videos, emails, docs and spreadsheets).
Google Dashboard
allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Personal information that you provide us when you create a Google Account (like your
name
and password,
phone number
, date of birth, or
payment information
).
Information that we collect as you use our services
:
Information about your apps, browsers & devices
, such as
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or device you’re using; and information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, (like IP address, crash reports, and system activity).
Information about your activity in our services
, such as your search terms, Chrome browsing history you’ve synced with your Google Account, your views and interactions with content and ads, and your activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services. You can review and control activity data stored in your Google Account in
My Activity
.
Location information
, such as may be determined by GPS, IP address, and other data from sensors on or around your device, depending in part on your device and account settings.
Information from publicly accessible sources
, such as information that’s publicly available online (like if your name appears in a local newspaper article) or from other public sources.
Information from our trusted partners
, such as from directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, or security partners who provide us with information to protect against abuse.
The legal grounds for processing this information will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
To
perform a contract
with you, such as when you contact Google for support or sign up for communications about product updates.
When necessary for our
legitimate interests
and those of third parties, including to:
Provide, maintain, and improve services to meet the needs of our users.
For example, informing you about our services, such as to let you know about upcoming changes or improvements to our services.
Marketing to inform users about our services.
For example, emailing users of Photos about a printing promotion.
To protect Google, our users, and the public
To help improve the safety and reliability of our services, including detecting, preventing, and responding to fraud, abuse, security risks, and technical issues that could harm Google, our users, or the public.
Examples of processing activities:
We collect and analyze IP addresses and cookie data to protect against automated abuse. This abuse takes many forms, such as sending spam to Gmail users, stealing money from advertisers by fraudulently clicking on ads, or censoring content by launching a Distributed Denial of Service (DDoS) attack.
The “last account activity” feature in Gmail can help you find out if and when someone accessed your email without your knowledge. This feature shows you information about recent activity in Gmail, such as the IP addresses that accessed your mail, the associated location, and the date and time of access.
We analyze your content to help us
detect abuse
such as spam, malware, and illegal content.
We process information about requests to remove content from our services under Google's content removal policies or applicable law to assess the request, and to ensure transparency, improve accountability and prevent abuse and fraud in these practices.
To meet any applicable law, regulation, legal process or enforceable governmental request.
Examples of processing activities:
Like other technology and communications companies, Google regularly receives requests from governments and courts around the world to disclose user data. Respect for the privacy and security of data you store with Google underpins our approach to complying with these legal requests. Our legal team reviews each and every request, regardless of type, and we frequently push back when a request appears to be overly broad or doesn’t follow the correct process.
Legal obligations sometimes require us to retain certain information for purposes like financial record-keeping, such as information about a payment you’ve made to Google for tax or accounting purposes.
Various laws and regulations require us to put in place measures to confirm that our users are old enough to use our services. To help determine your age, we process the date of birth you provide. We also process information about your activity in our services, both when you’re signed in to a Google Account or signed out, and use machine learning technology to determine if you are likely over 18. In certain cases, if we cannot confirm that you are old enough to use our services by other means, we can request other information to verify your age, like your government ID, credit card, a photo of you, or your phone number.
The information processed will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
Things you create or provide to us
:
Content you create, upload, or receive (like photos, videos, emails, docs and spreadsheets).
Google Dashboard
allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Personal information that you provide us when you create a Google Account (like your
name
and password,
phone number
, date of birth, or
payment information
).
Information that we collect as you use our services
:
Information about your apps, browsers & devices
, such as
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or device you’re using; and information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, (like IP address, crash reports, and system activity).
Information about your activity in our services
, such as your search terms, Chrome browsing history you’ve synced with your Google Account, your views and interactions with content and ads, and your activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services. You can review and control activity data stored in your Google Account in
My Activity
.
Location information
, such as may be determined by GPS, IP address, and other data from sensors on or around your device, depending in part on your device and account settings.
Information from publicly accessible sources
, such as information that’s publicly available online (like if your name appears in a local newspaper article) or from other public sources.
Information from our trusted partners
, such as from directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, or security partners who provide us with information to protect against abuse.
The legal grounds for processing this information will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
When necessary for our
legitimate interests
and those of third parties, including to:
Enforce legal claims, including investigation of potential violations of applicable Terms of Service.
For example, analyzing content to help us detect abuse such as spam, malware, and illegal content.
Detect, prevent, or otherwise address fraud, abuse, security, or technical issues with our services.
For example, collecting and analyzing IP addresses and cookie data to protect against automated abuse.
Protect against harm to the rights, property or safety of Google, our users, or the public, including disclosing information to government authorities.
For example, responding to legal process or enforceable requests from governments and courts to disclose data, after carefully reviewing each request to make sure it satisfies applicable laws.
Perform research that improves our services for our users and benefits the public.
For example, processing information about
requests to remove content
from our services to educate the public, facilitate research, and provide transparency about these requests.
When necessary to protect the
vital interests
of you or another person. For example, processing data to detect and combat online child sexual abuse.
When we have a
legal obligation
to do so, such as retaining certain information for purposes like financial record-keeping, or processing and retaining information to help ensure that users are old enough to use our services.
Linking your Google services
If you’re a user in the EU, we offer you the choice to keep certain Google services linked. You can learn more about your linked services and how to manage your choices at
About DMA & Your Linked Services
.
About this policy
When this policy applies
This Privacy Policy applies to all of the services offered by Google LLC and its
affiliates
, including YouTube, Android, and services offered on third-party sites, such as advertising services. This Privacy Policy doesn’t apply to services that have separate privacy policies that do not incorporate this Privacy Policy.
This Privacy Policy doesn’t apply to:
The information practices of other companies and organizations that advertise our services
Services offered by other companies or individuals, including products or sites they offer that may include Google services to which the policy applies, or products or sites displayed to you in search results, or linked from our services
Changes to this policy
We change this Privacy Policy from time to time. We will not reduce your rights under this Privacy Policy without your explicit consent. We always indicate the date the last changes were published and we offer access to
archived versions
for your review. If changes are significant, we’ll provide a more prominent notice (including, for certain services, email notification of Privacy Policy changes).
Related privacy practices
Specific Google services
The following privacy notices provide additional information about some Google services:
Payments
Fiber
Gemini Apps
Google Fi
Google Workspace for Education
Read Along
YouTube Kids
Google Accounts Managed with Family Link, for Children under 13 (or applicable age in your country)
Family Link privacy guide for children & teens
Voice and Audio Collection from Children’s Features on the Google Assistant
If you’re a member of an organization that uses Google Workspace or Google Cloud Platform, learn how these services collect and use your personal information in the
Google Cloud Privacy Notice
.
Other useful resources
The following links highlight useful resources for you to learn more about our practices and privacy settings.
Your Google Account
is home to many of the settings you can use to manage your account
Privacy Checkup
guides you through key privacy settings for your Google Account
Google’s safety center
helps you learn more about our built-in security, privacy controls, and tools to help set digital ground rules for your family online
Google’s Teen Privacy Guide
provides answers to some of the top questions we get asked about privacy
Privacy & Terms
provides more context regarding this Privacy Policy and our Terms of Service
Technologies
includes more information about:
How Google uses cookies
Technologies used for
Advertising
How Google uses information from sites or apps that use our services
Key terms
Affiliates
An affiliate is an entity that belongs to the Google group of companies, including the following companies that provide consumer services in the EU: Google Ireland Limited, Google Commerce Ltd, Google Payment Corp, and Google Dialer Inc. Learn more about the
companies providing business services in the EU
.
Algorithm
A process or set of rules followed by a computer in performing problem-solving operations.
Application data cache
An application data cache is a data repository on a device. It can, for example, enable a web application to run without an internet connection and improve the performance of the application by enabling faster loading of content.
Browser web storage
Browser web storage enables websites to store data in a browser on a device. When used in "local storage" mode, it enables data to be stored across sessions. This makes data retrievable even after a browser has been closed and reopened. One technology that facilitates web storage is HTML 5.
Cookies
A cookie is a small file containing a string of characters that is sent to your computer when you visit a website. When you visit the site again, the cookie allows that site to recognize your browser. Cookies may store user preferences and other information. You can configure your browser to refuse all cookies or to indicate when a cookie is being sent. However, some website features or services may not function properly without cookies. Learn more about
how Google uses cookies
and how Google uses data, including cookies,
when you use our partners' sites or apps
.
Device
A device is a computer that can be used to access Google services. For example, desktop computers, tablets, smart speakers, and smartphones are all considered devices.
Google Account
You may access some of our services by signing up for a
Google Account
and providing us with some personal information (typically your name, email address, and a password). This account information is used to authenticate you when you access Google services and protect your account from unauthorized access by others. You can edit or delete your account at any time through your Google Account settings.
IP address
Every device connected to the Internet is assigned a number known as an Internet protocol (IP) address. These numbers are usually assigned in geographic blocks. An IP address can often be used to identify the location from which a device is connecting to the Internet. Learn more about
how we use location information.
Non-personally identifiable information
This is information that is recorded about users so that it no longer reflects or references an individually-identifiable user.
Personal information
This is information that you provide to us which personally identifies you, such as your name, email address, or billing information, or other data that can be reasonably linked to such information by Google, such as information we associate with your Google Account.
Pixel tag
A pixel tag is a type of technology placed on a website or within the body of an email for the purpose of tracking certain activity, such as views of a website or when an email is opened. Pixel tags are often used in combination with cookies.
Referrer URL
A Referrer URL (Uniform Resource Locator) is information transmitted to a destination webpage by a web browser, typically when you click a link to that page. The Referrer URL contains the URL of the last webpage the browser visited.
Sensitive personal information
This is a particular category of personal information relating to topics such as confidential medical facts, racial or ethnic origins, political or religious beliefs, or sexuality.
Server logs
Like most websites, our servers automatically record the page requests made when you visit our sites. These “server logs” typically include your web request, Internet Protocol address, browser type, browser language, the date and time of your request, and one or more cookies that may uniquely identify your browser.
A typical log entry for a search for “cars” looks like this:
123.45.67.89 - 25/Mar/2003 10:15:32 -
http://www.google.com/search?q=cars -
Chrome 112; OS X 10.15.7 -
740674ce2123e969
123.45.67.89
is the Internet Protocol address assigned to the user by the user’s ISP. Depending on the user’s service, a different address may be assigned to the user by their service provider each time they connect to the Internet.
25/Mar/2003 10:15:32
is the date and time of the query.
http://www.google.com/search?q=cars
is the requested URL, including the search query.
Chrome 112; OS X 10.15.7
is the browser and operating system being used.
740674ce2123a969
is the unique cookie ID assigned to this particular computer the first time it visited Google. (Cookies can be deleted by users. If the user has deleted the cookie from the computer since the last time they’ve visited Google, then it will be the unique cookie ID assigned to their device the next time they visit Google from that particular device).
Unique identifiers
A unique identifier is a string of characters that can be used to uniquely identify a browser, app, or device. Different identifiers vary in how permanent they are, whether they can be reset by users, and how they can be accessed.
Unique identifiers can be used for various purposes, including security and fraud detection, syncing services such as your email inbox, remembering your preferences, and providing personalized advertising. For example, unique identifiers stored in cookies help sites display content in your browser in your preferred language. You can configure your browser to refuse all cookies or to indicate when a cookie is being sent. Learn more about
how Google uses cookies
.
On other platforms besides browsers, unique identifiers are used to recognize a specific device or app on that device. For example, a unique identifier such as the Advertising ID is used to provide relevant advertising on Android devices, and can be
managed
in your device’s settings. Unique identifiers may also be incorporated into a device by its manufacturer (sometimes called a universally unique ID or UUID), such as the IMEI-number of a mobile phone. For example, a device’s unique identifier can be used to customize our service to your device or analyze device issues related to our services.
Additional Context
Activity on Google Services
If you’re signed in to your Google Account and have Web & App Activity turned on, your activity data on Google sites, apps, and services may be saved in your account’s Web & App Activity. Some activity may include information about the general area you were in when using the Google service. When you search for something using a general area, your search will use an area of at least 3 sq km, or expand until the area represents the locations of at least 1,000 people. This helps protect your privacy.
In some cases, areas that you have searched from in the past may be used to estimate a relevant location for your search. For example, if you search for coffee shops while in Chelsea, Google might show results for Chelsea in future searches.
You can view and control your Web & App Activity at
My Activity
.
activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services
Websites and apps that integrate Google services like ads and analytics share information with us.
This information is collected regardless of which browser or browser mode you use. For example, although Incognito mode in Chrome can help keep your browsing private from other people who use your device, third party sites and apps that integrate our services may still share information with Google when you visit them.
You can
learn more
about some of the ways you can control the information that is shared when you visit or interact with sites and apps that use Google services.
ads you’ll find most useful
For example, if you watch videos about baking on YouTube, you may see more ads that relate to baking as you browse the web. We also may use your IP address to determine your approximate location, so that we can serve you ads for a nearby pizza delivery service if you search for “pizza.” Learn more
about Google ads
and
why you may see particular ads
.
advertising and research services on their behalf
For example, merchants may upload data from their loyalty-card programs so that they can include loyalty information in search or shopping results, or better understand the performance of their ad campaigns. We only provide aggregated reports to advertisers that don’t reveal information about individual people.
Android device with Google apps
Android devices with Google apps include devices sold by Google or one of our partners and include phones, cameras, vehicles, wearables, and televisions. These devices use Google Play Services and other pre-installed apps that include services like Gmail, Maps, your phone’s camera and phone dialer, text-to-speech conversion, keyboard input, and security features. Learn more about
Google Play Services
.
appropriate safeguards
For example, we may anonymize data, or encrypt data to ensure it can’t be linked to other information about you.
Learn more
benefits the public
For example, we process information about
requests to remove content
from our services to educate the public, facilitate research, and provide transparency about these requests.
customized search results
For example, when you’re signed in to your Google Account and have the Web & App Activity control enabled, you can get more relevant search results that are based on your previous searches and activity from other Google services. You can
learn more here
. You may also get customized search results even when you’re signed out. If you don’t want this level of search customization, you can
search and browse privately
or turn off
signed-out search personalization
.
Customizing our services
For example, we may display a Google Doodle on the Search homepage to celebrate an event specific to your country.
data controller responsible for processing your information
This means the Google affiliate that is responsible for processing your information and for complying with applicable privacy laws.
deliver our services
Examples of how we use your information to deliver our services include:
We use the IP address assigned to your device to send you the data you requested, such as loading a YouTube video
We use unique identifiers stored in cookies on your device to help us authenticate you as the person who should have access to your Google Account
Photos and videos you upload to Google Photos are used to help you create albums, collages, and other creations that you can share.
Learn more
A flight confirmation email you receive may be used to create a “check-in” button that appears in your Gmail
When you purchase services or physical goods from us, you may provide us information like your shipping address or delivery instructions. We use this information for things like processing, fulfilling, and delivering your order, and to provide support in connection with the product or service you purchase.
detect abuse
When we detect spam, malware, illegal content (including
child sexual abuse and exploitation material
), and other forms of abuse on our systems in violation of our policies, we may disable your account or take other appropriate action. In certain circumstances, we may also report the violation to appropriate authorities.
devices
For example, we can use information from your devices to help you decide which device you’d like to use to install an app or view a movie you buy from Google Play. We also use this information to help protect your account.
ensure and improve
For example, we analyze how people interact with advertising to improve the performance of our ads.
ensure our services are working as intended
For example, we continuously monitor our systems to look for problems. And if we find something wrong with a specific feature, reviewing activity information collected before the problem started allows us to fix things more quickly.
Information about things near your device
If you use Google’s Location services on Android, we can improve the performance of apps that rely on your location, like Google Maps. If you use Google’s Location services, your device sends information to Google about its location, sensors (like accelerometer), and nearby cell towers and Wi-Fi access points (like MAC address and signal strength). All these things help to determine your location. You can use your device settings to enable Google Location services.
Learn more
legal process, or enforceable governmental request
Like other technology and communications companies, Google regularly receives requests from governments and courts around the world to disclose user data. Respect for the privacy and security of data you store with Google underpins our approach to complying with these legal requests. Our legal team reviews each and every request, regardless of type, and we frequently push back when a request appears to be overly broad or doesn’t follow the correct process. Learn more in our
Transparency Report
.
make improvements
For example, we use cookies to analyze how people interact with our services. And that analysis can help us build better products. For example, it may help us discover that it’s taking people too long to complete a certain task or that they have trouble finishing steps at all. We can then redesign that feature and improve the product for everyone.
may link information
Google Analytics relies on first-party cookies, which means the cookies are set by the Google Analytics customer. Using our systems, data generated through Google Analytics can be linked by the Google Analytics customer and by Google to third-party cookies that are related to visits to other websites. For example, an advertiser may want to use its Google Analytics data to create more relevant ads, or to further analyze its traffic.
Learn more
our users
For example, to prevent abuse and increase transparency and accountability over our online content moderation practices, Google shares data about requests for removal of content from our services with Lumen, which collects and analyzes these requests to facilitate research to help Internet users understand their rights.
Learn more
.
partner with Google
There are over 2 million non-Google websites and apps that partner with Google to show ads.
Learn more
payment information
For example, if you add a credit card or other payment method to your Google Account, you can use it to buy things across our services, like apps in the Play Store. We may also ask for other information, like a business tax ID, to help process your payment. In some cases, we may also need to verify your identity and may ask you for information to do this.
We may also use payment information to verify that you meet age requirements, if, for example, you enter an incorrect birthday indicating you’re not old enough to have a Google Account.
Learn more
personalized ads
You may also see personalized ads based on information from the advertiser. If you shopped on an advertiser's website, for example, they can use that visit information to show you ads.
Learn more
phone number
If you add your phone number to your account, it can be used for different purposes across Google services, depending on your settings. For example, your phone number can be used to help you access your account if you forget your password, help people find and connect with you, and make the ads you see more relevant to you.
Learn more
Places you label like home and work
You might choose to save places to your Google Account that are important to you, such as your home or your work. If you set your home or work addresses, they can be used to help you do things more easily, such as getting directions or finding results closer to your home or work, and for more useful ads.
You can edit or delete your home or work addresses anytime in your
Google Account.
protect against abuse
For example, information about security threats can help us notify you if we think your account has been compromised (at which point we can help you take steps to protect your account).
publicly accessible sources
For example, we may collect information that’s publicly available online or from other public sources to help train Google’s AI models and build products and features like Google Translate, Gemini Apps, and Cloud AI capabilities. Or, if your business’s information appears on a website, we may index and display it on Google services.
rely on cookies to function properly
For example, we use a cookie called ‘lbcs’ that makes it possible for you to open many Google Docs in one browser. Blocking this cookie would prevent Google Docs from working as expected.
Learn more
remove
For example, as described above, you can
request to remove content
, including content that may contain your information, from specific Google services, based on applicable law (including data protection law) and our policies.
safety and reliability
Some examples of how we use your information to help keep our services safe and reliable include:
Collecting and analyzing IP addresses and cookie data to protect against automated abuse. This abuse takes many forms, such as sending spam to Gmail users, stealing money from advertisers by fraudulently clicking on ads, or censoring content by launching a Distributed Denial of Service (DDoS) attack.
The “last account activity” feature in Gmail can help you find out if and when someone accessed your email without your knowledge. This feature shows you information about recent activity in Gmail, such as the IP addresses that accessed your mail, the associated location, and the date and time of access.
Learn more
sensitive categories
When showing you personalized ads, we use topics that we think might be of interest to you based on your activity. For example, you may see ads for things like "Cooking and Recipes" or "Air Travel.” We don’t use topics or show personalized ads based on sensitive categories like race, religion, sexual orientation, or health. And we
require the same from advertisers
that use our services.
Sensor data from your device
Your device may have sensors that can be used to better understand your location and movement. For example, an accelerometer can be used to determine your speed and a gyroscope to figure out your direction of travel. Learn more about
how we use location information.
servers around the world
For example, we operate data centers located
around the world
to help keep our products continuously available for users.
services to make and receive calls or send and receive messages
Examples of these services include:
Google Voice, for making and receiving calls, sending text messages, and managing voicemail
Google Meet, for making and receiving video calls
Gmail, for sending and receiving emails
Google Chat, for sending and receiving messages
Google Duo, for making and receiving video calls and sending and receiving messages
Google Fi, for a phone plan
show trends
When lots of people start searching for something, it can provide useful information about particular trends at that time. Google Trends samples Google web searches to estimate the popularity of searches over a certain period of time and shares those results publicly in aggregated terms.
Learn more
similar information related to your physical or mental health
If you use fitness products and apps we offer, such as Fitbit, Pixel Watch, Nest or Google Fit, we collect data you provide, like your height and weight. We also collect information from these apps and devices, such as your sleep patterns, heart rate, skin temperature, calories burned, and steps taken.
specific Google services
For example, you can delete
your blog
from Blogger or
a Google Site you own
from Google Sites. You can also delete
reviews
you’ve left on apps, games, and other content in the Play Store.
specific partners
For example, we allow YouTube creators and advertisers to work with measurement companies to learn about the audience of their YouTube videos or ads, using cookies or similar technologies. Another example is merchants on our shopping pages, who use cookies to understand how many different people see their product listings.
Learn more
about these partners and how they use your information.
synced with your Google Account
Your Chrome browsing history is only saved to your account if you’ve enabled Chrome synchronization with your Google Account.
Learn more
the people who matter most to you online
For example, when you type an address in the To, Cc, or Bcc field of an email you're composing, Gmail will suggest addresses based on the people you
contact most frequently
.
the public
For example, we process information about
requests to remove content
from our services under Google's content removal policies or applicable law to assess the request, and to ensure transparency, improve accountability and prevent abuse and fraud in these practices.
third parties
For example, we process your information to report use statistics to rights holders about how their content was used in our services. We may also process your information if people search for your name and we display search results for sites containing publicly available information about you.
use the information we collect across our services
Depending on your available settings, some examples of how we use the information we collect across our services include:
When you’re signed in to your Google Account and search on Google, you can see search results from the public web, along with relevant information from the content you have in other Google products, like Gmail or Google Calendar. This can include things like the status of your upcoming flights, restaurant, and hotel reservations, or your photos.
Learn more
If you have communicated with someone via Gmail and want to add them to a Google Doc or an event in Google Calendar, Google makes it easy to do so by autocompleting their email address when you start to type in their name. This feature makes it easier to share things with people you know.
Learn more
The Google app can use data that you have stored in other Google products to show you personalized content, depending on your settings. For example, if you have searches stored in your Web & App Activity, the Google app can show you news articles and other information about your interests, like sports scores, based on your activity.
If you connect your Google Account to your Google Home, you can manage your information and get things done through the Google Assistant. For example, you can add events to your Google Calendar or get your schedule for the day, ask for status updates on your upcoming flight, or send information like driving directions to your phone.
Learn more
If you’re a user in the EU, the decisions you make on linking services will affect how certain Google services can use the data across our services.
Views and interactions with content and ads
For example, we collect information about views and interactions with ads so we can provide aggregated reports to advertisers, like telling them whether we served their ad on a page and whether the ad was likely seen by a viewer. We may also measure other interactions, such as how you move your mouse over an ad or if you interact with the page on which the ad appears.
Voice and audio information
For example, you can choose whether you want Google to save an audio recording to your Google Account when you interact with Google Search, Assistant, and Maps. When your device detects an audio activation command, like “Hey Google,” Google records your voice and audio plus a few seconds before the activation.
Learn more
your activity on other sites and apps
This activity might come from your use of Google services, like from syncing your account with Chrome or your visits to sites and apps that partner with Google. Many websites and apps partner with Google to improve their content and services. For example, a website might use our advertising services (like AdSense) or analytics tools (like Google Analytics), or it might embed other content (such as videos from YouTube). These services may share information about your activity with Google and, depending on your
account settings
and the products in use (for instance, when a partner uses Google Analytics in conjunction with our advertising services), this data may be associated with your personal information.
Learn more
about how Google uses data when you use our partners' sites or apps.
Google
About Google
Privacy
Terms
Transparency Center
A drop down list to change the language of the site. Each option is a language name. There are 65 language options.
Afrikaans
Bahasa Indonesia
Bahasa Melayu
Català
Čeština
Dansk
Deutsch
Eesti
English
English (India)
English (United Kingdom)
Español
Español (Latinoamérica)
Euskara
Filipino
Français
Français (Canada)
Gaeilge
Galego
Hrvatski
Isizulu
Íslenska
Italiano
Kiswahili
Latviešu
Lietuvių
Magyar
Malti
Nederlands
Norsk
Polski
Português (Brasil)
Português (Portugal)
Română
Slovenčina
Slovenščina
Srpski
Suomi
Svenska
Tiếng Việt
Türkçe
অসমীয়া
Ελληνικά
Български
ଓଡିଆ
Русский
Српски
Українська
‫עברית‬
‫اردو‬
‫العربية‬
‫فارسی‬
አማርኛ
मराठी
हिन्दी
বাংলা
ગુજરાતી
தமிழ்
తెలుగు
ಕನ್ನಡ
മലയാളം
ไทย
한국어
中文 (香港)
中文（简体中文）
中文（繁體中文）
日本語
Main menu
Google apps
Sub-policy 2
https://www.facebook.com/about/privacy/:
Facebook
Email or phone
Password
Forgot account?
Create new account
It looks like you were misusing this feature by going too fast. You’ve been temporarily blocked from using it.
Back
English (US)
Gaeilge
Polski
Lietuvių
Português (Brasil)
Русский
Română
Español
Français (France)
Deutsch
Italiano
Meta © 2025
Allow the use of cookies from Facebook on this browser?
We use cookies and similar technologies to help provide and improve content on
Meta Products
. We also use them to provide a safer experience by using information we receive from cookies on and off Facebook, and to provide and improve Meta Products for people who have an account.
Essential cookies: These cookies are required to use Meta Products and are necessary for our sites to work as intended.
Cookies from other companies: We use these cookies to show you ads off of Meta Products and to provide features like maps and videos on Meta Products. These cookies are optional.
You have control over the optional cookies we use. Learn more about cookies and how we use them, and review or change your choices at any time in our
Cookies Policy
.
About cookies
What are cookies?
Learn more
Why do we use cookies?
Learn more
What are Meta Products?
Learn more
Your cookie choices
Learn more
Cookies from other companies
We use cookies from
other companies
in order to show you ads off of our Products, and provide features like maps, payment services and video.
Choose cookies by category
How we use these cookies
If you allow these cookies
If you don't allow these cookies
Other ways you can control your information
Manage your ad experience in Accounts Center
More information about online advertising
Controlling cookies with browser settings
Allow all cookies
Decline optional cookies
Allow all cookies
Decline optional cookies
Sub-policy 3
https://www.mailjet.de/privacy-policy/:
This app works best with JavaScript enabled.
Sinch Email
Sinch Email
Mailgun
Email on Acid
Über uns
Über uns
Karriere
Hilfe
Hilfe
Dokumentation
Dokumentation
Deutsch
Deutsch
English
Français
Deutsch
Español
Preise
Preise
Produkte
E-Mail-Marketing
Schaffen Sie bleibende Erlebnisse mit unserem E-Mail-Service.
laptop-template-icon
Landingpages
KI-E-Mailgenerator
Layout-Symbol
E-Mail-Editor
Symbol für den Benutzerstapel
Echtzeit-Zusammenarbeit
E-Mail-Automatisierung
Symbol für die Segmentierung
Segmentierung
A/B-Test-Symbol
A/B-Tests
Liniendiagramm Aufwärtstrend-Symbol
Statistiken
API-Symbol
E-Mail-API
Nahtlose Einrichtung und Versand mit unserer RESTful-API.
Schild-Abzeichen-Check-Symbol
E-Mail-Validierungen
SMTP-Relay
Dedizierte IP
Parsing-API
Unternehmen
Erstellen Sie E-Mails mit Leichtigkeit für Ihr Unternehmen.
Mailjet Embedded
Veröffentlichungshinweise: Bleiben Sie über Neuigkeiten zur Mailjet-Plattform auf dem Laufenden.
Mehr lesen
Produkte
E-Mail-Marketing
Schaffen Sie bleibende Erlebnisse mit unserem E-Mail-Service.
laptop-template-icon
Landingpages
KI-E-Mailgenerator
Layout-Symbol
E-Mail-Editor
Symbol für den Benutzerstapel
Echtzeit-Zusammenarbeit
E-Mail-Automatisierung
Symbol für die Segmentierung
Segmentierung
A/B-Test-Symbol
A/B-Tests
Liniendiagramm Aufwärtstrend-Symbol
Statistiken
API-Symbol
E-Mail-API
Nahtlose Einrichtung und Versand mit unserer RESTful-API.
Schild-Abzeichen-Check-Symbol
E-Mail-Validierungen
SMTP-Relay
Dedizierte IP
Parsing-API
Unternehmen
Erstellen Sie E-Mails mit Leichtigkeit für Ihr Unternehmen.
Mailjet Embedded
Veröffentlichungshinweise: Bleiben Sie über Neuigkeiten zur Mailjet-Plattform auf dem Laufenden.
Mehr lesen
Lösungen
Anwendungsfälle
Sehen Sie anhand realer Beispiele, wie Sie Mailjet optimal nutzen können.
Newsletter-Vorlagen
Stift mit Linealsymbol
E-Mail-Personalisierung
Branchen
Spezifische Lösungen, die den Anforderungen Ihrer Branche gerecht werden.
Kleine Unternehmen
Agenturen
Unternehmen
Immobilien
Franchise
Megaphon-Symbol
MarTech
Lösungen
Anwendungsfälle
Sehen Sie anhand realer Beispiele, wie Sie Mailjet optimal nutzen können.
Newsletter-Vorlagen
Stift mit Linealsymbol
E-Mail-Personalisierung
Branchen
Spezifische Lösungen, die den Anforderungen Ihrer Branche gerecht werden.
Kleine Unternehmen
Agenturen
Unternehmen
Immobilien
Franchise
Megaphon-Symbol
MarTech
Ressourcen
Glühbirnen-Symbol
Wissensbibliothek
Erfahren Sie mehr über uns. Senden Sie uns eine E-Mail, um Ihr Growth zu steigern.
Handbuch für E-Mail-Wachstum
Lupensymbol
Forschungsberichte
Leitfäden und E-Books
DSGVO
Glossar
Integrationen
E-Mail-Tools
All-in-One-Plattform zum Erstellen, Versenden und Optimieren von E-Mails.
Demo des E-Mail-Editors
SaaS-Template-Erstellung
MJML
Symbol für Lösungen.
Erfolgsgeschichten
Erfolgsgeschichten Messbare Erfolgsergebnisse von Kunden aus verschiedenen Bereichen.
Fallstudien
Unsere Kunden
Der Weg zu mehr E-Mail-Interaktion 2024
Mehr lesen
Ressourcen
Glühbirnen-Symbol
Wissensbibliothek
Erfahren Sie mehr über uns. Senden Sie uns eine E-Mail, um Ihr Growth zu steigern.
Handbuch für E-Mail-Wachstum
Lupensymbol
Forschungsberichte
Leitfäden und E-Books
DSGVO
Glossar
Integrationen
E-Mail-Tools
All-in-One-Plattform zum Erstellen, Versenden und Optimieren von E-Mails.
Demo des E-Mail-Editors
SaaS-Template-Erstellung
MJML
Symbol für Lösungen.
Erfolgsgeschichten
Erfolgsgeschichten Messbare Erfolgsergebnisse von Kunden aus verschiedenen Bereichen.
Fallstudien
Unsere Kunden
Der Weg zu mehr E-Mail-Interaktion 2024
Mehr lesen
Blog
Blog
Kontakt
Händedruck-Symbol
Sales kontaktieren
Headset-Symbol
Hilfe
Kontakt
Händedruck-Symbol
Sales kontaktieren
Headset-Symbol
Hilfe
Login
Login
Kontakt Sales
Konto erstellen
English
Français
Deutsch
Español
Zurück zum hauptmenü
Preise
Preise
Produkte
E-Mail-Marketing
Schaffen Sie bleibende Erlebnisse mit unserem E-Mail-Service.
laptop-template-icon
Landingpages
KI-E-Mailgenerator
Layout-Symbol
E-Mail-Editor
Symbol für den Benutzerstapel
Echtzeit-Zusammenarbeit
E-Mail-Automatisierung
Symbol für die Segmentierung
Segmentierung
A/B-Test-Symbol
A/B-Tests
Liniendiagramm Aufwärtstrend-Symbol
Statistiken
API-Symbol
E-Mail-API
Nahtlose Einrichtung und Versand mit unserer RESTful-API.
Schild-Abzeichen-Check-Symbol
E-Mail-Validierungen
SMTP-Relay
Dedizierte IP
Parsing-API
Unternehmen
Erstellen Sie E-Mails mit Leichtigkeit für Ihr Unternehmen.
Mailjet Embedded
Veröffentlichungshinweise: Bleiben Sie über Neuigkeiten zur Mailjet-Plattform auf dem Laufenden.
Mehr lesen
Produkte
E-Mail-Marketing
Schaffen Sie bleibende Erlebnisse mit unserem E-Mail-Service.
laptop-template-icon
Landingpages
KI-E-Mailgenerator
Layout-Symbol
E-Mail-Editor
Symbol für den Benutzerstapel
Echtzeit-Zusammenarbeit
E-Mail-Automatisierung
Symbol für die Segmentierung
Segmentierung
A/B-Test-Symbol
A/B-Tests
Liniendiagramm Aufwärtstrend-Symbol
Statistiken
API-Symbol
E-Mail-API
Nahtlose Einrichtung und Versand mit unserer RESTful-API.
Schild-Abzeichen-Check-Symbol
E-Mail-Validierungen
SMTP-Relay
Dedizierte IP
Parsing-API
Unternehmen
Erstellen Sie E-Mails mit Leichtigkeit für Ihr Unternehmen.
Mailjet Embedded
Veröffentlichungshinweise: Bleiben Sie über Neuigkeiten zur Mailjet-Plattform auf dem Laufenden.
Mehr lesen
Lösungen
Anwendungsfälle
Sehen Sie anhand realer Beispiele, wie Sie Mailjet optimal nutzen können.
Newsletter-Vorlagen
Stift mit Linealsymbol
E-Mail-Personalisierung
Branchen
Spezifische Lösungen, die den Anforderungen Ihrer Branche gerecht werden.
Kleine Unternehmen
Agenturen
Unternehmen
Immobilien
Franchise
Megaphon-Symbol
MarTech
Lösungen
Anwendungsfälle
Sehen Sie anhand realer Beispiele, wie Sie Mailjet optimal nutzen können.
Newsletter-Vorlagen
Stift mit Linealsymbol
E-Mail-Personalisierung
Branchen
Spezifische Lösungen, die den Anforderungen Ihrer Branche gerecht werden.
Kleine Unternehmen
Agenturen
Unternehmen
Immobilien
Franchise
Megaphon-Symbol
MarTech
Ressourcen
Glühbirnen-Symbol
Wissensbibliothek
Erfahren Sie mehr über uns. Senden Sie uns eine E-Mail, um Ihr Growth zu steigern.
Handbuch für E-Mail-Wachstum
Lupensymbol
Forschungsberichte
Leitfäden und E-Books
DSGVO
Glossar
Integrationen
E-Mail-Tools
All-in-One-Plattform zum Erstellen, Versenden und Optimieren von E-Mails.
Demo des E-Mail-Editors
SaaS-Template-Erstellung
MJML
Symbol für Lösungen.
Erfolgsgeschichten
Erfolgsgeschichten Messbare Erfolgsergebnisse von Kunden aus verschiedenen Bereichen.
Fallstudien
Unsere Kunden
Der Weg zu mehr E-Mail-Interaktion 2024
Mehr lesen
Ressourcen
Glühbirnen-Symbol
Wissensbibliothek
Erfahren Sie mehr über uns. Senden Sie uns eine E-Mail, um Ihr Growth zu steigern.
Handbuch für E-Mail-Wachstum
Lupensymbol
Forschungsberichte
Leitfäden und E-Books
DSGVO
Glossar
Integrationen
E-Mail-Tools
All-in-One-Plattform zum Erstellen, Versenden und Optimieren von E-Mails.
Demo des E-Mail-Editors
SaaS-Template-Erstellung
MJML
Symbol für Lösungen.
Erfolgsgeschichten
Erfolgsgeschichten Messbare Erfolgsergebnisse von Kunden aus verschiedenen Bereichen.
Fallstudien
Unsere Kunden
Der Weg zu mehr E-Mail-Interaktion 2024
Mehr lesen
Blog
Blog
Kontakt
Händedruck-Symbol
Sales kontaktieren
Headset-Symbol
Hilfe
Kontakt
Händedruck-Symbol
Sales kontaktieren
Headset-Symbol
Hilfe
Sinch Email
Sinch Email
Mailgun
Email on Acid
Über uns
Über uns
Karriere
Hilfe
Hilfe
Dokumentation
Dokumentation
Deutsch
Deutsch
English
Français
Deutsch
Español
Login
Login
Kontakt Sales
Konto erstellen
E-Mail-Marketing
Schaffen Sie bleibende Erlebnisse mit unserem E-Mail-Service.
laptop-template-icon
Landingpages
KI-E-Mailgenerator
Layout-Symbol
E-Mail-Editor
Symbol für den Benutzerstapel
Echtzeit-Zusammenarbeit
E-Mail-Automatisierung
Symbol für die Segmentierung
Segmentierung
A/B-Test-Symbol
A/B-Tests
Liniendiagramm Aufwärtstrend-Symbol
Statistiken
API-Symbol
E-Mail-API
Nahtlose Einrichtung und Versand mit unserer RESTful-API.
Schild-Abzeichen-Check-Symbol
E-Mail-Validierungen
SMTP-Relay
Dedizierte IP
Parsing-API
Unternehmen
Erstellen Sie E-Mails mit Leichtigkeit für Ihr Unternehmen.
Mailjet Embedded
Veröffentlichungshinweise: Bleiben Sie über Neuigkeiten zur Mailjet-Plattform auf dem Laufenden.
Mehr lesen
Anwendungsfälle
Sehen Sie anhand realer Beispiele, wie Sie Mailjet optimal nutzen können.
Newsletter-Vorlagen
Stift mit Linealsymbol
E-Mail-Personalisierung
Branchen
Spezifische Lösungen, die den Anforderungen Ihrer Branche gerecht werden.
Kleine Unternehmen
Agenturen
Unternehmen
Immobilien
Franchise
Megaphon-Symbol
MarTech
Glühbirnen-Symbol
Wissensbibliothek
Erfahren Sie mehr über uns. Senden Sie uns eine E-Mail, um Ihr Growth zu steigern.
Handbuch für E-Mail-Wachstum
Lupensymbol
Forschungsberichte
Leitfäden und E-Books
DSGVO
Glossar
Integrationen
E-Mail-Tools
All-in-One-Plattform zum Erstellen, Versenden und Optimieren von E-Mails.
Demo des E-Mail-Editors
SaaS-Template-Erstellung
MJML
Symbol für Lösungen.
Erfolgsgeschichten
Erfolgsgeschichten Messbare Erfolgsergebnisse von Kunden aus verschiedenen Bereichen.
Fallstudien
Unsere Kunden
Der Weg zu mehr E-Mail-Interaktion 2024
Mehr lesen
Händedruck-Symbol
Sales kontaktieren
Headset-Symbol
Hilfe
Mailgun
Email on Acid
Karriere
Ihre Privatsphäre und der Schutz Ihrer Daten haben bei uns höchste Priorität. In dieser Datenschutzerklärung beschreiben wir, wie wir Daten über Sie und Ihre Nutzung unserer Dienste, Plattform und Website sammeln und verwenden. Falls Sie bei uns Kunde sind, sollten Sie neben dieser Datenschutzerklärung auch unsere
Nutzungsbedingungen lesen
.
Wir sind Sinch Email, ein Unternehmen der Sinch Group, bestehend aus den Marken Mailgun, Mailgun Optimize, Mailjet und Email on Acid. Die in dieser Richtlinie erläuterte Verarbeitung kann von Sinch Email oder anderen Datenverantwortlichen in der Sinch Group durchgeführt werden.
Bei der Erfassung von Daten unserer Kunden oder Websitebesucher gelten wir gemäß den Datenschutzgesetzen der Europäischen Union („EU“) als „Verantwortlicher für die Datenverarbeitung“. Das bedeutet, dass wir dafür verantwortlich sind, zu entscheiden, wie wir Ihre personenbezogenen Daten aufbewahren und nutzen.
Wir erfassen Daten über Sie, wenn Sie ein Registrierungs- oder Kontaktformular auf unserer Website ausfüllen oder uns eine E-Mail senden. Wir erhalten Ihre personenbezogenen Daten u. U. auch von Dritten, wenn Sie bei diesen Ihr Interesse an unseren Diensten bekunden.
Wir erfassen Daten auf automatisierte Weise. Wenn Sie unsere Webseite besuchen, Ihnen eine unserer Werbeanzeigen auf der Webseite eines Dritten angezeigt wird oder Sie unsere Marketing-Newsletter lesen, erheben wir mithilfe von Cookies, Web-Beacons und ähnlichen Technologien automatisch Daten über Sie. Dabei handelt es sich um kleine Dateien, die mit Informationen verknüpft sind, die Ihr Browser oder unsere Server im Rahmen Ihrer Nutzung der Website und der Dienste speichern, um z. B. Ihre Anmeldesitzungen zwischen Besuchen, Ihre Anzeigeeinstellungen zu speichern und Ihre Nutzung der Website nachzuverfolgen. Weitere Informationen über unsere Verwendung von Cookies finden Sie in unserem
Cookie-Hinweis
.
Wir erfassen zwei Arten von Daten über Sie: personenbezogene Daten und nicht-personenbezogene Daten.
Personenbezogene Daten. Durch diese Daten wissen wir, wer Sie sind. Hierzu gehören die Daten, die Sie angeben, wenn Sie sich bei unserer Plattform registrieren (z. B. Ihr Name,
Unternehmensname, E-Mail-Adresse, Postanschrift sowie andere Kontaktinformationen, die Sie uns übermitteln, der Name Ihrer Domain und Ihre Kreditkartendaten). Bei Ihren Anmeldedaten handelt es sich ebenfalls um personenbezogene Daten. In diese Kategorie fallen auch mit Ihrer Identität verbundene Informationen, die Sie uns auf anderen Wegen übermitteln, beispielsweise mittels einer E-Mail an unser Supportteam.
Darüber hinaus und im Kontext der Nutzung unserer Dienste – d. h. der Erstellung und dem Versand von E-Mails – haben wir Zugriff auf die in der Betreffzeile und dem Textkörper angegebenen Inhalte sowie auf die Kontakte, an die Sie über unsere Dienste E-Mails versenden.
Sie sollten keine vertraulichen personenbezogenen Daten wie Identifikationsnummern angeben (z. B. Sozialversicherungs-, Führerschein- oder Steueridentifikationsnummern), vollständige Kreditkarten- oder persönliche Bankkartennummern, medizinische Angaben oder solche im Zusammenhang mit Pflege- oder Behandlungsanträgen von Privatpersonen.
Nicht-personenbezogene Daten. Diese Daten ermöglichen es uns nicht, Ihre Identität zu bestimmen. Daten dieser Art ergeben sich in der Regel aus Ihrer Nutzung unserer Dienste nach der Registrierung auf unserer Website. Zu den nicht-personenbezogenen Daten gehören Informationen, die ursprünglich persönliche Daten enthielten, anhand derer Sie hätten potenziell identifiziert werden können, die wir jedoch verändert haben (z. B. durch Datenaggregation).
Beim Besuch unserer Website erfassen wir personenbezogene und nicht-personenbezogene Daten, um mit Ihnen in Kontakt zu treten und Live-Chat-Gespräche auf der Website zu ermöglichen.
Falls Sie bei uns Kunde sind, verwenden wir die über Sie erfassten Daten, um Ihnen unsere Dienstleistungen bereitzustellen. Diesbezüglich verwenden wir Ihre Daten für folgende Zwecke:
Badge Check
um Ihr Konto (und Unterkonten) zu erstellen und zu verwalten und den Zugang dazu zu kontrollieren;
Badge Check
Bereitstellung unserer Dienste und Erleichterung der Plattformnutzung, einschließlich Identitätsüberprüfung und E-Mail-Validierung;
Badge Check
Bereitstellung von Echtzeitprotokollen über Ihre Nutzung der Plattform;
Badge Check
Beantwortung von Supportanfragen, Anfragen nach Verkaufsinformationen oder ähnlichen Mitteilungen;
Badge Check
Mitteilungen über unsere Dienstleistungen (z. B. durch Newsletter, Marketing-E-Mails, Ankündigungen oder Sonderangebote);
Badge Check
Rechnungsstellungs- und Inkassozwecke, falls Sie eines unserer kostenpflichtigen Abonnements abgeschlossen haben;
Badge Check
zur Untersuchung, Verhinderung und Bekämpfung von Betrug und bei Verstößen gegen unsere Nutzungsbedingungen;
Badge Check
Bereitstellung von Drittanbieterdienstleistungen an uns;
Badge Check
für Kunden, die zugewiesene dedizierte IP-Adressen beantragen, zum Zwecke der Zuweisung der dedizierten IP-Adresse an diesen Kunden;
Badge Check
Personalisierung, Bewertung und Verbesserung unserer Dienste, Inhalte und Materialien;
Badge Check
Einhaltung der jeweils für uns geltenden Gesetze.
Wir verwenden Ihre nicht-personenbezogenen Daten u. a. zur Verbesserung unserer Dienste, z. B. durch Webanalysen oder zur Fehlerbehebung. Wir verwenden außerdem u. U. aggregierte oder anonymisierte Daten, um unsere Dienste zu bewerben, z. .B in Form von Nutzungsstatistiken.
Wir erfassen Ihre personenbezogenen Daten, da wir sie zur Abwicklung eines mit Ihnen unterzeichneten Vertrags benötigen oder weil Sie Schritte in Richtung eines Vertragsabschlusses mit uns unternommen haben (z. B. ein Kontaktformular ausgefüllt haben, um mehr über unsere Dienste zu erfahren oder ein Konto auf unserer Webseite erstellt haben). Darüber hinaus erfassen wir personenbezogene Daten basierend auf Ihrer Zustimmung zum jeweiligen Zweck (z. B. zur Pflege und zum Ausbau unserer Geschäftsbeziehung (unter Verwendung eines Kundenbeziehungsmanagementsystems) und zur Durchführung von Bonitätsprüfungen oder zur Überprüfung von Daten und Zahlungsangaben).
Außer in den hier aufgeführten Fällen und sofern in einer gültigen Vereinbarung oder in unseren Nutzungsbedingungen nichts Anderes festgelegt ist, geben wir Ihre personenbezogenen Daten nicht an Dritte weiter. Die Weitergabe Ihrer Daten an Dritte erfolgt nur in einem zur Bereitstellung unserer Dienstleistungen absolut nötigen Umfang. Und wir garantieren Ihnen, dass die Zusammenarbeit mit diesen Drittpartnern durch Datenschutzanforderungen geregelt ist (darunter Standardvertragsklauseln sowie technische und organisatorische Maßnahmen).
U. U. übermitteln wir Ihre personenbezogenen Daten im gesetzlich vorgeschriebenen oder erlaubten Rahmen sowie zur optimalen Bereitstellung unserer Dienstleistungen auch an Dritte, wie im Nachfolgenden beschrieben.
Hosting-Dienste:
Wir hosten die Website und betreiben die Plattform mithilfe von Drittanbietern, darunter Google Cloud Platform, AWS®, MacStadium und Rackspace®. Ihre
Plattform wird in deren Rechenzentren in den Vereinigten Staaten oder in Europa gehostet, je nachdem, wo Sie sich für die Bereitstellung unserer Dienste entschieden haben (es finden keine Übertragungen zwischen diesen separaten Rechenzentrumsstandorten statt).
Zahlungsanbieter:
Wir nutzen Stripe®, Chargify, Aria und Authorize.net zur Abwicklung von Abonnementzahlungen und stellen diesen Drittanbietern daher die zur Belastung Ihrer Kreditkarte und zur Aufrechterhaltung des Zahlungsauftrags erforderlichen Informationen, wie gesetzlich geregelt, zur Verfügung.
Websitefunktionen und Optimierung:
Wir können Dienste von Drittanbietern nutzen, die entweder in unsere Website eingebettet sind (wie Drift, Optimizely, VWO, Segment™, Split.io und Google® Analytics) oder außerhalb davon (wie GitHub®, Unbounce und Twitter®), um mit Ihnen zu kommunizieren oder die Funktionsweise der Website, unserer Dienste und Produkte zu verbessern.
Interaktion mit Kunden:
Wir nutzen Drittanbieter und Plattformen (wie z. B. Gainsight, Customer.io, Looker, Snowflake, Salesforce, Uservoice, Zapier und Zendesk) für die Einbindung von Kunden, Kundenchats, Produktfeedback und Kunden-Support-Ticketing.
IP-Adressen:
Wir können Ihre Kontaktinformationen an ARIN (American Registry for Internet Numbers) weitergeben, um Ihren Antrag auf Neuzuweisung der dedizierten IP-Adressen zu erfüllen.
Wir stellen diesen Drittanbietern nur die Daten zur Verfügung, die für die Erbringung ihrer Dienstleistungen erforderlich sind. Jegliche Daten, die Sie Ihrerseits diesen Dienstleistern bereitstellen, werden gemäß deren jeweiligen Datenschutzerklärungen und -praktiken verarbeitet.
Wir werden Ihre Kontakte in keinem Fall an Dritte verkaufen, weitergeben oder verleihen oder sie für andere Zwecke als die in dieser Datenschutzerklärung festgelegten verwenden.
In bestimmten Situationen kann es erforderlich sein, dass wir personenbezogene Daten auf rechtmäßige Anfragen von Behörden oder Regulierungsstellen hin offenlegen müssen, z. B. zur Erfüllung von Strafverfolgungsanforderungen, im Falle einer gerichtlichen Anordnung, Vorladung vor Gericht oder ähnlichen Aufforderung durch eine Regierung oder die Justiz oder zur Umsetzung oder Rechtfertigung einer Rechtsanwendung.
Unser US-amerikanisches Unternehmen, Mailgun Technologies, Inc., unterliegt den Ermittlungs- und Durchsetzungsbefugnissen der Bundeshandelskommission (Federal Trade Commission).
Darüber hinaus geben wir Informationen an Dritte in den folgenden Fällen weiter: Umstrukturierung, Fusion, Verkauf, Joint Venture, Abtretung, Übertragung oder eine sonstige Verfügung über Teile oder das gesamte Unternehmen, Vermögenswerte oder Aktien (einschließlich Konkurs oder ähnlicher Verfahren).
Wir speichern Ihre personenbezogenen Daten so lange, wie diese benötigt werden, um Ihnen unsere Dienste zur Verfügung zu stellen (sofern gesetzlich nicht anders vorgeschrieben).
Wenn sie möchten, dass wir sämtliche beschriebenen Verwendungen Ihrer personenbezogenen Daten einstellen, können Sie Ihr Konto jederzeit über die Kontoeinstellungen in Ihrem Dashboard löschen. Dadurch werden Ihre personenbezogenen Daten aus unseren Aufzeichnungen gelöscht (innerhalb von höchstens neunzig (90) Tagen), und wir werden sie nicht weiter verwenden. Wir bewahren jedoch möglicherweise Sicherungskopien Ihrer personenbezogenen Daten für gesetzliche Aufbewahrungszwecke und/oder eigene berechtigte Geschäftszwecke auf.
Sinch Email hält die europäische Datenschutz-Grundverordnung 2016/679 (DSGVO) sowie alle weiteren geltenden Datenschutzbestimmungen ein. Für die Übertragung jeglicher personenbezogener Daten aus der EU und dem Europäischen Wirtschaftsraum halten wir uns wo immer nötig an EU-Standardklauseln, garantieren zusätzliche Schutzmaßnahmen wie Datenverschlüsselung und -sparsamkeit, sowie die Durchführung von Folgenabschätzungen, Audits (Prüfungen) und Kontrollen bei unseren wichtigen Unterverarbeitern.
Sinch Email hält sich an das EU-US Data Privacy Framework (EU-US DPF) und die UK Extension to the EU-US DPF, wie vom US Department of Commerce dargelegt. Genauer gesagt hat Mailgun Technologies, Inc., unser US-amerikanisches Konzernunternehmen, gegenüber dem US-Handelsministerium bestätigt, dass es die EU-US Data Privacy Framework Principles (EU-US DPF Principles) in Bezug auf die Verarbeitung personenbezogener Daten, die es aus der Europäischen Union und dem Vereinigten Königreich erhalten hat, unter Berufung auf die EU-US DPF und die UK Extension der EU-US DPF einhält. Im Falle eines Widerspruchs zwischen den Bestimmungen dieser Datenschutzrichtlinie und den EU-US DPF-Grundsätzen sind die Grundsätze maßgebend. Um mehr über das Data Privacy Framework (DPF) Programm zu erfahren und um unsere Zertifizierung zu sehen, besuchen Sie bitte
https://www.dataprivacyframework.gov/
. Sinch Email bleibt verantwortlich für alle personenbezogenen Daten, die wir im Rahmen des EU-US DPF erhalten und die wir anschließend an Dritte weitergeben, die als Vertreter in unserem Namen handeln, wenn sie personenbezogene Daten in einer Weise verarbeiten, die nicht mit den DPF-Prinzipien vereinbar ist, es sei denn, wir beweisen, dass wir nicht für das Ereignis verantwortlich sind, das den Schaden verursacht hat.
In Übereinstimmung mit den Datenschutzgesetzen haben Sie das Recht auf:
Badge Check
Beantragung des Zugangs zu Ihren persönlichen Daten. Sie erhalten eine Kopie der personenbezogenen Daten, die wir über Sie gespeichert haben, und können überprüfen, ob wir sie rechtmäßig verarbeiten.
Badge Check
Beantragung der Berichtigung der personenbezogenen Daten, die wir über Sie gespeichert haben. Auf diese Weise können Sie alle unvollständigen oder unrichtigen Informationen, die wir über Sie gespeichert haben, korrigieren lassen.
Badge Check
Beantragung der Löschung Ihrer personenbezogenen Daten. Auf diese Weise können Sie von uns die Löschung oder Entfernung personenbezogener Daten verlangen, wenn es keinen rechtmäßigen Grund für die weitere Verarbeitung dieser Daten gibt. Sie haben auch das Recht, von uns die Löschung oder Entfernung Ihrer personenbezogenen Daten zu verlangen, wenn Sie von Ihrem Widerspruchsrecht gegen die Verarbeitung Gebrauch gemacht haben (siehe unten).
Badge Check
Widerrufung Ihrer Zustimmung und Abmeldung von unseren Nachrichten. Wir werden Ihre Abmeldung innerhalb von 14 Tagen berücksichtigen. Bitte beachten Sie, dass Sie dienstbezogene Nachrichten nicht abbestellen können, wenn Sie Kunde bei uns bleiben.
Badge Check
Einlegung von Widerspruch gegen die Verarbeitung Ihrer personenbezogenen Daten ein, z. B. wenn wir uns auf ein berechtigtes Interesse (oder das eines Dritten) berufen und es etwas in Ihrer besonderen Situation gibt, das Sie veranlasst, der Verarbeitung auf dieser Grundlage zu widersprechen.
Badge Check
Beantragung der Einschränkung der Verarbeitung Ihrer personenbezogenen Daten. Auf diese Weise können Sie uns bitten, die Verarbeitung der Sie betreffenden personenbezogenen Daten auszusetzen, beispielsweise wenn Sie möchten, dass wir die Richtigkeit der Daten oder den Grund für ihre Verarbeitung überprüfen.
Badge Check
Übermittlungsanfrage Ihrer personenbezogenen Daten (Recht auf Datenübertragbarkeit).
Möchten Sie eines der obigen Rechte ausüben, schicken Sie bitte eine E-Mail an unser Datenschutz-Team an
privacy@mailgun.com
. Sinch Email verpflichtet sich, Beschwerden über die Erfassung und Nutzung Ihrer personenbezogenen Daten von unserer Seite zu klären. EU-Bürger sollten sich mit Anfragen oder Beschwerden zunächst an unseren Datenschutzbeauftragten wenden
privacy@mailgun.com
.
Sinch Email hat sich außerdem verpflichtet, in Übereinstimmung mit der EU-US-DPF und der britischen Erweiterung der EU-US-DPF mit dem von den EU-Datenschutzbehörden (DPA) und dem britischen Information Commissioner's Office (ICO) eingerichteten Gremium zusammenzuarbeiten und dessen Ratschläge in Bezug auf ungelöste Beschwerden über personenbezogene Daten, die unter Berufung auf die EU-US-DPF und die britische Erweiterung der EU-US-DPF eingehen,zu befolgen.
Sie haben die Möglichkeit, unter bestimmten Bedingungen ein verbindliches Schiedsverfahren gemäß dem Anhang zu den DPF-Grundsätzen der EU und der USA in Anspruch zu nehmen. Wenn Sie sich in der EU befinden, haben Sie auch das Recht, eine Beschwerde bei Ihrer Datenschutzbehörde einzureichen.
Sie können unsere Datenverarbeitungsvereinbarung unterzeichnen, in der alle wichtigen von uns eingesetzten Unterauftragsverarbeiter und die Maßnahmen zur Gewährleistung eines angemessenen Datenschutzes aufgeführt sind.
Die Sicherheit und Integrität Ihrer personenbezogenen Daten ist uns sehr wichtig. Wir befolgen allgemein anerkannte Standards zum Schutz von personenbezogenen Daten, die an uns übermittelt werden, sowohl während der Übermittlung als auch nach deren Erhalt. Wir stellen sicher, dass geeignete elektronische, physische und verwaltungstechnische Verfahren zur Anwendung kommen, um alle verarbeiteten Daten zu schützen und aufzubewahren. Unsere Infrastruktur befindet sich in erstklassigen Rechenzentren. Jeder dieser Standorte unterliegt strengen physischen und verfahrenstechnischen Kontrollen, die regelmäßig geprüft werden. Unsere Anwendungen werden regelmäßig auf Schwachstellen hin überprüft und es wird ein jährlicher Penetrationstest durchgeführt. Bei sämtlichen Mitarbeitern wird eine gründliche Hintergrundprüfung durchgeführt (falls zulässig) und sie unterzeichnen bei ihrer Einstellung eine Verschwiegenheitserklärung.
Bitte beachten Sie jedoch, dass einige Teile der Dienste öffentlich sind und dass es sich bei E-Mails grundsätzlich nicht um ein zuverlässiges Mittel zur privaten Kommunikation handelt. Falls Sie personenbezogene Daten freiwillig in einem öffentlichen Bereich der Website bereitstellen, können diese Daten von Dritten online eingesehen und erfasst werden. Falls Sie diese Daten nicht öffentlich zugänglich machen wollen, sollten Sie diese auch nicht veröffentlichen.
Die in dieser Bekanntmachung enthaltenen Klauseln können Modifikationen unterliegen, um neu auftretenden Problemen oder Änderungen Rechnung zu tragen. Bevor wesentliche Änderungen in Kraft treten, informieren wir Sie möglicherweise im Voraus (beispielsweise per E-Mail oder über ein Banner auf der Website). Alle Änderungen, die wir vornehmen, werden 30 Tage nach dem
angegebenen Aktualisierungsdatum
wirksam. Wenn Sie mit den Änderungen nicht einverstanden sind, können Sie Ihr Konto bei uns vor dem neuen Datum des Inkrafttretens auflösen, um Ihr Konto und die damit verbundenen Informationen aus unseren Unterlagen zu löschen.
Zuletzt überarbeitet und aktualisiert am 15.01.2025. Um ein Änderungsprotokoll und die vorherige Version einzusehen
klicken Sie hier
.
deliv-team@mailjet.company
outbound-sales@mailjet.company
spamtrapmonitoring@mailjet.company
pop@mailjet.top
manu@mailjet.top
tonyparker@mailjet.top
Sub-policy 4
https://www.cj.com/legal/privacy-policy-services-de?hsLang=en:
Careers
Contact Us
Login
Login
Get Started
Platform
Our Approach and Tech Innovations
Our futureproof platform adapts to leverage new opportunities in the industry.
Integration Partners and Tools
We unlock continuing innovation by partnering with leaders in tech and data.
Solutions
CJ Affiliate
Grow one connection at a time, at scale.
CJ Influence
Make your message count for more.
CJ Leads
Find and reach your missing markets.
CJ Marketplaces
Amplify your Amazon success, your way.
Partnerships
Advertiser
Achieve sustained growth and reach your target audience.
Publisher
Connect with the brands you know and love all in one place.
Agency
Working hand in hand to help drive client growth, advocacy, and retention.
Influencer
Earn seamlessly while promoting the products and services you enjoy.
Fintech Publishers
Begin partnering with renowned Fintech brands.
Resources
Case Studies
Brand success with our powerful solutions.
What is Affiliate?
Industry insights from decades of leadership.
CJU
Our annual client conference welcomes the industry to Santa Barbara.
Blog
Trends and best practices in affiliate and performance marketing.
Events
Where we’ll be. Join us!
About Us
DATENSCHUTZRICHTLINIE DER COMMISSION JUNCTION (CJ) FÜR DIENSTLEISTUNGEN
Zuletzt geändert: 30/07/2021
CJ ist eine Affiliate-Marketing Gesellschaft. Wir gehören der Publicis Groupe an, deren Hauptsitz in Frankreich liegt, die jedoch über Niederlassungen auf der ganzen Welt verfügt. Unsere Werbedienstleistungen helfen Online-Publishern und Werbetreibenden dabei, Kunden zu finden und das Internet kostenlos zu halten. Wir empfehlen Ihnen, die Datenschutzrichtlinie vollständig durchzulesen, Sie können jedoch auch mithilfe der untenstehenden Tabelle auf ein bestimmtes Thema zugreifen.
-
Verpflichtung zum Schutz Personenbezogener Daten und Geltungsbereich dieser Datenschutzrichtlinie
-
Was macht CJ?
-
Cookies und Gerätezugriff
-
Welche Personenbezogenen Daten verarbeiten wir?
-
Wie und auf welcher Rechtsgrundlage Personenbezogene Daten verwendet werden
-
An wen geben wir Personenbezogene Daten weiter?
-
Wie lange bewahren wir Personenbezogene Daten auf?
-
Ihre Rechte
-
Internationale Übermittlung
-
Sicherheit
-
Kontakt zu uns
-
Änderungen dieser Datenschutzrichtlinie
-
In dieser Datenschutzrichtlinie verwendete Begriffsbestimmungen
In dieser Datenschutzrichtlinie verwenden wir verschiedene durch Großschreibung hervorgehobene Begriffe. Die diesbezüglichen Begriffsbestimmungen finden Sie
hier
.
Verpflichtung zum Schutz Personenbezogener Daten und Geltungsbereich dieser Datenschutzrichtlinie
Diese Datenschutzrichtlinie („
Datenschutzrichtlinie
“) beschreibt, wie Personenbezogene Daten von CJ im Zuge der Erbringung unserer Dienste erfasst und verwendet werden. Der Schutz Ihrer Daten ist für uns eine Priorität, und wir möchten, dass Sie verstehen, in welcher Weise wir Personenbezogene Daten verarbeiten und über welche Wahlmöglichkeiten Sie diesbezüglich verfügen. Wir haben Maßnahmen ergriffen, um Ihnen diese Informationen so klar und einfach wie möglich zur Verfügung zu stellen. Sie können uns aber jederzeit unter unseren Kontaktdaten erreichen, sollten noch Fragen bestehen.
Wir sind der Ansicht, dass Datenschutz für das Wachstum und den Erfolg des Internets von wesentlicher Bedeutung ist, und dass eine großartige Online-Erfahrung den Nutzern erhebliche Vorteile bringen kann, wenn sie ordnungsgemäß durchgeführt wird. Entsprechend diesen Überzeugungen schafft CJ auf revolutionäre Weise Ergebnisse für Publisher und Werbetreibende, ohne die Privatsphäre oder den Datenschutz der Nutzer zu beeinträchtigen.
Indem Sie sich mit dieser Datenschutzrichtlinie vertraut machen, haben Sie den ersten Schritt getan, um zu verstehen, wie Werbeunternehmen wie das unsere dazu beitragen, dass das Internet ein vielfältiges Ökosystem kostenloser Inhalte bleiben und gleichzeitig ein besseres digitales Browsing-Erlebnis bieten kann.
Was macht CJ?
Wenn ein Verbraucher Websites und mobile Anwendungen besucht, arbeiten fast immer Dritte im Hintergrund, um dazu beizutragen, ein großartiges digitales Erlebnis zu bieten. CJ ist eine dieser Gesellschaften. Wir stellen das Affiliate-Marketing bereit, das dafür sorgt, dass Ihre bevorzugten Webblogs kostenlos bleiben, Ihre Lieblings-Stores weiter im Geschäft sind und Ihre Werbeerfahrung ausschlaggebender wird. Bitte sehen Sie sich
dieses Video
an, um mehr über CJ und Affiliate-Marketing zu erfahren.
Beim Affiliate-Marketing verdient ein Publisher (z. B. ein Blog oder eine Nachrichten-Website) durch Werbung für Produkte oder Dienstleistungen von Werbetreibenden (z. B. Händler) eine Provision. Publisher werben bei Besuchern ihrer Websites oder mobilen Anwendungen für Produkte oder Dienstleistungen von Werbetreibenden und erhalten für jeden generierten Verkauf einen Teil des Gewinns. CJ betreibt ein
Affiliate-Netzwerk
, das Publishern und Werbetreibenden hilft, miteinander in Verbindung zu treten. Ein Affiliate-Netzwerk fungiert als Vermittler zwischen Publishern und Werbetreibenden, um sie dabei zu unterstützen, Werbeprogramme zu finden, die für ihre Bedürfnisse und Kanäle geeignet sind, und stellt sicher, dass die Vergütung für eine effektive Empfehlung oder Marketingbemühung an die richtige Partei geht. Um dies in gewissen Bereichen zu ermöglichen und intelligentere Entscheidungen zu treffen, müssen wir Informationen nutzen, die als Personenbezogene Daten betrachtet werden.
Cookies und Gerätezugriff
Wir werden unsere eigenen Cookies nur dann platzieren oder anderweitig direkt auf das Gerät eines Verbrauchers zugreifen, wenn wir diesbezüglich eine Zustimmung erhalten haben, wie gemäß der ePrivacy-Richtlinie und den UK Privacy and Electronic Communications Regulations (PECR) vorgeschrieben. Für bestimmte unerlässliche Cookies ist jedoch keine Zustimmung erforderlich. Dazu gehören Cookies, die zur Einhaltung des DSGVO-Sicherheitsprinzips unerlässlich sind, sowie Cookies, die uns dabei helfen sicherzustellen, dass Inhalte einer Seite schnell und effektiv geladen werden, indem die Arbeitsbelastung auf zahlreichen Computern verteilt wird.
Zu den Situationen, in denen unerlässliche Cookies verwendet werden, gehört zum Beispiel die Notwendigkeit, einen Verbraucher zu identifizieren, um ihm Treuepunkte oder Cash-back zuweisen zu können. Wenn ein Verbraucher von einem unserer Partner Treuepunkte oder Cash-back angefordert hat, müssen wir auf das Gerät des Verbrauchers zugreifen, um eine Cookie-ID zu erstellen/zu lesen, um sicherstellen zu können, dass die Treuepunkte oder das Cash-back dem richtigen Verbraucher zuteil werden. In diesen Situationen ist der Zugriff auf das Gerät unbedingt notwendig, um dem Verbraucher die von ihm angeforderte Dienstleistung bereitzustellen.
Welche Personenbezogenen Daten verarbeiten wir?
In den meisten Fällen erfolgt die Verarbeitung der Personenbezogenen Daten durch CJ auf maschinengenerierte Art und Weise. Wir erfassen keine Personenbezogenen Daten, durch die ein Verbraucher direkt identifiziert werden kann. Da die Datenverarbeitungstätigkeiten von CJ nicht die direkte Identifizierung eines Verbrauchers erfordern, speichert CJ nur solche Daten, die als „Pseudonymisierte Personenbezogene Daten“ betrachtet werden. Pseudonymisierte Personenbezogene Daten sind Personenbezogene Daten, die ohne die Verwendung zusätzlicher Informationen keinem bestimmten Verbraucher zugeordnet werden können. Die Verwendung Pseudonymisierter Personenbezogener Daten kann die Risiken für die Verbraucher senken und gleichzeitig Unternehmen wie CJ bei der Erfüllung ihrer Datenschutzverpflichtungen unterstützen.
Die ausschließliche Verwendung Pseudonymisierter Personenbezogener Daten ermöglicht es uns, den Weg eines Verbrauchers vom Publisher zum Werbetreibenden zu sehen und zu verfolgen, ohne jedoch die Identität dieses Verbrauchers im herkömmlichen Sinne offenzulegen, indem wir seinen Namen, seine Adresse oder E-Mail verwenden. Anders ausgedrückt können wir einen Verbraucher nicht direkt anhand der von uns verarbeiteten Personenbezogenen Daten identifizieren. Wir haben kein Interesse daran und keine Notwendigkeit, solche Einzelheiten über einen bestimmten Verbraucher zu kennen.
Bei Besuchen und Interaktionen eines Verbrauchers mit einer Website oder einer mobilen Anwendung, die an unseren Dienstleistungen beteiligt ist, können folgende Informationen gesammelt und an uns übermittelt werden:
·
Browser- und Geräteinformationen
. Dies umfasst Informationen wie die User-Agent-String, den Browser-Typ und die Browser-Version, die Cookie-ID, Klick, Eindrücke, Zeitstempel, IP-Adresse, URL der verweisenden Website und URL der aktuellen Website.
·
Transaktionsdaten
. Dies umfasst Informationen, die die Online-Käufe und -Handlungen eines Verbrauchers beschreiben, sowie die Bestell-ID, Bestellinformationen wie Produkte und Dienstleistungen und den Online-Zeitstempel.
Wie und auf welcher Rechtsgrundlage Personenbezogene Daten verwendet werden
CJ verwendet Personenbezogene Daten in erster Linie, um eine Verweisung oder eine Marketingaktivität auf einer Publisher-Website oder auf einer mobilen Anwendung einer Transaktion mit einem Werbetreibenden zuzuordnen. Dies bezweckt, es Werbetreibenden zu ermöglichen, Publisher auf der Grundlage jeder Transaktion für ihre Marketingaktivitäten zu vergüten. Darüber hinaus ermöglicht es CJ, Publishern und Werbetreibenden entsprechende Berichte und Analysen vorzulegen. Die meisten dieser Berichte enthalten nur aggregierte statistische Daten.
Wir verwenden Personenbezogene Daten
nicht
, um Vorhersagen oder Bewertungen in Bezug auf die Interessen eines Verbrauchers vorzunehmen, und wir verwenden Personenbezogene Daten
nicht
, um Werbeprofile zu erstellen.
Unsere Zwecke und Rechtsgrundlagen werden nachstehend umfassend ausgeführt.
Zweck
Rechtsgrundlage
Identifizierung von Verbrauchern, einschließlich des Versuchs, festzustellen, welche Geräte wahrscheinlich zu einem Verbraucher gehören, und ihr Gerät von anderen Geräten zu unterscheiden, damit wir in der Lage sind, den Nutzern unserer Dienstleistungen die genaue Provision zuzuweisen.
Berechtigtes Interesse
Unterstützung bei der Berichterstattung und Analyse für die Nutzer unserer Dienstleistungen hinsichtlich der abgeschlossenen Transaktionen.
Berechtigtes Interesse
Verbesserung bestehender Systeme und Software sowie Entwicklung neuer Produkte.
Berechtigtes Interesse
Überwachung und Verhinderung betrügerischer Aktivitäten sowie Sicherstellung, dass Systeme und Prozesse korrekt und sicher funktionieren.
Berechtigtes Interesse
Zur Unterstützung der oben genannten Zwecke verwenden wir Personenbezogene Daten, die wir speichern, um festzustellen, ob anzunehmen ist, dass verschiedene Geräte dem gleichen Verbraucher gehören, und um dessen Gerät auf der Grundlage von Informationen, die das Gerät automatisch sendet, wie z. B. die IP-Adresse oder den Browsertyp, von anderen Geräten zu unterscheiden. So können wir leichter nachvollziehen, ob derselbe Verbraucher eine Transaktion auf einem Gerät beginnt und auf einem anderen abschließt. Dadurch stellen wir sicher, dass wir dem verweisenden Publisher die entsprechende Provision zuweisen.
Die berechtigten Interessen von CJ hinsichtlich der oben genannten Zwecke umfassen Folgendes: die Bereitstellung unserer Dienstleistungen, die Sicherstellung, dass die Nutzer unserer Dienstleistungen (Publisher und Werbetreibende) zahlen und für durch unsere Dienstleistungen generierten Datenverkehr und Transaktionen vergütet werden, und die Sicherstellung, dass Nutzer (Publisher und Werbetreibende) nur für den Datenverkehr und die Transaktionen einer natürlichen Person (z. B. kein Bot) bezahlen und vergütet werden. Weitere Informationen können auf Anfrage zur Verfügung gestellt werden.
Wenn ein Verbraucher Treuepunkte oder Cash-back von einem unserer Partner angefordert hat, müssen wir Personenbezogene Daten zu den oben genannten Zwecken verarbeiten, damit wir dem Verbraucher die Treuepunkte bzw. das Cash-back bereitstellen können, die er angefordert hat. In solchen Fällen ist die Verarbeitung für die Erfüllung des Vertrags erforderlich, den der Verbraucher mit einem unserer Partner in Bezug auf Treuepunkte oder Cash-back abgeschlossen hat.
An wen geben wir Personenbezogene Daten weiter?
Wir geben Ihre Personenbezogenen Daten wie folgt weiter:
-
An Unternehmen der Publicis Groupe zu den oben genannten Zwecken,
-
An Nutzer unserer Dienstleistungen (Publisher und Werbetreibende), damit sie überprüfen können, ob sie den korrekten Betrag bezahlt oder vergütet bekommen haben,
-
An unsere Auftragsverarbeiter,
-
An Dritte im Falle einer Reorganisation, Fusion oder Veräußerung, eines Joint Venture oder einer Abtretung, Übertragung oder sonstigen Veräußerung unseres gesamten oder eines Teils unseres Unternehmens, unserer Vermögenswerte oder unserer Aktien (einschließlich in Verbindung mit einem Konkurs oder ähnlichen Verfahren), und
-
Soweit wir dies für notwendig und angemessen halten: (a) nach geltendem Recht; (b) um rechtlichen Verfahren und Verpflichtungen zu entsprechen; (c) um Anfragen öffentlicher Einrichtungen und Behörden, einschließlich öffentlicher Einrichtungen und Behörden, die sich außerhalb Ihres Wohnsitzlandes befinden, zu beantworten; (d) um unsere Geschäftsbedingungen durchzusetzen; (e) um unsere Geschäftsvorgänge zu schützen; (f) um unsere Rechte, unsere Privatsphäre, unsere Sicherheit oder unser Eigentum zu schützen; und (g) damit wir die verfügbaren Rechtsmittel einsetzen oder die von uns möglicherweise erlittenen Schäden begrenzen können.
Wie lange bewahren wir Personenbezogene Daten auf?
Wir speichern alle Personenbezogenen Daten in Übereinstimmung mit unserer Datenaufbewahrungsrichtlinie, die geltendem Recht entspricht. Die Aufbewahrungsfrist richtet sich nach der Art der Daten. Zum Beispiel speichern wir Pseudonymisierte Personenbezogene Daten für eine Dauer von bis zu sechs (6) Jahren.
Ihre Rechte
Wir verstehen, dass Sie möglicherweise interessiert sind zu erfahren, welche Personenbezogenen Daten wir über Sie gespeichert haben (
Zugriff
). Sie können diese Informationen einsehen und sogar
löschen
, wenn Sie dies wünschen, indem Sie
hier
klicken .
Wenn Sie andere Rechte ausüben möchten, über die Sie im Rahmen von Datenschutzgesetzen (einschließlich der
Berichtigung
,
Übertragbarkeit
und
Einschränkung
) verfügen können,
Kontakt zu uns
.
In Situationen, in denen wir eine Zustimmung benötigen, sind Sie berechtigt,
Ihre Zustimmung
jederzeit
zu widerrufen
. Wenn Sie CJ Ihre Zustimmung gegeben haben, unsere eigenen Cookies zu platzieren oder anderweitig direkt auf Ihr Gerät zuzugreifen, haben Sie das Recht, diese Zustimmung jederzeit zu widerrufen. Dies können Sie tun, indem Sie in der Fußzeile unserer
Website
auf „Zustimmungseinstellungen einsehen“ klicken und den Anweisungen folgen.
Internationale Übermittlung
Zur Erbringung unserer Dienstleistungen übermitteln wir Personenbezogene Daten in Länder außerhalb der Europäischen Union (EU), des Europäischen Wirtschaftsraums (EWR) und des Vereinigten Königreichs und verarbeiten die Personenbezogenen Daten dort. Insbesondere befinden sich unsere Server in den Vereinigten Staaten und sind unsere Datenverarbeiter auf der ganzen Welt tätig, einschließlich der Vereinigten Staaten und Indien.
Wir haben angemessene und geeignete Sicherheitsvorkehrungen getroffen, um sicherzustellen, dass Ihre Personenbezogenen Daten bei der Übermittlung außerhalb der EU/des EWR und des Vereinigten Königreichs weiterhin geschützt werden. Dies umfasst die Verwendung von Standardvertragsklauseln für die Übermittlung Personenbezogener Daten, die von der Europäischen Kommission bzw. dem Vereinigten Königreich verabschiedet wurden. Weitere Informationen über unsere internationale Übermittlung sowie die bestehenden Sicherheitsvorkehrungen können Ihnen auf Anfrage zur Verfügung gestellt werden.
Sicherheit
Wir haben geeignete technische und organisatorische Sicherheitsmaßnahmen getroffen, um die uns anvertrauten Personenbezogenen Daten sowohl bei ihrer Übermittlung, als auch nach ihrem Erhalt durch uns zu schützen. Dies umfasst physische und technische Sicherheitsmaßnahmen zum Schutz unserer Personenbezogenen Daten vor unbeabsichtigter oder unrechtmäßiger Zerstörung, Verlust oder Änderung sowie vor unbefugter Weitergabe oder unberechtigtem Zugriff. Bitte berücksichtigen Sie, dass keine Methode zur Übermittlung von Informationen über das Internet und zur Speicherung von Informationen vollkommen sicher ist.
Kontakt zu uns
Epsilon International UK Ltd ist der für die von uns verarbeiteten Personenbezogenen Daten Verantwortliche, wie in dieser Datenschutzrichtlinie beschrieben. Wenn Sie Fragen zu der Verarbeitung haben, schreiben Sie bitte eine
E-Mail an uns
.
Unser Datenschutzbeauftragter ist verpflichtet, uns über die Pflichten zu informieren und zu beraten, denen wir aufgrund des Datenschutzrechts unterliegen, sowie deren Einhaltung durch uns zu überwachen. Wenn Sie mit unserem Datenschutzbeauftragten in Kontakt treten möchten, senden Sie uns bitte
hier
eine E-Mail. Wir möchten Sie jedoch bitten, sich nur in dringenden Fragen des Datenschutzes an unseren Datenschutzbeauftragten zu wenden.
Als EU-Gebietsansässiger haben Sie das Recht, der
Datenschutzbehörde
Ihres Landes ein Anliegen zu melden. Das gleiche gilt, wenn Sie im Vereinigten Königreich ansässig sind. Besuchen Sie bitte die Website des
Information Commissioner Office
, um entsprechende Kontaktinformationen zu erhalten. Wir möchten Sie jedoch bitten, sich zuerst mit uns in Verbindung zu setzen, damit wir Ihnen helfen können.
Änderungen dieser Datenschutzrichtlinie
Wir können gelegentlich Änderungen dieser Datenschutzrichtlinie vornehmen. Sollte dies der Fall sein, werden wir geeignete Maßnahmen ergreifen, um Sie entsprechend der Wichtigkeit der von uns vorgenommenen Änderungen zu informieren und das obige „Zuletzt geändert“-Datum dementsprechend anpassen.
Begriffsbestimmungen, die in dieser Datenschutzrichtlinie verwendet werden
„
CJ
“ bezeichnet Epsilon International UK Ltd mit der Firmennummer 03610044, deren eingetragener Geschäftssitz 1st Floor, 2 Television Centre, 101 Wood Lane, London, England, W12 7FR lautet.
„
Cookies
“ sind kleine Textdateien, die auf Ihrem Endgerät (z. B. Computer oder Smartphone) heruntergeladen und gespeichert werden. Cookies ermöglichen es uns, Ihr Gerät zu erkennen und Informationen über Ihre Präferenzen oder frühere Handlungen zu speichern. In dieser Datenschutzrichtlinie umfasst die Bestimmung des Begriffs „Cookies“ ähnliche Technologien, die Informationen auf Ihrem Gerät schreiben oder lesen können, wie z. B. „Local Shared Objects“ (manchmal als Flash-Cookies bezeichnet), Pixel und Web-Beacons. Für weitere Informationen zu den Cookies, die wir für unsere Dienste setzen, klicken Sie bitte
hier
.
„
Datenschutzgesetze
“
bezeichnet (i)
die EU-Verordnung 2016/679 und die UK General Data Protection Regulation (UK GDPR) in der Fassung des UK Data Protection Act 2018 (zusammen als „
DSGVO
“ bezeichnet); (ii) EU-Richtlinie 2002/58/EG (ePrivacy-Richtlinie); (iii) die UK Privacy and Electronic Communications (EC Directive) Regulations 2003; und (iv) alle anwendbaren nationalen Datenschutzgesetze, die gemäß oder in Anwendung von (i) oder (iii) erlassen wurden; jeweils in deren geänderten oder ersetzten Fassung.
„
Personenbezogene Daten
“ bezeichnet alle Informationen, die sich auf eine bestimmte oder bestimmbare natürliche Person beziehen. Als Personenbezogene Daten gelten Informationen wie der Name, die Identifikationsnummer, die Standortdaten und die Online-Kennung.
„
Dienstleistungen
“ bezeichnet die Affiliate-Marketing-Dienstleistungen, die wir Publishern und Werbetreibenden bereitstellen und die oben eingehender erläutert wurden.
By clicking “Accept All Cookies”, you agree to the storing of cookies on your device to enhance site navigation, analyze site usage, and assist in our marketing efforts.
Reject All
Accept All Cookies
Cookies Settings
Your Privacy
Strictly Necessary
Targeting
Performance
Functional
Your Privacy
When you visit any website, it may store or retrieve information on your browser, mostly in the form of cookies. This information might be about you, your preferences or your device and is mostly used to make the site work as you expect it to. The information does not usually directly identify you, but it can give you a more personalized web experience. Because we respect your right to privacy, you can choose not to allow some types of cookies. Click on the different category headings to find out more and change our default settings. However, blocking some types of cookies may impact your experience of the site and the services we are able to offer.
More information
Always Active
These cookies are necessary for the website to function and cannot be switched off in our systems. They are usually only set in response to actions made by you which amount to a request for services, such as setting your privacy preferences, logging in or filling in forms. You can set your browser to block or alert you about these cookies, but some parts of the site will not then work. These cookies do not store any personally identifiable information.
Targeting
Under the California Consumer Privacy Act, you have the right to opt-out of the sale of your personal information to third parties. These cookies collect information for analytics and to personalize your experience with targeted ads. You may exercise your right to opt out of the sale of personal information by using this toggle switch. If you opt out we will not be able to offer you personalized ads and will not hand over your personal information to any third parties. Additionally, you may find further information about exercising your California consumer rights by visiting our privacy notice.
Performance
These cookies allow us to count visits and traffic sources so we can measure and improve the performance of our site. They help us to know which pages are the most and least popular and see how visitors move around the site. All information these cookies collect is aggregated and therefore anonymous. If you do not allow these cookies we will not know when you have visited our site, and will not be able to monitor its performance.
Functional
These cookies enable the website to provide enhanced functionality and personalisation. They may be set by us or by third party providers whose services we have added to our pages. If you do not allow these cookies then some or all of these services may not function properly.
Back Button
Cookie List
Filter Button
Consent
Leg.Interest
checkbox label
label
checkbox label
label
checkbox label
label
Clear
checkbox label
label
Apply
Cancel
Sub-policy 5
https://www.zendesk.de/company/customers-partners/privacy-policy/?_ga=2.91941658.1061004003.1524063401-1063456244.1524063401:
Zum Hauptinhalt springen
Vereinbarungen und Bedingungen
Richtlinien und Verfahren
Marken und geistiges Eigentum
Beschaffung und Lieferanten
Datensicherheit und Datenschutz
Kundenvereinbarungen und Nutzungsbedingungen für Produkte und Dienste
Hauptdienstleistungsvertrag
Gebietsspezifische Bedingungen
Bedingungen für professionelle Dienstleistungen
Wie wir Ihre Dienstdaten schützen (Enterprise Services)
Wie wir Ihre Dienstdaten schützen (Innovationsdienste)
Liste der Innovationsdienste
Anwendungsentwickler- und API-Lizenzvereinbarung
Nutzungsbedingungen für den Marketplace
Übermittlungen und Transfers
Vertrag über Abonnementdienste für Wiederverkäufer
Datenschutz
Zendesk Trust Center
Datenschutzerklärung
Cookie-Mitteilung
Auftragsverarbeitungsvertrag
CCPA-Nachtrag PowerForm
LGPD-Nachtrag PowerForm
BAA-PowerForm
Richtlinie zu behördlichen Datenanforderungen
Richtlinien
Datenaufbewahrungsrichtlinie
Richtlinie für Guthaben zu Werbezwecken (Aktionsgutschriften
Regionale Richtlinie für das Hosting von Daten
Richtlinie für Auftragsverarbeiter im Unterauftragsverhältnis
Richtlinie von Zendesk zu Benutzerinhalten und Benutzergebaren
Produktbedingungen
Zugänglichkeitsrichtlinie
Richtlinie zu produktinternen Cookies
Dienstspezifische Bedingungen
Bedingungen für kostenlose Probezugänge und Beta-Dienste
Kostenlose Tests
Beta-Dienste
Hinweis zum Datenschutz
Datum des Inkrafttretens:
20. Februar 2024.
Die vorherige Version unserer Datenschutzrichtlinie finden Sie
hier
.
Für die frühere Version unserer Zendesk-Eventrichtlinie klicken Sie
hier
.
Hallo! Zendesk ist ein serviceorientiertes CRM-Unternehmen, welches Software zur Verbesserung von Kundenbeziehungen entwickelt. Wir haben diesen Datenschutzhinweis („
Hinweis
“) entwickelt, um Ihnen zu erklären, wie wir personenbezogene Daten erheben, verwenden, offenlegen und speichern.
Dieser Hinweis ist
nur
dann gültig, wenn Zendesk der Datenverantwortliche für personenbezogene Daten ist (Beispiel: personenbezogene Daten von Zendesk-Website-Besuchern und Business-to-Business-Kontaktdaten).
Zendesk ist ein
Verarbeiter
und kein Datenverantwortlicher für personenbezogene Daten, die wir im Namen unserer Abonnenten verarbeiten, wenn diese Zendesk-Produkte und -Dienste nutzen. Zur Klarstellung: Dies bedeutet, dass dieser Hinweis
nicht
für den Fall gilt, dass Zendesk personenbezogene Daten als Auftragsverarbeiter in seinen Produkten und Dienstleistungen verarbeitet. Sollten Sie Fragen dazu haben, wie ein Zendesk-Abonnent Ihre personenbezogenen Daten verwendet, wenden Sie sich bitte direkt an ihn. Wir sind nicht verantwortlich für die Datenschutz- oder Datensicherheitspraktiken unserer Abonnenten. Dieser Hinweis bezieht sich auch nicht auf personenbezogene Daten von aktuellen und ehemaligen Zendesk-Mitarbeitern, Stellenbewerbern oder Auftragnehmern und Vertretern, die in ähnlichen Funktionen tätig sind.
Inhaltsverzeichnis:
Einführung
Personenbezogene Daten, die wir erfassen und weitergeben
Wie wir personenbezogene Daten verarbeiten
Herkunft der personenbezogenen Daten
Cookies und Tracking-Technologien
Sicherheit und Aufbewahrung
Datenschutz für Kinder
Externe Links
Kontaktdaten
Ergänzende Bedingungen für die Einwohner Kaliforniens
Ergänzende Informationen für den EWR, die Schweiz und das Vereinigte Königreich
Ergänzende Informationen für andere Regionen
Englischsprachige Version ist ausschlaggebend
Zendesk, Inc. Verbundene Unternehmen
1. Einführung
Diese Richtlinie gilt für Zendesk, Inc. und seine in
Abschnitt 14
aufgeführten verbundenen Unternehmen („
Zendesk
“, „
wir
“, „
wir
“ oder „
unser“
). Großgeschriebene Begriffe, die wir verwenden, die aber in der Richtlinie nicht definiert sind (z. B. Website, Dienste, Abonnent, Vertreter, Kontaktinformationen des Vertreters usw.), haben die in unserem
Rahmenvertrag für Abonnements
angegebene Bedeutung. Wenn Sie sich im Europäischen Wirtschaftsraum („
EWR
“), in der Schweiz oder im Vereinigten Königreich („
U.K.
“) befinden, finden Sie in
Abschnitt 11
dieser Richtlinie weitere Informationen darüber, welche spezifische(n) Einrichtung(en) als Datenverantwortliche(r) für Ihre personenbezogenen Daten fungieren.
Wann gilt dieser Hinweis?
Diese Richtlinie greift nur bei personenbezogenen Daten, die Zendesk als Datenverantwortlicher behandelt (d. h. wenn Zendesk kontrolliert, wie und warum Ihre personenbezogenen Daten verarbeitet werden). Dies gilt, wenn Sie:
die Website Zendesk.com, die mobilen Anwendungen von Zendesk, den Zendesk Marketplace, das Zendesk Developer Portal, unsere Social-Media-Seiten und andere von uns betriebene Websites besuchen oder mit ihnen interagieren (zusammenfassend unser „
digitales Eigentum
“);
Anmeldung zu unseren Webinaren, Veranstaltungen, Programmen, Marketing- und Werbeaktivitäten oder Teilnahme daran;
mit uns persönlich interagieren, z. B. wenn Sie unsere Büros besuchen; und
sich bei uns erkundigen oder mit uns geschäftliche Transaktionen durchführen.
Änderungen
: Wir können diesen Hinweis von Zeit zu Zeit aktualisieren. Bitte informieren Sie sich regelmäßig über Aktualisierungen. Falls Sie mit unseren Änderungen nicht einverstanden sein sollten, bitten wir Sie, nicht mehr mit uns in Kontakt zu treten. Wenn es nach geltendem Recht erforderlich ist, werden wir Sie über Änderungen dieser Richtlinie informieren, indem wir eine Aktualisierung auf unserer Website oder auf andere angemessene Weise veröffentlichen.
2. Personenbezogene Daten, die wir erfassen und weitergeben
In der nachfolgenden Tabelle wird erläutert, welche personenbezogenen Daten wir über Sie erfassen und an wen wir personenbezogene Daten weitergeben. Natürliche Personen in Kalifornien: In dieser Tabelle sind die Parteien aufgeführt, an die wir personenbezogene Daten für einen geschäftlichen oder kommerziellen Zweck gemäß der Definition des kalifornischen Rechts weitergeben.
Kategorien der erfassten personenbezogenen Daten
Weitergabe von personenbezogenen Daten
Kennungen
, wie z. B. Ihr Name, Ihre E-Mail-Adresse, Postanschrift, Telefonnummer und Gerätekennungen (z. B. Werbekennungen und IP-Adresse).
Verbundene Unternehmen und Tochtergesellschaften innerhalb der Zendesk-Gruppe, einschließlich Mutter- und Dachgesellschaften, verbundene Unternehmen, Tochtergesellschaften, Geschäftseinheiten und andere Unternehmen, die wir zukünftig erwerben, nachdem sie Teil der Zendesk-Gruppe geworden sind
Dienstleister, wie beispielsweise Sicherheits- und Plattform-Anbieter
Mit Dritten, die für die Durchführung einer Transaktion erforderlich sind, wie z. B. Kreditkartenunternehmen
Geschäftspartner, mit denen wir kooperieren, um unsere Produkte und Dienstleistungen gemeinsam zu vermarkten oder zu verkaufen, wie zum Beispiel Vertriebspartner
Mit Dritten auf Ihre Anweisung hin, wie beispielsweise mit Sponsoren von Veranstaltungen
Professionelle Berater, wie Anwälte, Buchhalter und Wirtschaftsprüfer
Unternehmen, die an einer Unternehmenstransaktion beteiligt sind, beispielsweise wenn wir alle oder einige unserer Vermögenswerte verkaufen, erwerben oder fusionieren
Unternehmen, die Cookies und Tracking-Technologien einsetzen, wie in
Abschnitt 5
beschrieben, wie z. B. Marketing- und Werbepartner
Sie haben der Offenlegung zugestimmt.
Kommerzielle Informationen
, darunter Präferenzen, wie beispielsweise Kaufhistorie oder -tendenzen und Transaktionsinformationen, wie beispielsweise Bankdaten.
Verbundene Unternehmen und Tochtergesellschaften innerhalb der Zendesk-Gruppe, einschließlich Mutter- und Dachgesellschaften, verbundene Unternehmen, Tochtergesellschaften, Geschäftseinheiten und andere Unternehmen, die wir zukünftig erwerben, nachdem sie Teil der Zendesk-Gruppe geworden sind
Dienstleister, wie beispielsweise Sicherheits- und Plattform-Anbieter
Mit Dritten, die für die Durchführung einer Transaktion erforderlich sind, wie z. B. Kreditkartenunternehmen
Professionelle Berater, wie Anwälte, Buchhalter und Wirtschaftsprüfer
Unternehmen, die an einer Unternehmenstransaktion beteiligt sind, beispielsweise wenn wir alle oder einige unserer Vermögenswerte verkaufen, erwerben oder fusionieren
Sie haben der Offenlegung zugestimmt.
Informationen über Internet- oder andere elektronische Netzwerkaktivitäten und Geräteinformationen
, wie z. B. Ihr Browserverlauf, Suchverlauf, Geräteinformationen und andere Informationen (ob passives Browsen oder aktives Engagement) hinsichtlich Ihrer Interaktionen mit uns und der Nutzung unserer Produkte, Dienste, E-Mails und anderen digitalen Eigenschaften.
Verbundene Unternehmen und Tochtergesellschaften innerhalb der Zendesk-Gruppe, einschließlich Mutter- und Dachgesellschaften, verbundene Unternehmen, Tochtergesellschaften, Geschäftseinheiten und andere Unternehmen, die wir zukünftig erwerben, nachdem sie Teil der Zendesk-Gruppe geworden sind
Dienstleister, wie beispielsweise Sicherheits- und Plattform-Anbieter
Unternehmen, die Cookies und Tracking-Technologien einsetzen, wie in
Abschnitt 5
beschrieben, wie z. B. Marketing- und Werbepartner
Unternehmen, die an einer Unternehmenstransaktion beteiligt sind, beispielsweise wenn wir alle oder einige unserer Vermögenswerte verkaufen, erwerben oder fusionieren
Geolokalisierungsdaten
, wie beispielsweise der ungefähre Standort basierend auf Ihrer IP-Adresse, dem Standort Ihres mobilen Geräts oder Informationen, die Sie uns zur Verfügung stellen (z. B. Stadt und Bundesland, die Sie über ein Webformular angeben). Die Erfassung dieser Daten können Sie möglicherweise über die Einstellungen Ihres Geräts steuern.
Verbundene Unternehmen und Tochtergesellschaften innerhalb der Zendesk-Gruppe, einschließlich Mutter- und Dachgesellschaften, verbundene Unternehmen, Tochtergesellschaften, Geschäftseinheiten und andere Unternehmen, die wir zukünftig erwerben, nachdem sie Teil der Zendesk-Gruppe geworden sind
Dienstleister, wie beispielsweise Sicherheits- und Plattform-Anbieter.
Unternehmen, die an einer Unternehmenstransaktion mitwirken, z. B. wenn wir alle oder einige unserer Vermögenswerte verkaufen, erwerben oder fusionieren.
Unternehmen, die Cookies und Tracking-Technologien einsetzen, wie in
Abschnitt 5
beschrieben, wie z. B. Marketing- und Werbepartner
Audio-, elektronische, visuelle und andere sensorische Informationen
, wie z. B. CCTV-Aufnahmen unserer Räumlichkeiten (z. B. wenn Sie unsere Büros besuchen); Aufzeichnungen Ihrer Interaktionen mit unseren Verkaufs- oder Beratungsteams (z. B. zu Qualitätssicherungs- oder Schulungszwecken, in Übereinstimmung mit den geltenden Gesetzen); oder Chats oder Nachrichtenprotokolle des Kundensupports.
Verbundene Unternehmen und Tochtergesellschaften innerhalb der Zendesk-Gruppe, einschließlich Mutter- und Dachgesellschaften, verbundene Unternehmen, Tochtergesellschaften, Geschäftseinheiten und andere Unternehmen, die wir zukünftig erwerben, nachdem sie Teil der Zendesk-Gruppe geworden sind
Dienstleister, wie beispielsweise Sicherheits- und Plattform-Anbieter.
Unternehmen, die an einer Unternehmenstransaktion beteiligt sind, beispielsweise wenn wir alle oder einige unserer Vermögenswerte verkaufen, erwerben oder fusionieren
Rückschlüsse im Sinne des kalifornischen Rechts
, wie beispielsweise Marketing, auf das Sie wahrscheinlich positiv reagieren werden.
Verbundene Unternehmen und Tochtergesellschaften innerhalb der Zendesk-Gruppe, einschließlich Mutter- und Dachgesellschaften, verbundene Unternehmen, Tochtergesellschaften, Geschäftseinheiten und andere Unternehmen, die wir zukünftig erwerben, nachdem sie Teil der Zendesk-Gruppe geworden sind
Dienstleister wie beispielsweise Plattform-Anbieter
Unternehmen, die an einer Unternehmenstransaktion beteiligt sind, beispielsweise wenn wir alle oder einige unserer Vermögenswerte verkaufen, erwerben oder fusionieren
Sensible personenbezogene Daten
, wie beispielsweise Impfnachweise oder Angaben zur Herkunft und ethnischer Zugehörigkeit (optional) (sofern nach geltendem Recht zulässig).
Verbundene Unternehmen und Tochtergesellschaften innerhalb der Zendesk-Gruppe, einschließlich Mutter- und Dachgesellschaften, verbundene Unternehmen, Tochtergesellschaften, Geschäftseinheiten und andere Unternehmen, die wir zukünftig erwerben, nachdem sie Teil der Zendesk-Gruppe geworden sind
Dienstleister wie beispielsweise Plattform-Anbieter
Unternehmen, die an einer Unternehmenstransaktion beteiligt sind, beispielsweise wenn wir alle oder einige unserer Vermögenswerte verkaufen, erwerben oder fusionieren
Sie haben der Offenlegung zugestimmt.
Zusätzlich zu den oben genannten Offenlegungen können wir Ihre personenbezogenen Daten weitergeben, um auf rechtmäßige Anfragen von Strafverfolgungsbehörden oder anderen staatlichen Stellen gemäß unserer
Richtlinie für staatliche Datenanfragen
zu reagieren. Ebenso sind wir berechtigt, personenbezogene Daten zu de-identifizieren, zu anonymisieren oder zu aggregieren, um sie für beliebige Zwecke zu nutzen oder an Dritte weiterzugeben, sofern dies gesetzlich zulässig ist.
3. Wie wir personenbezogene Daten verarbeiten
Wir können Ihre personenbezogenen Daten für die unten aufgeführten Zwecke verarbeiten:
Verarbeitungszweck
Gesetzliche Grundlage
Um Ihnen unsere Produkte, Dienstleistungen und digitalen Eigenschaften bereitzustellen
, einschließlich der Verarbeitung und Ausführung von Transaktionen; um Ihnen den Zugriff auf die digitalen Eigenschaften und unsere Dienstleistungen zu ermöglichen; um unsere digitalen Eigenschaften und Dienstleistungen zu betreiben, zu warten und zu verbessern; um mit Ihnen zu kommunizieren, beispielsweise indem wir Ihre Supportanfragen bearbeiten oder Sicherheitsupdates bereitstellen; und um Service- und Qualitätsprobleme zu diagnostizieren, zu reparieren und zu verfolgen.
Berechtigte Interessen; Vertrag; Gesetzliche Verpflichtungen
Für unsere eigenen Geschäftszwecke
, einschließlich der Führung interner Geschäftsunterlagen und der Erstellung interner Berichte, der Einziehung von Zahlungen und der Durchführung von Buchhaltungs- und ähnlichen Geschäftsfunktionen, der Prüfung und Verwaltung von Projekten im Zusammenhang mit unseren Diensten, der Durchführung von IT-Sicherheitsmanagement und IT-bezogenen Aufgaben, wie der Verwaltung unserer Technologien und unseres Netzwerks, der Bewertung und Verbesserung unseres Geschäfts, unserer Dienste und digitalen Eigenschaften sowie der Durchführung von Forschung und Entwicklung neuer Produkte und Dienste und der Bearbeitung Ihrer Umfrage- und Fragebogenantworten.
Berechtigte Interessen; Gesetzliche Verpflichtungen
Aus rechtlichen, Sicherheits- oder Schutzgründen
, einschließlich der Erfüllung gesetzlicher Vorgaben, der Begründung, Geltendmachung oder Abwehr von Rechtsansprüchen, des Schutzes der Sicherheit und Integrität unseres Eigentums und der Rechte derjenigen, die mit uns oder anderen interagieren, der Untersuchung von Verstößen gegen Inhalte oder Verhaltensrichtlinien sowie der Erkennung, Verhinderung und Reaktion auf Sicherheitsvorfälle oder andere böswillige, betrügerische, missbräuchliche oder illegale Aktivitäten.
Zu diesen Sicherheitszwecken zählen möglicherweise auch die Erhebung und Verarbeitung besonderer Kategorien personenbezogener Daten (z. B. Gesundheitsdaten), für Bürobesuche und Veranstaltungen, wenn dies für die öffentliche Gesundheit erforderlich ist oder durch geltendes Recht vorgeschrieben wird.
Berechtigte Interessen; Gesetzliche Verpflichtungen; Öffentliches Interesse
Für die Vermarktung unserer Produkte und Dienstleistungen oder derjenigen Dritter, wie beispielsweise unserer Geschäftspartner
, einschließlich der Einholung oder Veröffentlichung von Erfahrungsberichten oder Feedback zu unseren Produkten und Dienstleistungen; Zusendung von Marketing- und Werbemitteilungen oder Produktempfehlungen (per E-Mail, Telefon oder über andere Online- und Offline-Kanäle) über unsere Dienstleistungen oder die von Dritten; Erleichterung Ihrer Teilnahme an einem Wettbewerb oder einer Veranstaltung; Bewertung von Anzeigenimpressionen oder kontextbezogene Anzeigenanpassung.
Hier
oder durch Klicken auf den Link „Abmelden“ am Ende unserer Marketingmitteilungen können Sie sich von den Marketingmitteilungen abmelden.
Hier
können Sie auch Ihre E-Mail-Einstellungen verwalten. Beachten Sie, dass einige unserer Marketingmaterialien und -informationen Tracking-Technologien und Analysetools verwenden können, um Ihre Präferenzen zu verstehen. Weitere Informationen finden Sie in
Abschnitt 5
unten und in unserer
Cookie-Richtlinie
.
Einwilligung (sofern gesetzlich vorgeschrieben); Berechtigte Interessen
Zur Erfüllung einer Empfehlungsanfrage, wenn Sie unseren Empfehlungsdienst nutzen, um einen Freund über unsere Dienste zu informieren
, einschließlich der Verwendung des Namens, der E-Mail-Adresse, des Titels und des Firmennamens, die Sie uns zur Verfügung stellen, um die Person zu kontaktieren, die Sie empfehlen.
Personenbezogene Daten anderer Personen dürfen Sie nur dann weitergeben, wenn Sie deren Zustimmung dazu haben.
Einwilligung (sofern gesetzlich vorgeschrieben); Berechtigte Interessen
Vielfalt, Gleichberechtigung und Eingliederung
, wie beispielsweise die Bewerbung von Initiativen zur Förderung von Vielfalt, Gleichberechtigung und Eingliederung sowie der Vertretung innerhalb unseres Unternehmens (sofern gesetzlich zulässig).
Einwilligung (sofern gesetzlich vorgeschrieben); Berechtigte Interessen
Unternehmenstransaktionen
, wie beispielsweise Verkäufe, Fusionen, Übernahmen, Umstrukturierungen, Insolvenzen und andere Unternehmensereignisse.
Berechtigte Interessen; Gesetzliche Verpflichtungen
Wenn Sie der Verarbeitung Ihrer personenbezogenen Daten freiwillig zugestimmt haben
.
Einwilligung
Zendesk beachtet die Betroffenenrechte, soweit dies gesetzlich vorgeschrieben ist. Sie sind berechtigt, auf Ihre personenbezogenen Daten zuzugreifen, sie zu korrigieren, zu aktualisieren und in einigen Fällen deren Löschung zu verlangen (vorbehaltlich von Ausnahmen).
Hier
können Sie einen Antrag stellen.
Zendesk verwendet eine begrenzte Anzahl von Drittanbietern, die uns bei der Verarbeitung von Daten für bestimmte Zwecke unterstützen. Diese Drittanbieter unterstützen bestimmte Funktionen der Website, führen Datenbanküberwachungen und andere technische Operationen durch, helfen bei der Übertragung von Daten und stellen Datenspeicherdienste bereit. Diese Dritten können bei der Erbringung ihrer Dienstleistungen personenbezogene Daten verarbeiten oder speichern. Zendesk unterhält Verträge mit diesen Drittanbietern, die deren Zugriff, Verwendung und Weitergabe personenbezogener Daten in Übereinstimmung mit unseren Verpflichtungen aus dem EU-US-Abkommen einschränken. DPF, die U.K.-Erweiterung zum EU-U.S.  DPF und dem Swiss-U.S. DPF, einschließlich der Weiterleitungsbestimmungen, und Zendesk bleibt haftbar, wenn das Unternehmen diesen Verpflichtungen nicht nachkommt, und wir sind für das schadensverursachende Ereignis verantwortlich.
4. Herkunft der personenbezogenen Daten
Informationen, die Sie uns direkt bereitstellen
, beispielsweise wenn Sie sich registrieren und direkt mit uns über unsere digitalen Eigenschaften kommunizieren, unsere Büros besuchen oder an unseren Veranstaltungen, Marketing- und Outreach-Aktivitäten teilnehmen.
Informationen, die wir von Ihrem Arbeitgeber
, Ihren Mitarbeitern oder Freunden bekommen, einschließlich Informationen über Vertreter oder andere Mitarbeiter unserer aktuellen, früheren und zukünftigen Kunden, Lieferanten, Investoren und Geschäftspartner. Wir können Ihre Informationen auch von einem Freund im Rahmen einer Empfehlung für unsere Dienste erhalten.
Automatisch erfasste Informationen
, darunter technische Informationen über Ihre Interaktionen mit unseren digitalen Eigenschaften (wie IP-Adresse, Browsing-Präferenzen und Kaufhistorie). Weitere Informationen finden Sie in
Abschnitt 5
unten und in unserem
Cookie-Hinweis
.
Informationen aus öffentlichen Quellen
, einschließlich Informationen aus öffentlichen Aufzeichnungen und Informationen, die Sie in öffentlichen Foren, wie beispielsweise in sozialen Medien, teilen.
Informationen von anderen Dritten
, einschließlich Informationen von Drittanbietern von Diensten und Inhalten, von Unternehmen, mit denen wir zusammenarbeiten, um Produkte und Dienste zu verkaufen oder zu bewerben, und von sozialen Netzwerken (einschließlich Widgets, die mit solchen Netzwerken verbunden sind, wie zum Beispiel die Schaltfläche „Facebook Like“).
Informationen, die wir aus den verschiedenen Quellen, die in dieser Mitteilung beschrieben werden, erhalten, einschließlich Drittquellen und öffentlicher Quellen, können wir kombinieren und für die oben genannten Zwecke verwenden oder offenlegen.
5. Cookies und Tracking-Technologien
Wir setzen Cookies und andere Tracking-Technologien ein und bieten Ihnen die Möglichkeit, diese Einstellungen zu verwalten, wie in unserer
Cookie-Richtlinie
beschrieben. Einige Tracking-Technologien machen es uns möglich, Ihre Geräteaktivitäten über einen längeren Zeitraum und über verschiedene Geräte und Websites hinweg zu verfolgen. Obwohl einige Browser die Einstellungen „Do Not Track“ oder DNT integriert haben, berücksichtigen wir solche Signale von Webbrowsern zum jetzigen Zeitpunkt nicht.
6. Sicherheit und Aufbewahrung
Wir setzen angemessene Sicherheitsverfahren sowie technische und organisatorische Maßnahmen ein, um Ihre personenbezogenen Daten vor versehentlicher oder unrechtmäßiger Zerstörung, Verlust, Offenlegung, Änderung oder Verwendung zu schützen.
Im Allgemeinen werden Ihre personenbezogenen Daten so lange aufbewahrt, wie es für die Erfüllung der Zwecke, für die wir die personenbezogenen Daten erhoben haben, notwendig ist. Wenn Sie und/oder Ihr Unternehmen das Vertragsverhältnis mit uns gekündigt oder Ihre Beziehung zu uns anderweitig beendet haben, können wir Ihre personenbezogenen Daten in unseren Systemen und Aufzeichnungen aufbewahren, um die angemessene Erfüllung der überlebenden Bestimmungen in den gekündigten Verträgen sicherzustellen oder für andere legitime Geschäftszwecke, wie beispielsweise zum Nachweis unserer Geschäftspraktiken und vertraglichen Verpflichtungen, um Ihnen Informationen über unsere Produkte und Dienstleistungen zukommen zu lassen oder um die geltenden gesetzlichen, steuerlichen oder buchhalterischen Anforderungen zu erfüllen. Wenn wir keinen anhaltenden, legitimen Geschäftsbedarf und keinen gesetzlichen Rechtsgrund zur Verarbeitung Ihrer personenbezogenen Daten haben, löschen, anonymisieren oder aggregieren wir diese, oder, wenn dies nicht möglich ist (z. B. weil Ihre personenbezogenen Daten in Backup-Archiven gespeichert wurden), speichern wir Ihre personenbezogenen Daten sicher und isolieren sie von jeder weiteren Verarbeitung, bis die Löschung möglich ist. Sollten Sie mehr über die für Sie geltenden Aufbewahrungsfristen wissen wollen, wenden Sie sich bitte an uns unter den in
Abschnitt 9
angegebenen Kontaktdaten.
7. Datenschutz für Kinder
Unsere Websites und Dienste sind nicht an Kinder unter 16 Jahren gerichtet, und wir erheben nicht wissentlich personenbezogene Online-Daten direkt von Kindern. Wenn Sie ein Elternteil oder ein Vormund eines minderjährigen Kindes sind und glauben, dass das Kind uns online personenbezogene Daten mitgeteilt hat, kontaktieren Sie uns bitte unter Verwendung der in
Abschnitt 9
unten angegebenen Daten.
8. Externe Links
Wenn Sie mit uns interagieren, stoßen Sie möglicherweise auf Links zu externen Websites oder anderen Online-Diensten, einschließlich solcher, die in Werbeanzeigen Dritter eingebettet sind. Wir haben keinerlei Kontrolle über die Datenschutz- und Datenerhebungsrichtlinien solcher Websites und Dienste Dritter und sind für diese nicht verantwortlich. Für weitere Informationen oder wenn Sie Fragen zu den Praktiken dieser Dritten haben, sollten Sie diese Dritten und ihre jeweiligen Datenschutzerklärungen konsultieren.
9. Kontaktdaten
Wenn Sie Fragen oder Beschwerden zu dieser Richtlinie oder zu den Datenschutzpraktiken der Zendesk-Gruppe haben, wenden Sie sich bitte per E-Mail an
euprivacy@zendesk.com
oder
privacy@zendesk.com
oder an:
Zendesk, Inc.
Attn: Privacy Team
989 Market Street
San Francisco, CA 94103, Vereinigte Staaten
Gemäß dem EU-U.S.  Data Protection Framework (EU-U.S. DPF), der UK Extension zum EU-U.S.  DPF und dem Swiss-U.S. Data Protection Framework (Swiss-U.S. DPF) verpflichten wir uns, ungelöste Beschwerden, die unsere Behandlung gemäß EU-U.S.  DPF, der U.K.-Erweiterung zum EU-U.S.  DPF und dem Swiss-U.S. DPF an TRUSTe, empfangener personenbezogener Daten betreffen als einer alternativen Streitschlichtungsstelle mit Sitz in den USA weiter zu verweisen. Wenn Sie keine zeitnahe Empfangsbestätigung Ihrer Beschwerde im Zusammenhang mit den DPF-Grundsätzen von uns erhalten oder wenn wir Ihre Beschwerde im Zusammenhang mit den DPF-Grundsätzen nicht zu Ihrer Zufriedenheit geklärt haben, finden Sie
hier
weitere Informationen bzw. können eine Beschwerde einreichen. Die Leistungen von TRUSTe sind für Sie kostenlos.
10. Ergänzende Bedingungen für die Einwohner Kaliforniens
Entsprechend dem California Consumer Privacy Act („
CCPA
“) findet dieser Abschnitt 10 auf bestimmte personenbezogene Daten Anwendung, die über Personen in Kalifornien erhoben werden, wenn Zendesk kontrolliert, wie und warum die personenbezogenen Daten verarbeitet werden (was im CCPA als „Geschäft“ bezeichnet wird), und ergänzt den Rest unserer obigen Hinweise. Dieser Abschnitt 10 ist nicht gültig für aktuelle oder ehemalige Mitarbeiter, Bewerber, Auftragnehmer oder Vertreter.
a. Zusätzliche Offenlegungen zur Datenverarbeitung:
In der nachfolgenden Tabelle sind die Kategorien personenbezogener Daten aufgeführt, die wir gemäß der Definition des California Privacy Rights Act an Dritte verkauft, weitergegeben oder offengelegt haben. In der Tabelle in
Abschnitt 2
sind die Kategorien der von uns erhobenen personenbezogenen Daten und die Weitergabe dieser Daten aufgelistet.
Kategorien der von uns erfassten personenbezogenen Daten
Einzelheiten zum California Privacy Rights Act: Kategorien von Dritten, an die personenbezogene Daten „verkauft oder weitergegeben“ werden
Kennungen
, wie z. B. Ihr Name, Ihre E-Mail-Adresse, Postanschrift, Telefonnummer und Gerätekennungen (z. B. Werbekennungen und IP-Adresse).
Unternehmen, die Cookies und Tracking-Technologien verwenden, wie in
Abschnitt 5
beschrieben, wie etwa Marketing- und Werbepartner.
Geschäftspartner, mit denen wir zusammenarbeiten, um unsere Produkte und Dienstleistungen gemeinsam zu vermarkten oder zu verkaufen, wie beispielsweise Vertriebspartner.
Kommerzielle Informationen
, darunter Präferenzen, wie beispielsweise Kaufhistorie oder -tendenzen und Transaktionsinformationen, wie beispielsweise Bankdaten.
Nicht zutreffend
Informationen über Internet- oder andere elektronische Netzwerkaktivitäten und Geräteinformationen
, wie z. B. Ihr Browserverlauf, Suchverlauf, Geräteinformationen und andere Informationen (ob passives Browsen oder aktives Engagement) hinsichtlich Ihrer Interaktionen mit uns und der Nutzung unserer Produkte, Dienste, E-Mails und anderen digitalen Eigenschaften.
Unternehmen, die Cookies und Tracking-Technologien verwenden, wie in
Abschnitt 5
beschrieben, wie etwa Marketing- und Werbepartner.
Geolokalisierungsdaten
, wie beispielsweise der ungefähre Standort basierend auf Ihrer IP-Adresse, dem Standort Ihres mobilen Geräts oder Informationen, die Sie uns zur Verfügung stellen (z. B. Stadt und Bundesland, die Sie über ein Webformular angeben). Die Erfassung dieser Daten können Sie möglicherweise über die Einstellungen Ihres Geräts steuern.
Unternehmen, die Cookies und Tracking-Technologien verwenden, wie in
Abschnitt 5
beschrieben, wie etwa Marketing- und Werbepartner.
Audio-, elektronische, visuelle und andere sensorische Informationen
, wie z. B. CCTV-Aufnahmen unserer Räumlichkeiten (z. B. wenn Sie unsere Büros besuchen); Aufzeichnungen Ihrer Interaktionen mit unseren Verkaufs- oder Beratungsteams (z. B. zu Qualitätssicherungs- oder Schulungszwecken, in Übereinstimmung mit den geltenden Gesetzen); oder Chats oder Nachrichtenprotokolle des Kundensupports.
Nicht zutreffend
Rückschlüsse im Sinne des kalifornischen Rechts
, beispielsweise auf Marketing, auf das Sie wahrscheinlich positiv reagieren werden.
Nicht zutreffend
Sensible personenbezogene Daten
, wie beispielsweise Impfnachweise oder Angaben zur Herkunft und ethnischer Zugehörigkeit (optional) (sofern nach geltendem Recht zulässig).
Nicht zutreffend
Obwohl wir in den letzten 12 Monaten keine personenbezogenen Daten gegen Geld „verkauft“ oder „weitergegeben“ haben, wenden wir bei unseren digitalen Eigenschaften routinemäßige Praktiken an, an denen Dritte beteiligt sind, die als „Verkauf“ oder „Weitergabe“ im Sinne des kalifornischen Rechts angesehen werden könnten. Personenbezogene Daten von Minderjährigen unter 16 Jahren werden von uns nicht wissentlich verkauft oder weitergegeben. Wir erfassen oder verarbeiten keine „sensiblen personenbezogenen Daten“ im Sinne des kalifornischen Rechts, um Rückschlüsse auf Ihre Person zu ziehen. Zendesk verwendet sensible personenbezogene Daten nur in Übereinstimmung mit den Ausnahmen vom Recht auf Einschränkung sensibler personenbezogener Daten.
Finanzielle Anreize
: Unter Umständen bieten wir Ihnen als Gegenleistung für die Bereitstellung personenbezogener Daten einen Vorteil oder ein Angebot, beispielsweise einen Rabatt oder einen Gutschein für Personen, die an einer Umfrage teilnehmen. Im Rahmen dieser Umfragen können wir personenbezogene Daten erfassen, z. B. Ihren Namen, Ihre Kontaktinformationen, Ihre Vorlieben, Erfahrungen, Überzeugungen, Meinungen und andere Antworten auf die Fragen der Umfrage. Die Teilnahme an Umfragen wird durch die für die jeweilige Umfrage geltenden Geschäftsbedingungen geregelt, in denen alle mit der Umfrage verbundenen finanziellen Anreize und die Teilnahmebedingungen beschrieben sind. Der Wert Ihrer Daten entspricht dem Wert des Ihnen unterbreiteten Angebots. Diesen Wert haben wir unter Verwendung der mit der Leistung verbundenen Kosten berechnet. Sie können jederzeit von jedem finanziellen Anreiz zurücktreten, indem Sie uns eine E-Mail an
privacy@zendesk.com
schicken. Wenn wir eine andere Art von finanziellen Anreizen anbieten, werden wir Ihnen die wesentlichen Bedingungen jedes Angebots mitteilen, wenn wir Sie zur Teilnahme auffordern.
b. Ihre Datenschutzrechte:
Gemäß den gesetzlichen Einschränkungen haben bestimmte in Kalifornien ansässige Personen die folgenden Rechte.
Auskunftsrecht.
Sie sind berechtigt, Informationen über die Kategorien personenbezogener Daten, die wir über Sie erfasst haben, die Kategorien der Quellen, aus denen wir die personenbezogenen Daten erfasst haben, die Zwecke der Erfassung der personenbezogenen Daten, die Kategorien von Dritten, an die wir Ihre personenbezogenen Daten weitergegeben haben, und den Zweck, zu dem wir Ihre personenbezogenen Daten weitergegeben haben, anzufordern („
Kategorienbericht
“). Zudem können Sie Informationen über die einzelnen personenbezogenen Daten anfordern, die wir über Sie erfasst haben („
Bericht über einzelne Daten
“).
Recht auf Löschung.
Sie sind berechtigt, die Löschung der von uns über Sie erhobenen personenbezogenen Daten zu verlangen.
Recht auf Korrektur.
Sie sind berechtigt, von uns die Berichtigung unrichtiger personenbezogener Daten zu verlangen, die wir über Sie besitzen.
Recht auf Ausschluss vom Verkauf oder der Weitergabe.
Wir verkaufen keine personenbezogenen Daten an Dritte gegen Entgelt. Wie wir jedoch in
Abschnitt 5
erläutern, tauschen wir Informationen mit Werbepartnern aus und erlauben es diesen Werbepartnern, Informationen von unseren digitalen Eigenschaften zu sammeln. Nach kalifornischem Recht kann dieser Austausch als „Verkauf“ oder „Weitergabe“ angesehen werden, und Sie sind berechtigt, diesem „Verkauf“ oder dieser „Weitergabe“ von personenbezogenen Daten zu widersprechen.
Personen mit Wohnsitz in Kalifornien können das Recht auf Auskunft, das Recht auf Löschung und das Recht auf Korrektur geltend machen, indem sie unser
Webformular
verwenden oder uns eine E-Mail an
privacy@zendesk.com
schicken. Bei der Ausübung dieser Rechte werden wir Sie auf keine gesetzlich verbotene Weise diskriminieren.
So können Sie Ihr Recht auf Widerruf des Verkaufs oder der Weitergabe vollständig ausüben:
Um das Recht auf Ausschluss des Verkaufs oder der Weitergabe von Informationen vollständig auszuüben, müssen die beiden folgenden Schritte unternommen werden:
Sie müssen einen Antrag auf Ausschluss des Verkaufs oder der Weitergabe von Daten über unser
Webformular
stellen; und
Sie müssen die Verwendung von Werbe-Cookies und anderen Tracking-Technologien deaktivieren, indem Sie in der Fußzeile unserer Website auf den Link „Meine personenbezogenen Daten nicht verkaufen oder weitergeben“ klicken. Diesen Schritt müssen Sie auf jeder unserer Websites in jedem Browser und auf jedem Gerät, das Sie verwenden, durchführen. Diese Schritte sind erforderlich, damit wir in jedem Browser und auf jedem Gerät, das Sie einsetzen, ein Erstanbieter-Cookie platzieren können, das signalisiert, dass Sie sich abgemeldet haben.
Falls Sie Cookies blockieren, können wir Ihrem Recht, den Verkauf oder die Weitergabe von Gerätedaten abzulehnen, nicht nachkommen, da wir diese automatisch sammeln und mithilfe von Cookies, Pixeln und anderen Tracking-Technologien online an Dritte weitergeben. Wenn Sie die Cookies in Ihrem Browser löschen, müssen Sie Schritt 2 oben erneut ausführen. In dem Umfang, in dem es das kalifornische Gesetz vorschreibt, werden wir die Opt-Out-Signale „Nicht verkaufen oder weitergeben“ beachten, die in einem Format gesendet werden, das allgemein verwendet und von Unternehmen auf Browserebene erkannt wird, wie beispielsweise ein HTTP-Header-Feld oder ein JavaScript-Objekt.
Verifizierung:
Je nach Art der Anfrage müssen wir zur Bearbeitung von kalifornischen Datenschutzanfragen Informationen einholen, um Sie in unseren Unterlagen zu finden oder Ihre Identität zu prüfen. Wir werden in den meisten Fällen Informationen über Sie anfordern, die Ihren Namen, Ihre E-Mail-Adresse oder andere Informationen umfassen können. Wenn Sie einen „Right to Know 'Specific Pieces Report'„ einreichen, können wir auch eine unterschriebene eidesstattliche Erklärung einfordern, dass Sie derjenige sind, für den Sie sich ausgeben. Wir können unter bestimmten Umständen alternative Informationen anfordern und/oder Dritte einschalten, um Ihre Identität zu überprüfen.
Bevollmächtigte Vertreter:
Bevollmächtigte Vertreter dürfen die kalifornischen Datenschutzrechte im Namen von kalifornischen Einzelpersonen ausüben, allerdings behalten wir uns das Recht vor, die Identität der Person wie oben beschrieben direkt zu überprüfen. Bevollmächtigte müssen mit uns Kontakt aufnehmen, indem sie eine Anfrage über unser
Webformular
einreichen und angeben, dass sie die Anfrage als Bevollmächtigter einreichen. Wir können von dem Bevollmächtigten einen Nachweis über seine Befugnis verlangen, in Ihrem Namen zu handeln, indem er eine von Ihnen unterzeichnete Genehmigung vorlegt. Des Weiteren können wir Sie auffordern, Ihre eigene Identität direkt bei uns zu überprüfen oder uns direkt zu bestätigen, dass Sie dem Bevollmächtigten die Erlaubnis erteilt haben, den Antrag zu stellen.
Zeitplan:
Anträge auf Ausschluss des Verkaufs oder der Weitergabe werden innerhalb von fünfzehn Werktagen nach Eingang des Antrags bearbeitet. Lösch- und Auskunftsersuchen werden innerhalb von fünfundvierzig Tagen beantwortet, es sei denn, wir benötigen mehr Zeit, was wir Ihnen mitteilen werden, und es kann bis zu neunzig Tage dauern, bis wir Ihr Ersuchen beantworten.
11. Ergänzende Informationen für den EWR, die Schweiz und das Vereinigte Königreich.
Die folgenden Bestimmungen sind eine Ergänzung der Mitteilung in Bezug auf unsere Verarbeitung personenbezogener Daten im EWR (d. h. in den Mitgliedstaaten der Europäischen Union, Island, Liechtenstein und Norwegen), in der Schweiz und im Vereinigten Königreich. Sollte es zu Konflikten oder Unstimmigkeiten zwischen den anderen Teilen des Hinweises und den Bestimmungen dieses Abschnitts 11 kommen, ist Abschnitt 11 maßgebend und hat Vorrang im Hinblick auf die Verarbeitung von personenbezogenen Daten aus dem EWR, der Schweiz und dem Vereinigten Königreich. Personenbezogene Daten, soweit anwendbar.
Datenverantwortlicher:
Die Zendesk-Einheit, mit der Sie eine primäre Beziehung haben (beispielsweise die Einheit, die den Dienstleistungsvertrag mit Ihnen abgeschlossen hat, die Einheit, die Ihnen Marketingmaterialien und Werbematerialien zur Verfügung gestellt hat, oder die primäre Einheit in der Region, in der Sie auf unsere Website zugreifen), ist der Datenverantwortliche im Sinne dieser Richtlinie. Dies wird in der Mehrzahl der Fälle Zendesk, Inc. sein, es sei denn, wir informieren Sie ausdrücklich anders.
a. Rechtsgrundlage für die Verarbeitung:
Die Rechtsgrundlage, auf die wir uns bei der Erhebung, Verarbeitung und Nutzung personenbezogener Daten stützen, entnehmen Sie bitte
Abschnitt 3
.
b. Ihre Datenschutzrechte:
Im Rahmen der geltenden Datenschutzgesetze können Sie bestimmte Rechte im Hinblick auf Ihre personenbezogenen Daten ausüben:
Auskunftsrecht.
Sie sind berechtigt, von uns eine Bestätigung darüber zu erhalten, ob wir Ihre personenbezogenen Daten und damit zusammenhängende Informationen verarbeiten, sowie das Recht, eine Kopie Ihrer personenbezogenen Daten zu erhalten, die gerade verarbeitet werden.
Recht auf Datenübertragbarkeit.
Sie sind berechtigt, Ihre personenbezogenen Daten, die Sie uns bereitgestellt haben, in einem strukturierten, gängigen und maschinenlesbaren Format zu erhalten, und Sie sind berechtigt, diese ungehindert an andere Datenverantwortliche zu übermitteln. Dieses Recht gilt nur, wenn die Verarbeitung auf Ihrer Einwilligung oder einem Vertrag beruht und die Verarbeitung mit automatisierten Mitteln erfolgt.
Recht auf Korrektur.
Sie sind berechtigt, die Korrektur von unrichtigen personenbezogenen Daten und die Vervollständigung unvollständiger Daten zu verlangen.
Recht auf Widerspruch.
Sie haben das Recht, in bestimmten Fällen Widerspruch gegen die Verarbeitung Ihrer personenbezogenen Daten einzulegen.
Recht auf Einschränkung der Verarbeitung.
Sie können verlangen, dass wir die Verarbeitung Ihrer personenbezogenen Daten in bestimmten Fällen einschränken.
Recht auf Löschung.
Sie können verlangen, dass wir Ihre personenbezogenen Daten in bestimmten Fällen löschen.
Beschwerderecht.
Sie haben das Recht, eine Beschwerde bei einer Aufsichtsbehörde einzureichen. Gemäß dem EU-U.S.  DPF, der UK Extension zum EU-U.S.  DPF und dem Swiss-U.S. DPF verpflichten wir uns, mit dem durch die Datenschutzbehörden der EU („DPAs“), das britische Information Commissioner’s Office („ICO“) und die Gibraltar Regulatory Authority („GRA“) und durch den Eidgenössischen Datenschutz- und Öffentlichkeitsbeauftragten (EDÖB) etablierten Gremium in Hinblick auf ungelöste Beschwerden, die die gemäß EU-U.S.  DPF, der U.K.-Erweiterung zum EU-U.S.  DPF und dem Swiss-U.S. DPF zusammenzuarbeiten.
Recht auf Verweigerung oder Widerruf der Einwilligung.
Falls wir Sie um Ihre Einwilligung zur Verarbeitung Ihrer personenbezogenen Daten bitten, können Sie diese verweigern. Wenn Sie Ihre Einwilligung erteilt haben, können Sie diese jederzeit ohne nachteilige Folgen widerrufen. Die Rechtmäßigkeit der Verarbeitung Ihrer personenbezogenen Daten, die vor dem Widerruf Ihrer Einwilligung erfolgt ist, bleibt hiervon unberührt.
Recht, keiner automatisierten Entscheidungsfindung unterworfen zu werden.
Die in Artikel 22 Absatz 1 und 4 der Datenschutzgrundverordnung der EU/des Vereinigten Königreichs („
DSGVO
“) genannten Arten der automatisierten Entscheidungsfindung finden in Verbindung mit Ihren personenbezogenen Daten nicht statt. Wenn sich dies ändert, werden wir Sie darüber informieren, warum und wie eine solche Entscheidung getroffen wurde, welche Bedeutung sie hat und welche Folgen sie haben kann. Sie sind außerdem berechtigt, einzugreifen, Ihren Standpunkt zu äußern und die Entscheidung anzufechten.
Sie können diese Rechte ausüben, indem Sie sich unter den in
Abschnitt 9
genannten Angaben an uns wenden. Beachten Sie bitte, dass wir in bestimmten Fällen Anträge auf Ausübung von Datenschutzrechten ablehnen können, beispielsweise wenn die Gewährung von Zugang die Datenschutzrechte einer anderen Person verletzen oder unsere rechtlichen Verpflichtungen beeinträchtigen könnte.
c. Internationale Übermittlung personenbezogener Daten:
Da wir global tätig sind, können sich einige der in
Abschnitt 2
des Hinweises genannten Empfänger in Ländern außerhalb des EWR, der Schweiz oder Großbritanniens befinden, die kein angemessenes Maß an Datenschutz im Sinne der Datenschutzgesetze des EWR, der Schweiz und Großbritanniens bieten. Übertragungen innerhalb der Zendesk-Gruppe oder an Dritte, die in solchen Drittländern ihren Sitz haben, erfolgen unter Verwendung eines gültigen Datenübertragungsmechanismus, wie den EU-Standardvertragsklauseln und/oder dem U.K. Addendum zu diesen Klauseln, genehmigte Binding Corporate Rules, genehmigte Verhaltenskodizes und Zertifizierungsmechanismen, auf Basis von zulässigen gesetzlichen Ausnahmeregelungen, oder andere gültige Datenübertragungsmechanismen, die von den Behörden des EWR, der Schweiz oder des Vereinigten Königreichs ausgegeben oder genehmigt wurden. Zusätzliche Informationen (einschließlich einer Kopie) zu unseren verbindlichen Unternehmensregeln finden Sie
hier
, und der Nachweis für die Genehmigung unserer verbindlichen Unternehmensregeln ist auf der Website des Europäischen Datenschutzausschusses
hier
zu finden. Bestimmte Drittländer wurden von den Behörden des EWR, der Schweiz und des Vereinigten Königreichs offiziell als Länder anerkannt, die ein angemessenes Maß an Schutz bieten, sodass keine weiteren Schutzmaßnahmen benötigt werden. Bitte wenden Sie sich an uns unter den in
Abschnitt 9
genannten Kontaktdaten, wenn Sie weitere Informationen über die Übermittlung personenbezogener Daten oder, sofern verfügbar, eine Kopie des entsprechenden Datenübermittlungsverfahrens erhalten möchten.
Die Zendesk, Inc., FutureSimple Inc. und die Smooch Technologies US Inc. befolgen die Bestimmungen des EU-U.S.-  Data Privacy Framework („EU-U.S.  DPF"), der UK-Erweiterung zum EU-U.S.-  DPF und des Swiss-U.S.- Data Privacy Framework („Swiss-U.S. – DPF”), wie durch das US- Handelsministerium (U.S. Department of Commerce) vorgegeben. Zendesk, Inc. FutureSimple Inc. und die Smooch Technologies US Inc. besitzen eine Zertifizierung durch das US- Handelsministerium, die bestätigt, dass beide Unternehmen  in Bezug auf die Verarbeitung der gemäß dem EU-U.S.-DPF-Grundsätze (EU-U.S.-  DPF-Grundsätze“) aus der Europäischen Union empfangenen personenbezogenen Daten die Prinzipien des EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework („EU-U.S.DPF") befolgen. DPF und aus dem Vereinigten Königreich (und Gibraltar) im Vertrauen auf die UK-Erweiterung zum EU-U.S.- DPF zusammenzuarbeiten. Die Zendesk, Inc.,  FutureSimple Inc. und die Smooch Technologies US Inc. besitzen eine Zertifizierung durch das US- Handelsministerium, die bestätigt, dass jene in Bezug auf die Verarbeitung der gemäß dem Swiss-U.S.  DPF aus der Schweiz im Vertrauen auf die Swiss-U.S.-DPF-Grundsätze empfangenen personenbezogenen Daten die Grundsätze des Swiss-U.S. Data Privacy Framework („Swiss-U.S.  DPF-Grundsätze“) befolgen. DPF zusammenzuarbeiten. Im Fall von Konflikten zwischen den Bestimmungen dieser Datenschutzerklärung einerseits und den EU-U.S.  DPF Principles bzw. den Swiss-U.S.  DPF Principles andererseits, haben die Principles Vorrang.  Für Beschwerden in Bezug auf die EU-U.S. Wenn die Einhaltung der DPF-Bestimmungen nicht durch einen der anderen DPF-Mechanismen gelöst werden kann, haben Sie unter bestimmten Bedingungen die Möglichkeit, ein verbindliches Schiedsverfahren anzurufen. Weitere Informationen sind auf der offiziellen DPF-Website zu finden:
https://www.dataprivacyframework.gov/s/article/ANNEX-I-introduction-dpf
.  Für weitere Information zum Programm mit dem Namen Data Privacy Framework ("DPF")  gehen Sie bitte auf
https://www.dataprivacyframework.gov/
. Dort findet sich auch unsere Zertifizierung.
Die Federal Trade Commission ist für die Einhaltung des EU-US-Abkommens durch Zendesk, Inc., FutureSimple Inc. und Smooch Technologies US Inc. zuständig. Data Privacy Framework („EU-U.S.  Data Privacy Framework („EU-U.S. DPF“) und der UK Erweiterung zum EU-U.S.  DPF und des Swiss-U.S.- Data Privacy Framework („Swiss-U.S. – DPF.
Datenschutzbeauftragter:
Die Kontaktdaten unseres Datenschutzbeauftragten lauten wie folgt: Zendesk, Inc., z. Hd.: Privacy Team and DPO, 989 Market Street, San Francisco, CA 94103, Vereinigte Staaten,
euprivacy@zendesk.com
.
12. Ergänzende Informationen für andere Regionen
Australien:
Die personenbezogenen Daten, die wie in dieser Richtlinie beschrieben von der Zendesk-Gruppe erhoben, gespeichert, genutzt und/oder verarbeitet werden, werden im Einklang mit dem Australian Privacy Act 1988 (Commonwealth) und den Australia Privacy Principles erhoben, gespeichert, genutzt und/oder verarbeitet. Wenn Sie mit der Bearbeitung einer Beschwerde durch uns unzufrieden sind oder mit der von uns vorgeschlagenen Lösung nicht einverstanden sind, können Sie eine Beschwerde beim Office of the Australian Information Commissioner („
OAIC
”) einreichen, indem Sie das OAIC über die auf
dessen Website
aufgeführten Wege kontaktieren. Alternativ können Sie uns dazu auffordern, die Einzelheiten Ihrer Beschwerde direkt an das OAIC weiterzuleiten.
Brasilien:
Die von der Zendesk-Gruppe erfassten, gespeicherten, verwendeten und/oder verarbeiteten personenbezogenen Daten, wie in dieser Richtlinie beschrieben, werden in Übereinstimmung mit dem Lei Geral de Proteção de Dados („
LGPD
“) erfasst, gespeichert, verwendet und/oder verarbeitet. Personen, die unsere Websites oder Dienste nutzen oder auf sie zugreifen, erklären sich ausdrücklich mit der Erhebung, Verwendung, Speicherung und Verarbeitung ihrer personenbezogenen Daten durch uns für die in diesem Hinweis beschriebenen Zwecke einverstanden.
Kanada:
Personenbezogene Daten gemäß der Definition im Personal Information Protection and Electronic Documents Act („
PIPEDA
“) werden von der Zendesk-Gruppe im Einklang mit den Verpflichtungen der Zendesk-Gruppe gemäß PIPEDA erhoben, gespeichert, verwendet und/oder verarbeitet.
Japan:
Die personenbezogenen Daten, die von der Zendesk-Gruppe gemäß dieser Richtlinie erhoben, gespeichert, genutzt und/oder verarbeitet werden, werden gemäß dem japanischen Gesetz zum Schutz personenbezogener Daten (Act on the Protection of Personal Information, „
APPI
”) erhoben, gespeichert, genutzt und/oder verarbeitet.
Nevada:
Wir verkaufen derzeit keine personenbezogenen Daten im Sinne der Gesetze Nevadas. Wenn Sie in Nevada ansässig sind, können Sie uns dennoch eine E-Mail mit den oben genannten Informationen senden, um Ihr Recht auf Abmeldung vom Verkauf gemäß der Nevada Revised Statutes §603A ff. auszuüben.
Neuseeland:
Die personenbezogenen Daten, die wie in dieser Richtlinie beschrieben von der Zendesk-Gruppe erhoben, gespeichert, genutzt und/oder verarbeitet werden, werden im Einklang mit dem New Zealand’s Privacy Act 2020 und seinen 13 Information Privacy Principles („
NZ IPPs
”) erhoben, gespeichert, genutzt und/oder verarbeitet.
Singapur:
Die personenbezogenen Daten, die von der Zendesk-Gruppe gemäß dieser Richtlinie erfasst, gespeichert, genutzt und/oder verarbeitet werden, werden gemäß den Verpflichtungen der Zendesk-Gruppe im Rahmen des Data Processing Act 2012 („
PDPA
”) erfasst, gespeichert, genutzt und/oder verarbeitet.
Vereinigtes Königreich:
Die von der Zendesk-Gruppe erhobenen, gespeicherten, genutzten und/oder verarbeiteten personenbezogenen Daten, wie in dieser Datenschutzrichtlinie beschrieben, werden in Übereinstimmung mit den Verpflichtungen der Zendesk-Gruppe gemäß dem britischen Datenschutzgesetz 2018 in der Fassung der Data Protection, Privacy and Electronic Communications (EU Exit) Regulations 2019 (Amendments etc.), in der jeweils geänderten, aufgehobenen oder ersetzten Fassung („
U.K. GDPR
“) erhoben, gespeichert, verwendet und/oder verarbeitet.
13. Englischsprachige Version ist ausschlaggebend
Nicht-englische Übersetzungen dieser Richtlinie werden nur aus Gründen der Übersichtlichkeit zur Verfügung gestellt. Im Falle von Unklarheiten oder Widersprüchen zwischen den Übersetzungen ist die englischsprachige Fassung maßgebend.
14. Zendesk, Inc. Verbundene Unternehmen
Zendesk, Inc.; Zendesk Brasil Software Corporativo Ltda; Zendesk UK Limited; Zendesk International Limited; Zendesk APS; Zendesk Pty., Ltd; Kabushiki Kaisha Zendesk; Zendesk Incorporated; Zendesk GmbH; Zendesk Singapore Pte. Ltd; Zendesk France SAS; Base sp. z o. o. (Base spółka z ograniczoną odpowiedzialnością); Zendesk Technologies Private Limited; FutureSimple Inc.; Zendesk Korea LLC; Smooch Technologies ULC; Cleverly, Unipessoal, LDA.; ZD Sub Holdings (USA); Goldcup 30290 AB (Schweden); Smooch Technologies US Inc. (USA); Zendesk S. de R.L. de C.V. (Mexiko); Zendesk Technologies Spain S.L.U. (Spanien); Zoro TopCo, LP; Zendesk Netherlands B.V.; Zendesk Italy S.r.l.; Tymeshift Inc; Tymeshift doo Novi Sad; Tymeshift Portugal, Unipessoal Lda.
Sub-policy 6
https://unbounce.com/privacy/:
Privacy Policy
Last Updated: Oct 15, 2024
Privacy Policy
Last Updated: Oct 15, 2024
Privacy Statement:
At Unbounce, we are dedicated to safeguarding your personal information. This privacy policy outlines how we collect, use, and protect your data. We prioritize transparency and give you control over your information. We employ robust security measures and technical controls to prevent unauthorized access. As technology advances, we remain committed to continuously improving our privacy practices. Trust is paramount to us, and we strive to uphold the highest privacy protection standards. We invite you to review this policy, empowering you with knowledge about how we handle your data.
The Unbounce Privacy Policy
Thank you for using the Site and/or Services of Unbounce Marketing Solutions Inc. (“Unbounce”, “we”, “us”, or “our”).
We take your privacy very seriously, and this Privacy Policy explains how we collect, use, disclose, and protect information relating to our Site and Services.
By visiting the Site or by using the Services, you accept the terms and conditions of this Privacy Policy.
This Privacy Policy may be amended at any time, with or without notice or notification, so we recommend periodically reviewing it.
Continued use of the Site or Services following the posting of any change to this Privacy Policy constitutes acceptance of all changes.
We suggest printing or saving a local copy of this Privacy Policy for your records.
Capitalized terms not defined in this Privacy Policy have the meaning assigned them in our Terms of Service, “Clause 2. General Terms”, found at
https://unbounce.com/terms-of-service/.
You can find a list of our data subprocessors
here
.
I. Key Terms
a. Customer –
The entity/entities who subscribes to Unbounce’s Apps/Platform/Products.
b. Lead –
The entity/entities that visit the Landing Pages built by Unbounce’s customers.
c. Customer Data
– The business  relationship between information gathered during the subscription process to Unbounce’s platform
d. Customer Content –
The landing page structure, copy, and design. All the elements that make us a “Customer’s” landing page on the Unbounce platform.
e. Lead Data –
Any Information provided by a visitor to the “customer’s” landing page through “form” elements used by the “Customer: on their landing page on Unbounce’s platform.
f. Personal data:
any information that can be used to identify an individual, such as name, email address, and phone number.
g. Processing:
any operation or set of operations performed on personal data, such as collection, storage, use, or deletion.
h. Controller:
the organization that determines the purposes and means of processing personal data.
i. Processor:
a third-party organization that processes personal data on behalf of a controller.
j. Data subject:
the individual to whom the personal data relates.
k. Consent:
the freely given, specific, informed, and unambiguous indication of a data subject’s wishes by which he or she, by a statement or by clear affirmative action, signifies agreement to the processing of personal data.
l. Legitimate interests:
the lawful basis for processing personal data where it is necessary for the purposes of a controller’s legitimate interests, except where such interests are overridden by the interests or fundamental rights and freedoms of the data subject.
m. Data breach:
a security incident that results in the accidental or unlawful destruction, loss, alteration, or unauthorized disclosure of, or access to, personal data.
II. Information We Collect
We collect different types of information from or through the Site and/or Services. Where appropriate, the legal basis for our processing of Personal Data is either consent, where we ask for it or that the processing is necessary for providing the Site and/or Services and is carried out in our legitimate interests, which are further explained in “Clause III”. How We May Use Information We Collect from You” section.
1.
Account
Information
When you sign up for an Unbounce Account, you select a User ID (by entering an email address and password) and we collect and store that information. Collected information is data we have solicited in a form or obtained via cookies or by other means; stored information is collected information that has been subsequently deposited into our databases after collection.
In addition to your User ID, we also collect and store your first name and last name.
We may also collect and store your company name, telephone number, address, and certain other information about you that may be required by us to provide the Services or be disclosed by you during your use of the Services.
2. Billing Information
When your Account includes a Subscription, we collect but do not store your credit card number.
When you enter your credit card number, it is sent directly to the Payment Processor, our third-party payment provider, and bypasses our databases entirely.
From there, the Payment Processor transfers Billing Information to the Payment Service Provider for payment processing.
You agree that our third-party payment providers and processors may collect and store your billing address and credit card information on our behalf and that we may change our payment provider and processor at any time for any reason.
Unbounce will collect and store your billing address.
Full credit card numbers are never visible to Unbounce employees or contractors, and we will not modify your credit card number or billing address under any circumstances.
We adhere to all controls required for handling cardholder data in accordance with Payment Card Industry (PCI) compliance standards.
You agree that our third-party payment processors may collect and store your billing address and credit card information on our behalf.
We only use Third Parties providing sufficient guarantees to implement appropriate technical and organizational measures.
3. Log Data
When you use the Services, our servers may automatically collect and store information, including information that your browser sends whenever you visit a website.
This log data may include but is not limited to, your Internet Protocol (IP) address, the address of the web page you visited before using the Services, the operating system you are using, the date and time of your accessing the Services, geolocation information, type of device, cookie data, and browser signatures.
IP Addresses:
We will log the IP address of any visitor to a webpage you create and publish using the Services to calculate traffic usage per Account and conversion rates per variant, investigate spam allegations and discrepancies in page statistics, as well as to ensure the security of the webpage, Services, and related data. Unbounce never uses the IP address or other Personal Data of visitors to your pages to conduct marketing activities or promote the Services.
4. Cookies and Log Files
Cookies are small amounts of data that are transferred to your web browser by a web server and are used to collect and store information about a user.
The ways we use cookies include but are not limited to tracking which webpage variant a visitor has seen, monitoring traffic patterns, and gauging the popularity of service options. Cookies also allow us to ensure that visitors see the webpage variant they expect to see if they return to the same website URL and to calculate total visits and views per webpage, variant, Account, and client sub-account.
First-party cookies on Unbounce landing pages are anonymous and cannot be used on their own to identify an individual.
Use of the Site and Services signifies consent to Unbounce’s use of cookies, including and without limitation third-party cookies that Unbounce may choose to use for analytics or other purposes.
You agree that should you disable cookies on your browser, certain aspects of the Services may be unavailable to you, and that Unbounce is not responsible for any adverse effects arising from your browser or other computer or mobile settings.
You agree that you are responsible for adhering to all laws, policies, and other regulations in your relevant jurisdiction(s), including but not limited to all laws requiring that cookie use must be disclosed. Unbounce disclaims all liability in this area.
5. User Contributions
You may also provide information to be published or displayed on public areas of the Site and/or Services, or transmitted to other users of the Site and/or Services (collectively, “User Contributions”).
Your User Contributions are posted and transmitted to others at your own risk. We cannot control the actions of other users of the Site with whom you may choose to share your User Contributions.
Therefore, we cannot and do not guarantee that your User Contributions will not be viewed by unauthorized persons.
6. Lead Data
You have the option of using the Unbounce platform to build forms and solicit information from individual data subjects (“Lead Data”).
In these situations, since you choose which data to collect and process, the nature of the data, as well as the purposes and means of processing, you are acting as “Data Controller” under applicable laws (including, but not limited to, the
General Data Protection Regulation (“GDPR”)
and you have the accountability and associated responsibilities under these applicable laws.
By maintaining an Account with us, you voluntarily consent to the collection, storage, use, and disclosure of Personal Data as specified in this Privacy Policy.
Without limiting the foregoing, we may on occasion ask you to consent when we collect, store, use, or disclose your Personal Data in specific circumstances.
These circumstances may include but are not limited to, Trial Programs, Beta Tests, research and development, and other changes, updates, or additions to the Services.
You are obligated to protect your Customer i.e. Data Subject Rights and the deletion of Lead Data for your Customers is your responsibility and Unbounce shall not be responsible for any deletion obligations of the Lead Data.
7. WordPress Plug-in:
You have the option of adding a “WordPress Domain” to your account.
A WordPress domain is a domain you have purchased from a hosting provider or domain name seller and installed on WordPress.org software.
In order to publish Unbounce webpages to your WordPress Domain, you will need to install Unbounce’s Plugin for WordPress (“the Plugin”) in your WordPress account.
When installing or updating the Plugin, Unbounce will collect and store certain data from your WordPress environment.
This data includes but is not limited to the WordPress version number, PHP version number, URL version number, the names of other WordPress plugins installed on your domain, the names of other PHP extensions installed on your domain, your operating system, and key PHP configuration settings.
We are collecting this information in order to better support the Plugin and the environments in which it is installed.
Among other things, we will collect and store this data in order to inform our decisions on minimum configuration and testing requirements, and to improve the stability of Plugin updates.
You hereby consent to the collection and storage of this information in your use, installation and updating of the Plugin.
If you do not consent to the collection and storage of this information, you may choose not to use the Plugin.
III. How We May Use the Information We Collect From You
We analyze this information based on our legitimate interest in enhancing the Unbounce platform and ensuring a better user experience. Additionally, it is essential for fulfilling our contractual obligations to you effectively.
We take steps designed to ensure that only those employees who need access to your Personal Data to fulfill their employment duties will have need-to-know and restricted access to it.
We may use the information we collect from you to provide the Services to you and to understand, improve, and enhance the Services.
We do not sell your personal information to any third party.
This includes but is not limited to, the right to conduct research, analyze trends, monitor traffic usage, and examine the ways in which our users engage with the Services.
We may use your Personal Data to respond to your questions or comments, including support-related and billing inquiries.
We also use your Account data to administer your Account and keep track of billing and payments, invoicing, and Account management.
If you have received a commercial electronic message from us (regarding our products, services, news and events), it is because either you have previously provided your express consent, we have your implied consent under Canada’s Anti-Spam Legislation, or because the type of message sent is exempt under Anti-Spam Legislation.
You have the option not to receive this commercial electronic message.
We provide an opt-out function within all electronic marketing communications or will cease to communicate with you for this purpose if you email us at unsubscribe@unbounce.com and tell us not to communicate this information to you.
While you maintain an Account with us, we may contact you to notify you about changes to the Services, and other important Service-related notices, including but not limited to security and fraud notices, Service suspensions, overages and outages.
These emails and messages are considered essential, non-marketing communications, and you may not be able to opt out of them.
We work hard to keep the Services secure and to prevent abuse and fraud.
We may use your Personal Data as necessary to respond to security incidents, claims of any violation of our rights or those of any Third Parties, to protect the rights, property, or personal safety of you, us, our Customers, and the public, and as required or authorized by law.
IV. How We May Disclose Information We Collect from You
Unbounce will only share your information with Third Parties in accordance with your instructions or as necessary to provide you with a specific service (for example, our third-party payment processors, and our email service provider for the “Email Me New Leads” integration) or otherwise in accordance with applicable privacy legislation.
As a general rule, unless permitted in this Privacy Policy, we do not and will not sell, rent, share, or disclose your Personal Data without first receiving your permission.
When we disclose your Personal Data to third-party service providers, we take reasonable measures to ensure that the rules set forth in this Policy are complied with.
This policy is not intended to place any limits on what we may do with data that is aggregated and/or anonymized so it is no longer associated with an identifiable Customer or user of the Services (“Aggregated Data”).
We may use your Personal Data to generate Aggregated Data for internal use and for sharing with Third Parties on a selective basis.
Lead Data is hosted in our Frankfurt (Germany) database.
However, please note that your Personal Data may be stored and processed in any country where we have facilities or in which we engage Third-Party service providers.
By using the Site and/or Services, you consent to the transfer of information to countries outside your country of residence, including the United States, which may have different data protection rules than in your country.
While such information is outside of the EU/EEA, it is subject to the laws of the country in which it is held and may be subject to disclosure to the governments, courts law enforcement or regulatory agencies of such other country, pursuant to the laws of such country.
Our practices regarding your Personal Data will at all times continue to be governed by this Policy and we will comply with GDPR requirements providing adequate protection for the transfer of Personal Data from the EU/EEA to a third country.
V. Your Privacy Rights
a. Managing Your Information:
You have the right to access and edit your Account and Profile Information (including User ID and billing details) by logging into the Services and choosing to edit your Profile.  If you believe we have exceeded the legitimate basis for processing, the processing is no longer necessary, are processing, or believe your Personal Data is inaccurate; you have the right to reach out to us to delete/change any of your personal data.
b. Changes To Profile
You are able to upgrade, downgrade, enable and disable third-party integrations, view your Lead Data, download a CSV file of your Lead Data for any date range, invite additional Users to your Account (depending on your Account level), and decide which permission level to grant each additional User.
c. Withdrawing Consent
You have the right to withdraw consent to processing where consent is the basis of processing and object to any unlawful data processing under certain conditions.
d. Data Portability
In certain jurisdictions, the law may grant you the right to request copies of the personal information that we hold. You may also have the right to request your personal information, which you have provided to us, in a structured, commonly used, and machine-readable format. Additionally, where technically feasible, you may have the right to request the transmission of this information to another service provider.
e. Retention Periods
We will maintain your Personal Data for as long as they are needed, or as required by applicable laws, regulations, or government orders. Unless you request otherwise, your Account, including Lead Data, will be deleted from our databases within 1 year of Account cancellation. We reserve the right to charge a fee for data retention past our prescribed deletion period, and to update or amend our data retention policy.
f. Data Restriction and Objection
You have the right to object to decisions being taken by automated means which produce legal effects concerning you or similarly significantly affect you, under certain conditions. You have the right to demand that we restrict processing of your Personal Data, under certain conditions, if you believe we have exceeded the legitimate basis for processing, the processing is no longer necessary, are processing, or believe your Personal Data is inaccurate;
g. Accountability
If you have any inquiries regarding our privacy practices or this Privacy Policy, or if you wish to file a complaint with the appropriate authority, please reach out to Unbounce via email at
privacy@unbounce.com
. We will promptly address your concerns and make every effort to resolve any privacy-related issues.
For individuals located in the European Economic Area, Switzerland, the United Kingdom, or Brazil, you hold the right to lodge a complaint with a supervisory authority if you believe that our handling of your personal information violates applicable laws. the right to lodge a complaint with data protection authorities. You may contact our Data Protection Officer by emailing
privacy@unbounce.com
with your request.
If you want to learn more about your rights under the GDPR, you can visit the
European Commission’s
page on Data Protection.
We will maintain your Personal Data for as long as they are needed, or as required by applicable laws, regulations, or government orders.
VI. Link to Third Party Websites
The Site and/or Services may contain links to other websites.
We are not responsible for the privacy practices or the content of such websites.
We encourage you to read the privacy policy and terms of use of any linked websites, as their policies and practices may differ from our own.
VII. Change of Ownership or Business Transition
In the event of a change of ownership, sale, merger, liquidation, reorganization or acquisition of the corporation, in whole or in part, Personal Data (including Lead Data) may be transferred as part of the transaction, as long as the party acquiring such Personal Data agrees to be bound by the terms of this Privacy Policy.
The acquiring party would need to provide substantial evidence and establish the ownership of the acquisition and claim.
VIII. Security
We will strive to prevent unauthorized access to your Personal Data, however, no data transmission over the Internet, by wireless device or over the air is guaranteed to be 100% secure.
We will continue to enhance security procedures as new technologies and procedures become available.
Our password policy for our application employs a non-traditional approach by utilizing the third-party service, zxcvbn, for password validation. zxcvbn offers a more secure, flexible, and usable alternative to traditional password composition policies, allowing for a minimal complexity score rather than rigid rules regarding the inclusion of lowercase letters, uppercase letters, numbers, and symbols. It provides improved security by effectively detecting weak passwords while accommodating strong passwords, and its flexibility considers factors such as passphrases with uncommon words, keyboard patterns with varying lengths and turns, and the impact of capitalization on complexity.
If you forget your password, we will ask you for your email address and send you an email with instructions for resetting your password. Please also note at no time is an Unbounce employee able to view your password.
Please remember that you control what Personal Data you provide while using the Site and Services.
Ultimately, you are responsible for maintaining the secrecy of your identification, passwords and/or any Personal Data in your possession for the use of the Site and/or Services.
We are not responsible for, and cannot control, the use by others of any information which you provide to them and you should use caution in selecting the Personal Data you provide to others through the Site or Services.
Similarly, we cannot assume any responsibility for the content of any Personal Data or other information which you receive from other users through the Site or Services, and you release us from any and all liability in connection with the contents of any Personal Data or other information which you may receive using the Site or Services.
We cannot guarantee, or assume any responsibility for verifying, the accuracy of the Personal Data or other information provided by any Third Party. You release us from any and all liability in connection with the use of such Personal Data or other information of others.
We use technical and organizational means to ensure the security of personal data and to protect it from accidental or deliberate destruction, accidental loss, alteration, unauthorized disclosure or access, to the extent required by generally applicable law.
The data entrusted shall be retained on hardware and servers in properly secured information storage centres, to which only authorized persons have access.
We carry out activities related to the processing of personal data with respect to all legal and technical requirements imposed on us by the provisions regarding personal data protection.
We have implemented pseudonymization, and data encryption and have access controls in place so as to minimize the effects of possible data security breaches.
We regularly test the security of our systems and have a backup procedure in place.
Personal data is processed only by persons authorized by us or by processors with whom we cooperate closely. Sub-processing is conducted exclusively on the basis of relevant contracts.
As an internet user, there are various vulnerabilities that the systems are exposed to. Therefore, you have full responsibility and liability for the use of the related personal data or sharing the information of others. Unbounce will not be responsible or liable for any personal data loss or breach for any viruses or attacks vulnerability on your systems.
IX. Children’s Privacy
The Site and/or Services are not directed to children under the age of 16, and we do not intentionally and/or knowingly collect Personal Data from children under the age of 16 without obtaining parental consent. ¹
If you are under 16 years of age, then please do not use or access the Site and/or Services at any time or in any manner.
If we learn that Personal Data has been collected on the Site and/or Services from persons under 16 years of age and without verifiable parental consent, then we will take the appropriate steps to delete this information.
If you are a parent or guardian and discover that your child under 16 years of age has provided Personal Data, then you may alert us as set forth in the “Contact Us” section and request that we delete that child’s Personal Data from our systems.
X. Resolution/Compliance
If you have any questions about this Privacy Policy or your Personal Data, to make an access or correction request, to exercise any applicable rights, to make a complaint, or to obtain information about our policies and practices with respect to any service providers outside the EU/EEA, our Data Protection Officer can be reached by mail or email using the following contact information: privacy@unbounce.com.  You can also submit a support request by using our online email ticket system by clicking
here.
You have the right to reach out to the jurisdiction of the supervisory board of the respective country that applies to you if you are not satisfied with the privacy practices, responses or policies of Unbounce.
XI. Contact Us
Address: 603-401 West Georgia St. Vancouver, BC, Canada, V6B 5A1
Worldwide: +1 604 484 1354
Email:
privacy@unbounce.com
¹
As per Article 8 of the GDPR, ages below 16 are considered children. The same may be different for your jurisdiction. <
https://gdpr-info.eu/art-8-gdpr/
>
XII. Changes to this Privacy Policy
Unbounce may change this Policy from time to time. If we make any changes to this Policy, we will change the “Last Updated” date above. Your continued use of our Website, Platform or Services after such changes have been published to our Policy will constitute your acceptance of the revised Policy.
Unbounce is SOC 2 Type 1 certified, validating our internal controls and ensuring your data is always secure, available, and processed with integrity.
By clicking “Accept All Cookies”, you agree to the storing of cookies on your device to enhance site navigation, analyze site usage, and assist in our marketing efforts.
Cookies Settings
Reject All
Accept All Cookies
Privacy Preference Center
When you visit any website, it may store or retrieve information on your browser, mostly in the form of cookies. This information might be about you, your preferences or your device and is mostly used to make the site work as you expect it to. The information does not usually directly identify you, but it can give you a more personalized web experience. Because we respect your right to privacy, you can choose not to allow some types of cookies. Click on the different category headings to find out more and change our default settings. However, blocking some types of cookies may impact your experience of the site and the services we are able to offer.
More information
Allow All
Manage Consent Preferences
Performance Cookies
These cookies allow us to count visits and traffic sources so we can measure and improve the performance of our site. They help us to know which pages are the most and least popular and see how visitors move around the site. All information these cookies collect is aggregated and therefore anonymous. If you do not allow these cookies we will not know when you have visited our site, and will not be able to monitor its performance.
Targeting Cookies
These cookies may be set through our site by our advertising partners. They may be used by those companies to build a profile of your interests and show you relevant adverts on other sites. They do not store directly personal information, but are based on uniquely identifying your browser and internet device. If you do not allow these cookies, you will experience less targeted advertising.
Always Active
These cookies are necessary for the website to function and cannot be switched off in our systems. They are usually only set in response to actions made by you which amount to a request for services, such as setting your privacy preferences, logging in or filling in forms. You can set your browser to block or alert you about these cookies, but some parts of the site will not then work. These cookies do not store any personally identifiable information.
Functional Cookies
These cookies enable the website to provide enhanced functionality and personalisation. They may be set by us or by third party providers whose services we have added to our pages. If you do not allow these cookies then some or all of these services may not function properly.
Back Button
Cookie List
Search Icon
Filter Icon
Clear
checkbox label
label
Apply
Cancel
Consent
Leg.Interest
checkbox label
label
checkbox label
label
checkbox label
label